HEALTH  INFORMATION  TECHNOLOGY 

S.  HRG.  109–1129 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY, INNOVATION, 

AND COMPETITIVENESS 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  30,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

65–909 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  TECHNOLOGY,  INNOVATION,  AND 

COMPETITIVENESS 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 30, 2005  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen  .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Basch, Dr. Peter, Medical Director, eHealth Initiatives, MedStar Health  .........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Bostrom, Susan L., Senior Vice President, Internet Business Solutions Group 
and Worldwide Government Affairs, Cisco Systems, Inc.  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brailer,  David  J.,  M.D.,  Ph.D.,  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information 
Technology, Department of Health and Human Services  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Clancy,  Carolyn  M.,  M.D.,  Director,  Agency  for  Healthcare  Research  and 
Quality, Department of Health and Human Services  .......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Enzi, Hon. Michael B., U.S. Senator from Wyoming  ............................................
Glaser,  John,  Ph.D.,  Vice  President/Chief  Information  Officer,  Partners 
............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Ignagni, Karen, President/CEO, America’s Health Insurance Plans  ..................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kolodner, Robert M., M.D., Acting Chief Health Informatics Officer, Veterans 
Health Administration, Department of Veterans Affairs  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Pure,  Pamela,  President,  McKesson  Provider  Technologies,  Executive  Vice 
President, McKesson Corporation  .......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Semerjian,  Dr.  Hratch  G.,  Acting  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards 
and Technology, Technology Administration, Department of Commerce  ........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Stabenow, Hon. Debbie, U.S. Senator from Michigan  ..........................................

Healthcare 

Page 
1 
9 
1 
8 

61 
63 

51 
54 

20 
23 

12 
15 
3 

56 
58 
77 
79 

35 
38 

71 
73 

27 
29 
5 

APPENDIX 

Advanced Medical Technology Association (AdvaMed), prepared statement  ..... 125 
eHealth Initiative and Foundation, prepared statement 
..................................... 104 
Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronics  Engineers—United  States  of  America 

(IEEE–USA), prepared statement  ...................................................................... 115 

McNamara,  Pam,  Chief  Executive  Officer,  CRF,  Inc.,  letter,  dated  July  7, 

2005, to Hon. John Ensign  .................................................................................. 118 
Pharmaceutical Care Management Association, prepared statement  ................. 121 
Robertson,  Dr.  Rose  Marie,  Chief  Science  Officer,  The  American  Heart  Asso-
ciation;  Professor  of  Medicine,  Vanderbilt  University  Medical  Center,  pre-
pared statement 

................................................................................................... 119 
.......... 103 

Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 
Thomas,  D.O.,  George,  President,  American  Osteopathic  Association,  letter, 

dated June 27, 2005, to Hon. John Ensign  ........................................................ 114 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

HEALTH  INFORMATION  TECHNOLOGY 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  30,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY, INNOVATION, AND 
COMPETITIVENESS, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9:30  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  Ensign, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Good  morning.  I  would  like  to  call  the  Sub-
committee  to  order  and  welcome  everyone  to  today’s  hearing  on 
health information technology. I think we have an exciting topic to 
discuss  this  morning.  I’m  excited  about  our  panels,  and  am  espe-
cially  interested  to  hear  from  my  two  colleagues  that  are  here  to 
testify  today.  I  would  like  to  begin  with  an  opening  statement. 
When  Senator  Kerry  arrives,  we  will  turn  to  him  for  an  opening 
statement, and then we will hear from our first panel. 

Fragmented,  disorganized  and  inaccessible  clinical  information, 
adversely affects the quality of healthcare and compromises patient 
safety. The Institute of Medicine estimates that as many as 98,000 
Americans  die  each  year  from  medical  errors  in  hospitals.  Many 
more  Americans  die  or  have  permanent  disability  because  of  inap-
propriate treatments, or mistreatments. Furthermore, studies have 
found that as much as $300 billion is spent each year on healthcare 
that  does  not  improve  patient  outcomes—treatment  that  is  unnec-
essary, or ineffective. Health information technology, which is used 
to collect and store clinical, administrative, and financial health in-
formation electronically, is a major part of the solution to this prob-
lem.  Technology  such  as  electronic  health  records,  and  bar  coding 
of  prescription  drugs  have  been  proposed  as  means  to  lower 
healthcare  costs  and  reduce  medical  errors.  We  need  to  explore 
these areas. 

We are constantly working on new ways to enhance and improve 
the  field  of  medicine  in  the  21st  century.  But  efficient,  quality  pa-
tient care is often compromised because physicians and nurses still 
communicate vital information through handwritten notes. Medical 
orders and prescriptions are handwritten and far too often they are 
misunderstood  or  not  followed  in  accordance  with  the  physician’s 
instructions.  Patients  often  have  multiple  providers.  In  addition  to 
seeing  their  internist,  patients  often  schedule  appointments  with 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

cardiologists,  endocrinologists,  rheumatologists,  and  other  health-
care professionals. 

2 

for 

In  this  outdated  paper-based  system,  a  patient’s  medical  infor-
mation  is  scattered  across  medical  records  kept  by  numerous  care 
givers  in  many  different  locations.  As  a  result,  all  of  the  patient’s 
medical  information  is  often  unavailable  at  the  time  of  care.  This 
is completely unacceptable. I believe we need to begin transforming 
healthcare  through  information  technology.  The  development  and 
adoption  of  interoperable  electronic  health  records  is  an  important 
step that can be taken to improve quality of care and reduce costs. 
An electronic record is almost never lost or misfiled. It is almost 
always exactly where it should be, even if you are not. This means 
that  an  electronic  record  may  be  accessed  from  any  point  in  the 
healthcare system. So if you are traveling in my home State of Ne-
vada  and  you  get  sick  or  get  in  an  accident,  a  physician  can  in-
stantly  obtain  medical  information,  such  as  allergies,  medications, 
and prior diagnoses, to determine how best to treat you. 

Electronic  health  records  can  also  help  ensure  that  physicians 
have  the  information  they  need  to  make  appropriate  clinical  deci-
sions. Because of the rapid growth of medical information and new 
treatment  methods,  physicians  must  accumulate  a  large  volume  of 
new knowledge in a short period of time. 

Information  overload  is,  in  general,  an  occupational  dilemma 
that  has  been  complicated  by  wide  variability  in  treatment  meth-
ods  and  patient  care  across  geographic  regions.  Best  practices 
serves  as  a  guideline  for  prevention  or  treatment  of  a  certain  dis-
ease  or  condition.  They  consist  of  quality-improving  strategies 
which  bring  together  the  best  external  evidence  and  other  knowl-
edge  necessary 
informed  decisionmaking  about  specific 
healthcare  problems.  These  guidelines  can  be  easily  incorporated 
into health information technology. 

Clearly  health  information  technology  has  the  potential  to  revo-
lutionize  the  U.S.  healthcare  system.  If  properly  implemented, 
health  information  technology  will  reduce  duplication,  and  cut 
down  on  administrative  costs,  such  as  transcription  and  billing.  In 
addition, this technology will reduce medical errors and potentially 
reduce  medical  liability  insurance  premiums  for  physicians  and 
other healthcare professionals. 

I am eager to hear about the current state of health information 
technology  in  both  the  public  and  private  sectors.  It  is  my  hope 
that  this  hearing  will  help  us  understand  what  we  need  to  do  to 
create a more affordable, efficient, and high-quality healthcare sys-
tem  in  terms  of  patient  care  and  safety.  I  look  forward  to  the  ex-
pert testimony of our distinguished panel of leaders in various Fed-
eral agencies, and the industry. 

With  that,  I  want  to  start  with  our  first  panel.  We  will  begin 
with  the  Chairman  of  the  Health,  Education,  Labor,  and  Pensions 
Committee,  on  which  I  have  the  honor  of  serving.  Chairman  Enzi 
is  doing  a  magnificent  job  taking  on  all  aspects  of  healthcare  and 
how they affect our society and the reforms we need to make. 

So Chairman Enzi, we will hear from you and then we will hear 
from  one  of  my  classmates,  my  colleague  from  Michigan,  Senator 
Stabenow. Senator Enzi. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL B. ENZI, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WYOMING 

Senator  ENZI.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  I  really  appreciate  you 
holding  this  hearing  today.  It  is  one  of  the  most  exciting  things 
happening in America right now. It has the most potential for help-
ing people of anything in America. And you’ve recognized that, and 
called  this  hearing.  And  of  course  I  need  to  recognize  that  you’re 
also the Chairman of the Senate Republican High Tech Task Force 
which  has  had  a  vital  interest  in  this.  And  you  do  serve  on  my 
Committee  and  you  contributed  part  of  the  bill  that  we’ll  be  intro-
ducing  later  today  that  deals  with  information  technology.  In  fact 
the whole thing is about information technology. 

There  are  some  amazing  things  that  are  about  to  happen.  We 
have  got  the  tools  already,  we  just  haven’t  done  the  applications, 
and  one  of  the  reasons  we  haven’t  done  the  applications  is  there 
isn’t  a  common  set  of  standards.  And  I’ve  been  working  with  Sen-
ator  Kennedy  who  is  the  Ranking  Member  of  my  Committee  and 
we’ve  been  working  on  with  the  Finance  Committee  because  there 
are some finance pieces on this, and Senator Grassley, and Senator 
Baucus have been doing some tremendous work on it, and we have 
been  working  with  the  White  House  through  Secretary  Levitt  who 
has been very involved in informational technology for a long time. 
He  was  one  of  the  founders  of  the  Western  Governors  University, 
which  is  an  online  university  for  people  who  can  learn  anywhere 
in the world. You can even get your diploma online with that. But 
that  was  a  little  invention  from  9  years  ago,  and  it’s  transformed 
dramatically.  There  is  no  reason  that  this  won’t  be  the  next  really 
dramatic change. 

And one of the reasons is that healthcare expenditures are a vast 
part  of  our  economy.  In  2003,  we  spent  than  $17⁄10 trillion,  I  have 
trouble  with  that  number.  One  and  7⁄10
trillion  dollars  on 
healthcare.  By  2014  that  number  is  expected  to  exceed  $31⁄10 tril-
lion.  Clearly  we  need  to  find  ways  to  increase  the  efficiency  of  our 
healthcare system, we are looking at a number of bills, in our Com-
mittee  in  fact,  we’re  working  on  18  bids  for  bills  now  that  will  in-
crease access, increase quality, and hopefully reduce costs. 

We would like to dramatically reduce costs, we may have to set-
tle  for  slightly  reducing  costs,  but  it  would  be  a  huge  thing  if  we 
were just able to control costs. Now if we could manage a quick trip 
into  the  future,  and  pay  a  visit  to  the  doctor’s  office  with  a  health 
information  technology  system  put  in  place,  we  could  see  dramatic 
changes  made  in  the  ability  for  doctors  to  diagnose,  treat  and  pro-
vide  warnings  of  current  and  future  medical  problems.  Somebody 
said  to  me  that  right  now,  if  you  have  surgery  in  a  hospital,  that 
can probably happen faster than getting your records from one hos-
pital  to  another.  When  people  go  into  a  physician’s  waiting  room, 
the first thing they have to do is get a little clipboard and by hand, 
write down all of their medical information. I don’t know how many 
people out there can remember all of the their medical information 
and most of us don’t even know what all of our medical information 
is.  Right  now,  there  are  little  devices  like  this  that  will  plug  into 
any  computer  in  the  world,  and  that  can  hold  your  entire  medical 
record.  When  you  go  to  a  gas  pump  you  can  run  a  little  key  fob 
across  the  pump  and  that  will  access  your  ability  to  get  gasoline, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

pay  for  it,  and  you  can  drive  off.  There  isn’t  any  reason  we 
shouldn’t  we  be  able  to  check  into  a  doctor’s  office  that  same  way; 
and  provide  them  with  all  of  the  information  that  he  needs  to  be 
able  to  take  care  of  us.  One  of  the  things  that  always  worries  me, 
is  that  being  out  here  in  the  East,  what  if  I’m  in  a  car  accident? 
Where do they get my records from? 

Now I’m in a position where it’s a little bit easier to do that, but 
the  average  person  that  is  out  here  visiting  doesn’t  have  any 
records out this way, and my records are partly here and partly in 
Wyoming.  So  how  do  I  know  that  the  emergency  physician  will 
know enough about me to be able to treat the visible thing as well 
as the invisible? And there’s no reason in today’s economy with to-
day’s technology that that doesn’t happen, except there aren’t com-
mon  standards.  So  one  of  the  things  we’ll  be  doing  is  putting  to-
gether some common standards, and as I mentioned we’re working 
with  Secretary  Levitt  and  he  has  developed  an  excellent  program 
through 4 RFPs that works with private sector and I think this will 
happen faster than anyway that we ever put it, just in government 
hands. 

And so we’re on the verge of being able to do a lot of things with 
technology  that  we  never  imagined  before.  I  have  to  mention  a  lit-
tle  invention  in  Wyoming,  there’s  a  doctor  out  there  named  Dr. 
Close.  He’s  Glenn  Close’s  dad,  he  spent  most  of  his  life  in  Africa 
studying  ebola.  But  he  is  retired  now  so  he  is  running  a  family 
practice in Big Piney, Wyoming. And I mean a family practice, this 
guy makes house calls, and he sits with people while they’re dying. 
It’s  a  level  of  care  that  we  haven’t  seen  before,  but  one  of  the 
things he discovered when he was in Africa, and even now, is that 
it  would  be  really  helpful  to  have  a  little  more  confirmation  on  di-
agnosis.  And  he  talked  to  some  programmers  about  it,  and  they 
went to work on it, and there now is a program that fits in a Palm 
Pilot, or a BlackBerry, and the Navy uses it on submarines. So that 
the  medical  technician  that  is  on  the  submarine,  when  he  has 
someone that has a problem can feed in the symptoms that he sees, 
have  a  list  of  questions  that  help  to  narrow  down  what  the  possi-
bilities  are  and  help  to  confirm  a  diagnosis.  Before  they  had  that 
little  program,  the  submarine  had  to  surface,  they  had  to  make 
radio contact with the information, keep asking questions back and 
forth,  so  the  sub  of  course  was  exposed  for  a  while,  but  the  cost 
alone  of  the  bringing  that  sub  to  the  surface  for  the  year  previous 
to getting to the BlackBerries was costing $600,000. Now that isn’t 
necessary because of technology. 

So we haven’t begun to imagine the kinds of things that we’ll be 
able  to  do  through  technology,  and  we  need  to  take  that  first  step 
to  get  it  in  place,  to  build  some  encouragement  through  incentives 
in, and I’m certain that the private sector will run with this, as we 
get things developed. 

So  I  do  appreciate  your  looking  at  this  issue,  finding  out  the 
ways—stimulating people to new ideas, and in the months to come 
we’ll  continue  to  encourage  the  participation  of  the  private  sector. 
They’ve  asked  for,  and  I  believe  they  deserve  a  seat  at  the  table 
when  standards  are  being  done  since  that  is  also  the  area  where 
ideas  will  be  generated.  Suggestions  for  innovation  will  come  forth 
and those will all be invaluable as we do this. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

So  the  bill  that  we  will  be  introducing  later  today,  and  I  want 
to thank virtually all of the Senators I think, for contributing ideas 
to  it.  There  have  been  a  number  of  bills  that  have  been  written, 
this is one of the most exciting areas right now in health and there 
is  a  tremendous  interest.  It  is  time  that  we  did  something  with  it. 
And  we  can  continue  to  make  healthcare  services  more  affordable, 
more  available  and  without  it,  we  run  the  risk  of  having  the  best 
healthcare system in the world with few of us who can take advan-
tage  of  it  through  affordability.  So  I  want  to  work  with  you,  and 
ensure  that  the  healthcare  technology  is  signed  into  law  later  this 
year.  Thanks  for  your  help  on  the  bill  and  your  participation,  and 
for having this hearing today. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thanks Mr. Chairman, Senator Stabenow. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DEBBIE STABENOW, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MICHIGAN 

Senator STABENOW. Good morning, thank you, Mr. Chairman, for 
holding  this  very  important  hearing  on  a  very  exciting  topic.  I 
share Senator Enzi’s enthusiasm and optimism about our ability to 
work  together  and  really  get  something  done,  and  I  would  just  as 
an  aside  indicate  that  I’ve  enjoyed  working  with  Senator  Enzi  on 
a  number  of  projects  through  the  Banking  Committee,  and  know 
that  when  he  is  involved  in  it,  we’re  going  to  be  in  good  shape.  So 
I appreciate the chance to work with you again. 

I  also  want  to  just  put  a  plug  in,  in  terms  of  the  private  sector. 
I  couldn’t  agree  more  that  there  is  an  important  partnership  that 
needs  to  take  place.  We  know  that  in  the  private  sector  invest-
ments have been made in technology; we need to support those in-
vestments  by  providing  Federal  financial  incentives.  Automation 
Alley,  a  technology  consortium  in  southeast  Michigan  and  Detroit, 
is doing exciting work in this area. They are partnering businesses, 
universities, and governments to use health information technology 
to  help  bring  our  healthcare  systems  to  the  point  where  they 
should  be.  And  Senator  Enzi  was  talking  about  a  key  fob.  I  just 
have  to  brag  and  say  the  automobile  I  drove  in  today,  which  is  a 
Cadillac  STS,  does  not  use  a  key,  it  uses  a  fob.  I  leave  it  in  my 
pocket, I get in and out of my car, push a button to start the vehi-
cle.  That  level  of  technology  is  the  kind  of  technology  that  we  can 
bring  to  our  healthcare  system  and  that  is  what  we’re  really  here 
today to talk about. 

I also want to thank my colleague Senator Snowe who is a Mem-
ber  of  the  Full  Committee.  She  and  I  have  been  working  together 
and  have  introduced  health  information  technology  legislation.  I’m 
hopeful  that  we  can,  through  the  leadership  of  everyone  involved, 
bring together all of the legislation and get the best ideas together 
and be able to pass a comprehensive, bold approach that will really 
get  the  job  done.  I’m  very  proud  that  Senator  Snowe  is  working 
with me on this legislation. We have announced a health IT caucus 
that we welcome and invite everyone to be a part of, so we can all 
work  together  on  this  very  important  effort.  The  evidence  showing 
the  ability  of  health  IT  to  reduce  costs,  save  lives,  and  improve 
quality  of  care  is  simply  overwhelming,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  you 
know, and as you indicated in your comments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

I was thinking as you were talking about going from one facility 
to  the  other  of  a  story  that  a  businesswoman  told  me  about  a  cou-
ple of weeks ago. She came in with the Small Business Association, 
we  started  talking  about  health  IT,  and  she  told  the  story  of  her 
son  who  is  disabled,  and  how  she  lives  up  north  in  Michigan,  goes 
down to Ann Arbor to Children’s Hospital, goes to different places. 
She  actually  carries  her  records  with  her.  Stacks,  and  stacks,  be-
cause she is worried that one hospital will not have the full records 
of  the  other  facility,  and  so  she  actually  carries  a  huge  file  with 
her, and we want to help her not have to do that. 

Dr. David Brailer, who is the National Coordinator for Health In-
formation  Technology,  is  speaking  to  the  Committee  this  morning, 
and  has  been  instrumental  in  making  evidence  known  and  under-
stood  about  this  issue.  His  office  attributes  savings  from  wide-
spread adoption of electric health records in the range of seven and 
half  percent  to  thirty  percent  in  annual  healthcare  spending. 
Which  is  amazing.  It  just  is  amazing.  Given  that  U.S.  health  ex-
penditures  amounting  to  $1.8  trillion  in  2004,  we’re  talking  about 
savings anywhere from $135 billion to $540 billion a year, and even 
here  that  is  real  money.  And  so  this  is  why  this  is  so  important. 
Manufacturers in Michigan and across the country are struggling 
right  now  to  remain  competitive  in  a  global  marketplace  with  sky-
rocketing  healthcare  costs,  and  we  know  that  health  IT  can,  and 
should,  play  a  key  role  in  managing  these  costs,  as  well  as  our 
costs  at  the  Federal  Government  level  and  for  every  family  and 
every  business.  We  really  can  reduce  costs  without  asking 
healthcare  providers,  or  patients,  to  take  less.  We  really  can,  by 
this  strategy.  That  would  be  reason  enough  for  an  aggressive  Fed-
eral role in promoting adoption of health IT. 

But  equally  compelling  is  the  promise  that  health  IT  holds  for 
improving  the  quality  of  healthcare  for  our  families,  by  ensuring 
that  patients  get  the  care  they  need  at  the  right  time  and  in  the 
best setting. To realize these promises however, I believe Congress 
must  enact  legislation  providing  meaningful  resources  to  physi-
cians,  hospitals  and  other  healthcare  providers  for  health  informa-
tion technology, as well as setting standards. 

Healthcare  providers  are  struggling  to  keep  up  with  their  daily 
needs.  A  major  barrier  to  the  use  of  the  types  of  systems  you  will 
hear  about  today  is  the  initial  investment  cost.  The  cost  of  pro-
curing  and  implementing  health  IT  can  be  staggering.  Every  day 
we delay providing Federal seed money, we delay getting health in-
formation  technology  systems  in  place,  and  businesses,  taxpayers, 
and patients pay in both dollars and lives. 

But for the Federal investment to really make a difference, there 
are several elements that are critical, and these are included in the 
legislation we’ve introduced. First of all we must do something sub-
stantial.  We  have  over  470,000  physicians,  14,000  nursing  homes, 
about 5,700 hospitals, over 1,200 community mental health centers, 
and  over  1,000  community  centers  all  of  whom  need  to  have  this 
technology.  We  need  a  robust  investment  immediately  so  we  can 
start reaping the benefits and rewards immediately. 

I also believe it needs to be real, whatever we do. We frequently 
pass great pieces of legislation that are funded through an author-
ization of appropriations from the General Fund. But the appropri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

ators  are  hard  pressed  to  fund  existing  programs,  much  less  new 
initiatives,  no  matter  how  compelling.  And  so  I  hope  our  strategy 
will  be  to  identify  a  source,  and  again  in  our  legislation  we  have 
done that. 

We  will  spend  substantially  less  Federal  healthcare  dollars  if 
health  IT  is  used  by  providers  serving  patients  in  Federal  health 
programs. So it makes sense to finance health IT through the Fed-
eral  Healthcare  Trust  Funds.  It  also  makes  sense  to  use  the  tax 
code to fast track the potential IT systems. 

I also believe it needs to be available to individual providers and 

healthcare systems. 

Again,  it’s  critical  we  have  standards.  But  at  a  time  when  we’re 
asking  providers  to  take  less,  it’s  very  difficult  to  also  ask  them 
independently  to  make  investments  of  the  kind  that  we’re  talking 
about  to  be  able  to  adopt  health  IT  systems.  We  should  work  to-
ward  a  system  where  all  healthcare  providers  are  linked,  but  we 
do not need to wait for those networks to be formed to see the ben-
efits  of  health  IT  either.  Some  hospitals  and  other  providers  have 
already  begun  using  electronic  health  records,  computerized  drug 
ordering  systems,  and  systems  that  alert  them  to  adverse  drug 
problems. 

The  benefits  of  these  systems  have  been  enormous  already.  I 
talked with one system with seven facilities who saved $18 million 
in  drug  costs  alone.  So  even  before  we  get  them  connected,  if  we 
can get them involved and investing in health IT we will see dollar 
savings.  There  is  no  reason  to  delay  a  community’s  opportunity  to 
benefit from the quality, the safety, and the financial savings of im-
mediate  health  IT  adoption  by  its  local  providers  even  as  we  are 
putting together the larger systems. 

I  know  that  you’ll  hear  this  morning  about  the  importance  of 
interoperability.  It  is  absolutely  critical  for  healthcare  providers  to 
be  able  to  talk  to  each  other  electronically.  And  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment  has  a  role  to  play  here  as  well  in  promoting  the  adoption 
and  use  of  open  standards.  But  it  is  not  enough  for  the  Federal 
Government  to  help  develop  standards,  as  I  indicated  I  hope  that 
we  can  be  a  part  of  the  solution  that  will  allow  agencies  to  walk 
the  walk,  as  well  as  talk  the  talk.  The  Federal  Government  must 
allow  healthcare  providers  to  submit  data  using  open  standards. 
Allowing  data  submission  in  a  way  that  allows  computer  systems 
to  talk  to  each  other—so  the  information  can  be  processed  auto-
matically and quickly—will result in better care for patients. 

CMS  requires  Medicare  providers  to  submit  measures  on 
healthcare, but we haven’t begun to get the full benefits from that 
data because providers aren’t allowed to submit the data using the 
open standards that exist. 

Use  of  uniform  standards  and  reporting  of  quality  measures  is 
essential. And I believe, while essential though, it is not sufficient. 
Standards  and  organizational  efforts  alone  won’t  get  our  providers 
where  they  need  to  be.  This  is  especially  true  for  those  who  serve 
Medicare  and  Medicaid  patients  and  SCHIP  patients.  A  real  Fed-
eral  financial  commitment  is  essential  as  well.  And  I  think  rarely 
has anything been this unambiguous: Federal investment in health 
information technology will come back to us many times over in re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

ducing  Medicare,  Medicaid,  and  SCHIP  spending,  reduced  medical 
errors, and greater quality and efficiency in our healthcare system. 
So  Mr.  Chairman,  you’re  on  the  right  track,  and  I  congratulate 
you  very  much  for  your  leadership,  the  leadership  of  everyone  in-
volved,  the  leadership  of  Chairman  Enzi,  and  I  look  forward  to 
working  with  you,  and  with  all  of  our  colleagues  because  I  really 
believe that we have the opportunity to get this right and to make 
a major, major step forward in reducing costs and saving lives, and 
I can’t think of anything more important. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  I  want  to  thank  both  of  you  for  your  excellent 
testimony.  Health  information  technology  is  one  of  the  more  excit-
ing  issues  we’ve  come  across  in  a  long  time.  This  issue  is  exciting 
because  it’s  really  not  an  ideological  issue.  There  is  no  reason  for 
health  information  technology  to  be  a  partisan  issue,  and  I’m  ex-
cited  about  that  aspect  of  the  topic  as  well.  We’ve  all  had  experi-
ences  with  the  healthcare  system.  I  received  a  call  from  my  wife 
last  night.  She  was  at  a  pharmacy  and  didn’t  have  her  health  in-
surance  card  with  her.  Electronic  health  records  would  be  helpful 
in  these  types  of  situations.  Electronic  health  records  would  help 
manage  this  type  of  information  and  keep  track  of  prescription 
medications. 

Since the Ranking Member has just arrived, I would like to open 
it up to him for an opening statement, and then I will turn to Sen-
ator Allen. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Chairman, thank you Senator Allen. I apolo-
gize  for  being  late,  I  apologize  to  my  colleagues.  Thank  you  Mr. 
Chairman  for  holding  this  hearing,  this  is—I  heard  you  just  as  I 
came  in,  talking  about  how  this  is  not  a  partisan  issue,  it’s  obvi-
ously bipartisan. But what disturbs me is that despite how obvious 
the  benefits  are,  we  don’t  have  the  political  will  evidently,  or  the 
determination  to  put  the  real  funding  which  is  what  is  so  critical 
for our hospitals and health centers, clinics, et cetera to be able to 
invest.  If  you’re  struggling  to  pay  your  Medicare  match,  or  you’re 
struggling  to  pay  your  Medicaid  match,  and  hospitals  are  already 
digging  into  their  reserves,  which  they  are,  it’s  very  hard  to  cap-
italize  and  it  takes  a  major  capitalization  to  be  able  to  go  out  and 
put  together  the  technology  structure  necessary  to  do  this.  I  don’t 
know  who  among  us,  I  mean  for  the  2  years  I  spent  crisscrossing 
the  country,  talking  to  people  all  over  the  country,  people  get  it. 
They just get it. They’re thirsty for this, it costs you one penny, to 
go to an ATM and take whatever amount of money out of the bank 
and  have  a  transaction.  But  if  you  go  to  a  hospital,  it  costs  you 
somewhere  between  $15  to  $25  per  transaction  to  pull  a  medical 
record, it’s absurd. 

Who among us has not gone to a doctor’s office in the year 2005, 
or before that, had the assistant hand you a clipboard with a pencil 
attached.  Please  fill  out  your  record.  How  many  times  have  we 
filled  it  out?  I  mean  you  could  walk  in  with  a  Smart  Card,  hand 
it  to  them,  plunk,  they  could  put  it  in,  update  and  you  could  walk 
out with your records with full security today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

There’s  an  unbelievable  amount  of  money  that  could  be  saved. 
President Bush has allocated $150 million total for the Office of the 
National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology,  which  is 
going to do little more than pay lip service. Frankly, we’ve got hos-
pitals in Boston, one of them is going to testify. I think individually 
they  spend  more  in  that  one  hospital.  You’re  talking  about  a  na-
tionwide  system.  It’s  a  joke.  We  don’t  have  our  priorities  straight. 
Our priority in Washington is to have a great big tax cut for peo-
ple earning more than a million dollars a year, it’s $32 billion next 
year, is it going to go to people earning more than a million dollars 
a  year?  And  the  hospitals  I  promise  you  will  be  struggling  and 
they’ll  be  back  here  saying  why  can’t  we  get  more  funding  to  be 
able to save money. 

The  fact  is  that  out  of  the  44,000  to  98,000  deaths  that  were  at-
tributed to medical errors annually, that’s a big figure, almost more 
people  died  than  died  in  the  10  years  of  the  Vietnam  War  due  to 
medical  error,  and  more  than  7,000  of  them  are  due  to  medication 
errors alone. One million serious medication errors occur each year 
due to drug overdoses which comes from the wrong drug, illegibility 
of  doctor’s  orders,  and  drug  allergies  and  so  forth.  These  errors 
translate  into  $2,000  in  additional  hospital  costs  per  patient;  two 
billion  dollars  annually  for  the  healthcare  system  as  a  whole.  In 
1998,  Boston  Brigham  and  Women’s  Hospital  was  one  of  the  first 
in the country to implement an electronic prescribing system called 
‘‘Computer Physicians Order Entry’’ and that has the ability to sig-
nificantly  reduce  medication  errors  which  in  turn  will  reduce  the 
hospitalizations that take place among seniors. One of the largest— 
the  largest  percentage  of  unnecessary  hospitalizations  come  as  a 
result of medications taken badly and wrongly. Brigham and Wom-
en’s  spent  $1.9  million  on  the  initial  installation  and  about 
$500,000  annually  for  upgrades.  The  financial  return  on  its  initial 
investment has been $5 million, and $10 million in annual savings. 
So  let’s  understand  that,  $1.9  million  invested,  $5  million  to  $10 
million in annual savings as a result. 

So we can do an extraordinary amount, Mr. Chairman, if we can 
really get the willpower to go out and do it. We’ve got to zero sum 
gain  budget,  we  all  know  what  we’re  fighting  about  right  now.  We 
had  to  adjust  a  billion  dollars  for  Veterans  yesterday,  this  is  a 
struggle. And I really think it is critical to us, to try to get our pri-
orities straight. I’m working with Senator Cornyn on a bill that we 
hopefully could introduce. I would like to get the Chairman, and we 
could  all  work  together  to  try  to  do  this.  But  it  seems  to  me  that 
there’s a great opportunity for us to be able to modernize America, 
save  lives,  save  money,  and  frankly  do  a  terrific  job  of  helping  a 
number of industries create jobs at the same time, and be far more 
efficient and effective. So thank you, Mr. Chairman, for doing this. 
And I look forward to working with you. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. Senator Allen. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you Mr. Chairman, for holding this hear-
ing. I thank our two witnesses, and I share the comments that they 
will  make.  I  will  be  questioning  witnesses  and  our  panel  as  we  go 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

from 

to  video, 

forward, so I’ll forgo a full blown opening statement, other than to 
say that you, Mr. Chairman, and I have worked over the years to-
gether.  We  want  this  country  to  be  the  most  technologically  ad-
vanced in the world, and we need to be embracing the advances in 
technology.  Everything 
to 
broadband, and clearly here in healthcare. 

communications 

I think this is the most pressing achievable improvement that we 
can  make  in  our  healthcare  system.  There  will  be  more  accurate 
treatment  for  medical  injuries  or  illness.  It  will  save  money,  and 
more  importantly  I  think  that  the  whole  issue  of  our  very  mobile 
society,  that  no  matter  where  you  are,  or  when  you’re  injured  you 
have that accurate approach. I was listening to Senator Kerry, and 
for most of—clearly, the first part of his remarks I would say great, 
Senator  Kerry  and  I  are  together  on  something.  And  this  is  a  bi-
partisan effort. We need not, I would say to my friend—my friends 
here,  that  we  need  not  get  into  tax  cuts,  we’re  not  going  to  raise 
taxes. 

But what we do need to do is find out the proper incentives, the 
proper  funding  and  to  me  this  should  be  a  national  priority.  And 
I thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing so that we can 
focus  on  it,  hear  from  our  colleagues.  I’ve  signed  on  as  a  sponsor 
on  Senator  Enzi’s  bill.  But  also  listen  to  the  innovators,  the  tech-
nologists,  as  to  how  we  can  best  do  this,  whether  encouragement, 
incentives, grants and so forth, to do it right. 

I would just ask this question of Senator Enzi, what did you call 

this thing you have hanging around your neck? 

Senator ENZI. I call it a fob, but it is a jump drive. 
Senator  ALLEN.  That’s  all  fine  and  dandy.  I’m  not  going  to  go 
around carrying something around my neck. And the point of—but 
it  is  wonderful,  and  here’s  my  question  to  you.  This  is  actually 
leading up to a friendly question. 

Senator ENSIGN. I think it looks good on him. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  ALLEN.  I  don’t  see  you  wearing  one,  if  you  think  it’s  so 

stylish. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  ALLEN.  At  any  rate,  the  one  key  thing  we  need  to  do 
right here, in addition to determining what are the right incentives 
to  achieve  this  very  important  laudatory  goal  for  accurate,  better 
healthcare treatment is to make sure, and you used the term com-
mon  standards.  What  we  develop  here  in  this  bipartisan  manner 
should  be  a  standard  that  clearly  allows  interoperability.  There 
may  be  some  who  don’t  want  to  do  that,  or  maybe  a  few  years 
down  the  road,  there  may  be  a  way.  Just  like  we  do  with  driver’s 
licenses,  you  just  put  a  heart  on  it  in  Virginia  if  you  want  to  be 
an organ donor, not making people write something on the back of 
it, and have witnesses all the rest. 

Maybe  there’s  a  way,  that  especially  with  nanotechnology,  and 
micro-electronics advances, that there’s a chip that could be put on 
a  driver’s  license  or  something  smaller.  But  then  of  course  that’s 
going  to  have  to  interact  with  whatever  the  hospital  or  the  physi-
cian’s office, or the pharmacist has. So in your definition of common 
standards, how do you envision that being put into effect as a prac-
tical matter? Because the one thing that I’ve learned over the years 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

is  you  can  waste  more  money,  more  quickly  on  technology  than 
anything  else  because  there  are  always  adaptations,  always  im-
provements with new innovations. We do not want to be setting up 
a  system  that  stops  technological  advances  and  innovations  be-
cause  we  have  set  a  standard  that  picks  just  one  type  of  tech-
nology.  But  we  also  ought  to  make  sure  that  if  there  are  improve-
ments  that  they  will  work  within  the  system.  How  would  you  re-
spond to that concern with your legislation? 

Senator ENZI. I would respond that that is why the authorization 
amount in the President’s or the budget amount was $125 million. 
We don’t want to get the cart before the horse. Right now we don’t 
have  the  interoperability  of  systems,  we  don’t  have  standards  for 
the  data  that  is  to  be  collected  so  that  it  can  be  shared  easily.  I 
grew up during the computer generation when I went to college the 
government  was  the  only  one  virtually  that  owned  computers  and 
we had to do punch cards and doing the very simple program that 
any child could do in first grade now in about  1⁄2 hour, would take 
us  about  3  days.  But  the  computers  have  advanced  dramatically, 
they’ve  gotten  smaller,  I  remember  in  1980  they  said  that  there 
would be a computer—there would be the equivalent of a computer 
in every home, by the year 2000. 

By 1990, there was the equivalent of one computer for every per-
son in the United States already. And I don’t know what it’s up to 
now,  because  everybody  has  more  than  one.  But  the  reason  that 
came about was because we had some common standards for oper-
ating systems now, that didn’t happen in the beginning there were 
about  a  half  a  dozen  operating  systems  out  there  that  worked  at 
cross  purposes  partly  to  capture  part  of  the  market.  And  through 
the  private  enterprise  system  one  of  them  did  capture  the  market. 
But there’s no reason we have to go through that kind of a process. 
We  can  get  everybody  to  a  faster  starting  place  by  having  stand-
ards,  putting  them  in  place  and  then  the  market  will  be  able  to 
generate  the  revenues  that  are  needed.  One  hospital  that  spent— 
I can’t remember how many hundred—more than a $150 million al-
ready, one of the problems we have is we have a start to a law that 
prohibits  the  interaction  between  doctors  and  hospitals.  And  part 
of  the  bill  takes  care  of  that  problem,  so  that  in  providing  equip-
ment  and  information  they  can  have  the  interoperability  without 
that, it doesn’t work. 

There  are  a  number  of  stages  we  have  to  go  through  to  get  to 
the point where there can be significant money put into the system, 
and  there  will  be  significant  private  money  put  into  it  as  we  go 
along.  We’re  also  trying  to  come  up  with  a  mechanism  where  the 
government  can  participate  to  be  able  to  leverage  private  dollars. 
And that’s the way that most of the economy has grown in the past 
and we want to make sure that that can in the future. 

Senator STABENOW. Mr. Chairman, if I might also just add, I to-
tally share Senator Enzi’s comments in terms of standards. I would 
just  urge  that  while  we  are  doing  that  which  is  critical,  that  we’re 
also  supporting  the  efforts  to  get  the  individual  technology  into 
hospitals  and  doctors  offices.  Because  right  now  what  we  have  is 
a  system  where  providers  are  being  cut  back  in  terms  of  Medicaid 
and  Medicare  and  so  on,  and  it’s  virtually  impossible  for  them  to 
be making that initial investment. So by using the tax code we can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

allow  a  faster  depreciation  schedule,  and  thus  provide  a  financial 
incentive  for  health  IT  adoption.  We  can  create  grants  to  be  able 
to  help  our  public  hospitals  and  nursing  homes,  and  ensure  they 
are  able  to  get  the  technology  they  need.  I  hope  we’re  doing  both 
at the same time. Because even using independent systems we can 
save  lives  right  now,  just  by  doing  all  that  we  have  talked  about 
this morning. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you both. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  Senator  Kerry,  would  you  like  to  add  a  com-

ment? 

Senator  KERRY.  I  just  wanted  to  comment  that  I  hope  we  can 
somehow  get  beyond  this  discussion.  Senator  Stabenow  is  abso-
lutely correct, and Senator Allen I appreciate the mutuality of sup-
port  in  the  early  part,  but  there’s  a  point  where  you  and  others 
have got to kind of confront the reality of language. Where you say 
on  the  one  hand  this  is  a  national  priority,  and  then  you  say,  but 
we  shouldn’t  raise  taxes.  Nobody’s  talking  about  raising  taxes. 
We’re talking about whether we should give a tax cut. 

Senator ENSIGN. Senator Kerry, let’s stay away from this debate. 
Hold  on  just  a  second.  This  debate  can  occur  another  day,  and  I 
want  to  get  to  the  next  panel.  I  want  to  run  this  hearing  so  that 
we  hear  from  the  experts.  We  started  this  hearing  in  a  bipartisan 
fashion and I want to keep it that way. I don’t want to get into the 
discussion of tax cuts—let’s save that for another day. I appreciate 
both of the witnesses here today. Thank you both for your excellent 
testimony. I would now like to call the next panel to the table. Dr. 
David  Brailer,  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Tech-
nology, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services; Dr. Caro-
lyn  Clancy,  Director,  Agency  for  Healthcare  Research  and  Quality; 
Dr.  Hratch  G.  Semerjian,  Acting  Director,  National  Institute  of 
Standards  and  Technology;  Dr.  Robert  M.  Kolodner,  Acting  Chief 
Health  Informatics  Officer,  Veterans  Health  Administration,  and 
Acting Deputy Chief Information Officer for the Department of Vet-
erans Affairs. 

We  welcome  all  of  you.  We  will  start  from  my  left  and  go  down 
the  panel.  I  would  appreciate  it  if  you  could  summarize  your  re-
marks in 5 or 6 minutes so that there’s plenty of time for questions 
and answers. This will allow us to have a good discussion. Your full 
statements  will  be  made  part  of  the  record.  Again,  if  you  could 
please  summarize  your  testimony  in  about  5  minutes,  we’d  very 
much  appreciate  it,  so  that  we  can  have  the  maximum  amount  of 
time for questions and answers. 

Dr. Clancy. 

STATEMENT  OF  CAROLYN  M.  CLANCY,  M.D.,  DIRECTOR, 
AGENCY  FOR  HEALTHCARE  RESEARCH  AND  QUALITY, 
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 
Dr. CLANCY. Chairman Ensign, Senator and members of the Sub-
committee, I am delighted to join Dr. Brailer in outlining the ways 
in which the Department of Health and Human Services is advanc-
ing the adoption, implementation, and effective use of health infor-
mation technology. 

You  asked  us  to  address  how  health  IT  can  achieve  three  objec-
tives:  reducing  medical  errors,  improving  the  quality  of  patient 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

care,  and  reducing  the  cost  of  healthcare.  Our  AHRQ  investment 
will  help  the  Nation  meet  all  three  of  these  objectives.  The  trans-
formation  into  a  healthcare  system  that  provides  high  quality 
healthcare  reliably  that  meets  patients  needs  will  not  happen  just 
because  of  health  IT,  but  it  is  impossible  to  imagine  that  that 
transformation can take place without it. 

For  nearly  three  decades,  AHRQ  has  funded  the  basic  science  of 
health  IT  by  supporting  the  pioneers  and  innovators.  Many  of  the 
Nation’s leading health IT systems were founded on research fund-
ed  by  AHRQ,  and  our  task  now  is  to  spread  that  knowledge  and 
experience  that  we  have  gained  more  broadly;  throughout  the 
healthcare  system  and  we  also  need  to  support  research  targeted 
to fill critical gaps in our knowledge. 

In  Fiscal  Year  2004  AHRQ  announced  an  investment  of  $139 
million over 5 years to achieve these goals. This national initiative 
is now supporting 108 grants and contracts in 43 states, with over 
half  of  the  projects  based  in  rural  and  small  hospitals  and  clinics. 
All told this investment will affect more than 40 million Americans. 
Our efforts are detailed extensively in the written testimony, but 
I  wanted  to  provide  a  few  highlights  right  now.  Reducing  medica-
tion errors is one area where health IT offers the greatest and im-
mediate  potential  to  improve  patient  safety.  In  some  ways,  its  po-
tential  value  is  self  evident  in  reducing  handwriting  errors,  cross 
checking prescribing errors, and identifying dangerous interactions 
with  other  medications  before  they  occur.  AHRQ  supported  the 
groundbreaking  work  of  David  Bates  and  others,  that  dem-
onstrated  a  55  percent  reduction  in  serious  medication  errors  with 
computerized order entry systems in hospitals. 

In  anticipation  of  the  Medicare  drug  benefit,  we’re  now  sup-
porting  work  on  electronic  prescribing,  and  in-office  practices. 
Many physicians now refer to their handheld devices for electronic 
prescribing  as  their  peripheral  brain.  And  so  we  find  that  they’re 
as  important  to  them  as  stethoscopes.  Health  IT  can  also  greatly 
improve  the  over  all  quality  of  patient  care  by  making  the  right 
thing the easy thing to do. As a doctor, when I see a patient who’s 
coughing and has a fever, I can now use a AHRQ-funded electronic 
tool  to  help  me  decide  whether  that  patient  needs  to  be  hospital-
ized. I used to have to go look up that information and then make 
a treatment decision. 

A hallmark of our efforts are initiatives that move health IT into 
settings  where  traditionally  it  has  not  been  available.  These  in-
clude  nursing  homes,  pharmacies,  waiting  rooms,  schools,  and  pa-
tient’s  homes.  For  example,  a  recent  effort  to  reduce  bed  sores  in 
nursing  homes  was  so  successful,  that  a  large  chain  of  nursing 
homes  has  adopted  the  idea  and  will  be  spreading  it  across  the 
country.  The  potential  for  cost  savings  from  the  systematic  use  of 
health IT results from removing inefficiencies, improving physician 
decisionmaking,  enhancing  communication,  and  reducing  the  need 
for  follow-up  care  due  to  medical  errors,  or  use  of  inappropriate 
services. 

An  AHRQ-supported  survey  found  that  approximately  one  third 
of Americans report that they have to go back for a second visit be-
cause their provider didn’t have their medical information available 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

at  the  first  visit,  waste  that  could  be  diminished  through  shared 
electronic health records. 

Our  research  has  also  demonstrated  that  computerized  remind-
ers can reduce hospital charges per admission by approximately 13 
percent.  With  your  support  we’ll  continue  our  efforts  to  provide 
sound evidence on the financial benefits of health IT. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  can’t  overemphasize  how  essential  practical 
technical  assistance  is  to  the  successful  adoption  and  implementa-
tion of health IT. We’ve created the AHRQ National Resource Cen-
ter  for  Health  Information  Technology,  the  largest  single  commit-
ment  to  technical  assistance  in  AHRQ  history.  The  Resource  Cen-
ter  leverages  our  investments  in  health  IT  by  offering  help  where 
it is needed in real world clinical settings that may be ill-equipped 
to meet the health IT challenge. 

The Resource Center will do this by facilitating expert and peer- 
to-peer  collaborative  learning,  and  fostering  the  growth  of  online 
communities  that  are  planning,  implementing  and  researching 
technology.  One  of  our  grantees  has  reported  to  us  that  the  pro-
vider transition to HIT is one part technical and two parts culture, 
and  work  process  change.  Designed  initially  to  bring  together  our 
grantees,  we  recently  announced  that  the  Resource  Center’s  web 
portal  will  now  be  open  to  all  of  the  Nation’s  community  health 
centers, and we also plan to make it available to providers involved 
in the state-based QIO program, to expand the use of health IT in 
small practice settings. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  conclude  by  offering  a  few  brief 

observations, based upon our work in health IT. 

First,  health  IT  alone  cannot  provide  the  improvements  needed 
in  our  healthcare  system.  These  improvements  will  depend  upon 
the  integration  of  high  quality  health  IT  into  a  variety  of  settings, 
individual clinical practices, hospitals and other settings. 

Second,  for  most  healthcare  settings,  health  IT  is  not  an  out-of- 
the-box solution. Effective use of health IT begins with a careful ex-
amination  of  the  healthcare  setting  and  then  deploys  the  power  of 
health IT to enhance its effectiveness and efficiency. It’s important 
to  remember  that  health  IT  applications  need  to  serve  clinicians 
and  patients,  not  the  other  way  around.  AHRQ’s  initiative  is  help-
ing ensure that user-friendly health IT will achieve its full promise 
in the clinical setting. 

Third,  the  financial  exposure  for  providers,  when  added  to  con-
cerns about doing it right, increases the overall risk of investing in 
health IT. In order to accelerate the pace of health IT adoption and 
implementation,  we  must  ensure  that  best  practices,  and  new 
knowledge  and  experience  are  disseminated  widely  in  order  to 
maximize  the  potential  for  quality  improvement  as  well  as  reduce 
economic risk. 

We look forward to continuing to work with Secretary Levitt, Dr. 
Brailer  and  our  other  partners  to  make  healthcare  better  for  all 
Americans through health IT. 

Thanks for the opportunity to share my thoughts and I would be 

delighted to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Clancy follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CAROLYN M.  CLANCY,  M.D.,  DIRECTOR,  AGENCY FOR 
HEALTHCARE RESEARCH AND QUALITY,  DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN 
SERVICES 
Chairman  Ensign  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  delighted  to  join  Dr. 
Brailer in outlining the ways in which the Department of Health and Human Serv-
ices  (HHS)  is  advancing  the  adoption,  implementation,  and  effective  use  of  health 
information technology (IT). 

Achieving the President’s goal of widespread use of interoperable electronic health 
records  requires  us  to  address  a  number  of  complex  and  technical  issues,  many  of 
which are being addressed at the Department level. My testimony will focus on how 
the  activities  of  the  Agency  for  Healthcare  Research  and  Quality  (AHRQ)  com-
plement  the  Department’s  efforts  by  harnessing  the  power  of  IT  to  improve  the  ef-
fectiveness, efficiency, quality, and safety of health care. 

While we work with the various divisions of HHS to ensure that the fundamental 
IT  infrastructure  is  in  place,  we  are  critically  examining  how  these  IT  tools  can  be 
used  in  real-world  health  care  settings  to  make  care  better.  For  many  health  care 
providers  the  need  to  address  specific  local  threats  to  the  safety  and  quality  of  pa-
tient  care  is  immediate;  an  increasing  number  of  practitioners  and  organizations 
have  made  or  will  soon  make  investments  in  health  IT.  To  enable  them  to  make 
informed  investment  decisions,  AHRQ’s  program  and  research  activities  support 
evaluation  of  the  impact  of  selected  health  IT  applications  on  quality,  safety  and 
cost.  We  also  have  recognized  the  need  for  a  strong  emphasis  on  the  needs  of  pro-
viders  who  care  for  rural  and  underserved  populations.  That  is  why  we  have  made 
awards  to  local  and  regional  organizations  that  affect  the  care  received  by  more 
than 40 million Americans. 

Leaders  in  health  care  recognize  that  improvement  requires  both  incentives  and 
the  capacity  to  respond  to  those  incentives.  Our  focus  is  on  building  the  capacity 
within  healthcare  settings—large  and  small,  urban  and  rural  (including  frontier 
areas)—for effective use of health IT, and disseminating findings rapidly. The bene-
fits  of  health  IT  need  to  begin  now  for  as  many  Americans  as  possible.  The  results 
of these investments represent tangible benefits that will be accelerated as the pri-
vate-public collaboration to facilitate a nationwide information infrastructure devel-
ops. 

We  are  also  addressing  a  critical  stumbling  block  to  the  widespread  adoption  of 
health  IT,  the  human  dimension  of  the  use  of  IT,  which  focuses  on  the  intersection 
between  IT  and  the  health  care  providers  who  need  to  use  it.  Unlike  the  baseball 
field  in  the  movie  Field  of  Dreams,  we  have  dramatic  examples  of  the  building  of 
health  IT  systems,  whose  designers  found  physicians  and  other  clinicians  neither 
came  nor  played.  Unless  we  address  these  issues  as  well  as  technical  ones,  we  risk 
falling far short of a safer, higher quality health care system. 
The Importance of Health IT 

When  we  look  at  the  challenges  facing  our  healthcare  system  in  the  years  and 
decades  ahead,  there  is  no  job  more  important  than  getting  health  IT  into  place, 
and  getting  it  right.  As  the  Institute  of  Medicine  noted  in  their  second  report  on 
patient  safety,  Americans  should  be  able  to  count  on  receiving  health  care  that  is 
safe.  This  requires,  first,  a  commitment  by  all  stakeholders  to  a  culture  of  safety, 
and  second,  to  improved  information  systems.  While  transformation  of  our  heath 
care  system—with  higher  quality,  patient-centric  and  cost-effective  care—will  not 
happen  simply  as  a  result  of  health  IT,  it  is  difficult  to  think  how  transformation 
could  possibly  take  place  without  the  capacities  it  brings.  We  have  a  fundamental 
problem of fractured healthcare delivery that results in needless waste of resources. 
Health IT can bind this system together, even as it preserves its diversity. 

Think  for  a  moment  about  what  is  happening  in  health  care  settings  around  the 
country.  Millions  of  decisions  are  being  made  about  people’s  lives  without  the  right 
information in hand: 

—Is  chemotherapy  the  best  treatment  for  a  patient  with  breast  cancer,  or 
should she be treated with radiation and chemotherapy? 
—Which  of  our  young  athletes  should  be  screened  and  with  what  type  of  diag-
nostic  test  for  heart  abnormalities,  as  a  front-page  story  in  The  Wall  Street 
Journal asked last week? 
—How  does  a  person  with  diabetes,  high  blood  pressure,  and  obesity  manage 
all the different demands of their conditions? 

Patients  and  consumers  struggle  with  even  more  basic  decisions:  Which  provider 

to see? When to seek care? Which treatment option is best for their needs? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

Many  of  these  decisions  are  difficult  even  in  the  most  ideal  circumstances,  when 
there  is  sufficient  time  to  assess  good,  reliable  information.  But  as  we  all  know, 
these  decisions  frequently  must  be  made  at  times  and  places  where  information  is 
not  available,  and  time  is  of  the  essence.  The  power  of  IT  can  help  us  to  regularly 
assess  quality  and  outcomes  while  bringing  us  reliable  data  that  can  be  accessed 
at the point-of-care. 

For  nearly  three  decades,  AHRQ  and  the  National  Library  of  Medicine  (NLM)  at 
the National Institutes of Health have funded the basic science of health IT, devel-
oped  and  tested  tools  to  facilitate  its  use,  and  supported  the  work  of  innovators. 
Many  of  the  leading  systems  of  our  Nation  were  created  on  the  backbone  of  AHRQ 
and  NLM  grants  over  the  last  three  decades.  Two  prominent  examples  are  Inter-
mountain Healthcare in Utah and the Regenstrief system in Indiana, which are now 
models  for  the  effective  use  of  health  IT.  The  task  we  have  now  embarked  upon  is 
to  move  that  knowledge  and  experience  into  the  health  care  system  more  broadly 
and to support targeted research to fill the gaps in our knowledge base that are crit-
ical to widespread diffusion of health IT. Successful implementation of health IT in 
turn  provides  the  best  possible  platform  for  delivering  scientific  evidence  to  clini-
cians and patients when decisions are made. 
AHRQ’s Current Health IT Activities 

In FY 2004, AHRQ awarded 108 grants and contracts to find solutions for a num-
ber of gaps in our knowledge and to advance the use of health IT. Reflecting a com-
mitment of $139 million over 5 years, these awards were truly nationwide in scope. 
They spanned 43 states, with over half of the projects based in rural and small hos-
pitals  and  clinics.  In  combination,  these  community-based  health  care  institutions 
provide health care to more than 40 million Americans. 

Mr.  Chairman,  in  announcing  this  hearing  you  asked  how  health  IT  can  further 
three objectives: reducing medical errors, improving the quality of patient care, and 
reducing  the  cost  of  health  care.  AHRQ’s  research  activities  are  making  significant 
advances in meeting all three of these objectives. 
Reducing Medical Errors 

Medication  errors  are  a  grave  threat  to  patient  safety  and  present  one  of  the 
greatest  opportunities  for  reducing  medical  errors.  The  potential  value  of  health  IT 
here  seems  intuitively  obvious:  reducing  handwriting  and  other  communication  er-
rors, electronic cross-checks for errors in medication strength, identification of inter-
actions with other medications or other adverse events reflecting the patient’s over-
all  medical  condition.  Our  projects  span  the  spectrum  from  prevention  to  detection 
and  prompt  treatment  of  medication  errors,  and  identify  the  most  effective  ways  to 
use health IT to achieve each of these goals. 

Our  first  priority  is  to  prevent  medication  errors  from  ever  occurring.  In  a  series 
of  studies,  we  are  finding  that  electronic  prescribing  with  decision  support  using 
personal digital assistants (PDAs) reduces illegibility, omissions, and the overall in-
cidence  of  prescribing  errors.  However,  we  also  discovered  some  of  the  barriers  to 
PDA adoption, including the interface and its interoperability with existing systems. 
We have developed tools to assist practices in assessing their readiness and design-
ing their workflow to accommodate the use of tools like PDAs. 

Patients,  especially  patients  with  chronic  illnesses,  can  play  an  important  role  in 
preventing  medication  errors.  Some  of  our  projects  are  developing  Internet-based 
portals  to  enable  patients  to  manage  their  own  care,  including  medications.  In  the 
course of deploying this technology, we are learning valuable lessons about how pa-
tients  want  to  participate.  Patients  are  very  enthusiastic  about  documenting  their 
medications,  giving  their  clinicians  new  insights  about  medication  compliance,  as 
well  as  other  supplements  the  patients  may  be  taking  on  their  own  initiative.  An 
unexpected  side  benefit  from  the  move  to  an  Internet-based  system  was  that  the 
children  of  elderly  patients  who  are  living  in  a  different  state  were  able  to  assist 
in  their  parents’  care  in  a  new  and  engaged  manner,  when  parents  authorized  ac-
cess by their children. 

Recognizing  that  medication  errors  can  still  occur  even  when  health  care  pro-
viders are vigilant, a team at Duke University is attempting to minimize the poten-
tial for serious patient harm. They are testing a monitoring system for hospital pa-
tients that will detect the onset of an adverse drug effect, immediately alert the hos-
pital  staff,  and  suggest  the  most  appropriate  intervention.  AHRQ  is  also  funding 
systems for the voluntary reporting of errors. 

In  short,  health  IT  is  a  critical  element  in  our  efforts  to  improve  patient  safety 
but it is not the complete answer. The Administration continues to support passage 
of patient safety legislation, which will provide the confidentiality and privilege pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

tections that will enable health care providers to foster a climate of continuous qual-
ity and safety improvement. 
Improving the Quality of Care 

The  linkage  between  health  IT  and  improving  the  quality  of  care  occurs  on  mul-
tiple  levels.  We  know  that  we  cannot  improve  the  quality  of  care  unless  we  can 
measure performance. But monitoring and reporting the quality of care is time-con-
suming,  inaccurate  and  incomplete  without  IT  systems.  A  challenge  shared  by 
AHRQ  and  the  Centers  for  Medicare  and  Medicaid  Services  (CMS)  is  how  to  best 
translate measures of quality into computable, automated quality reporting systems 
in settings such as hospitals and physician offices. 

The  maturation  of  IT  for  use  in  daily  practice  comes  at  a  time  of  increasing  rec-
ognition  that  good  healthcare  delivery  requires  better  coordination  across  all  sites 
of  care.  Many  patients  obtain  care  from  multiple  providers  and  experience  the  ef-
fects  of  poor  coordination  of  information  and  care.  Indeed,  69  percent  of  Americans 
report  that  poor  coordination  among  their  providers  is  a  serious  problem  for  them, 
and 32 percent report that they or a family member have created their own medical 
record  to  assure  that  all  health  care  professionals  they  see  have  accurate,  current 
information  about  their  health  issues.  Health  IT  can  reduce  this  burden  by  facili-
tating  the  transfer  of  information  among  providers,  customizing  knowledge  for  the 
patient,  and  facilitating  communication  between  providers.  AHRQ  has  funded  cut-
ting  edge  research  into  how  to  translate  medical  knowledge  into  specific  informa-
tion, tailored to the patient at hand and immediately available to the clinician when 
decisions  are  being  made.  These  include  alerts  about  inappropriate  therapies,  re-
minders  about  preventive  care,  and  assistance  in  automatically  doing  the  right 
thing.  Health  IT  has  the  potential  to  rapidly  disseminate  knowledge  previously 
available only in large, urban, academic health centers. For example, our project in 
rural Tennessee brings cutting edge cancer care to the rural population through de-
cision support systems and telecommunication with cancer experts. 

At  least  two  manufacturers  have  now  incorporated  a  decision  support  system  de-
veloped  by  one  of  our  grantees  into  EKG  machines.  By  helping  emergency  medical 
service teams and emergency room physicians better determine when a patient with 
chest  pains  actually  has  suffered  from,  and  may  still  be  vulnerable  to  a  heart  at-
tack, quality of care will be greatly enhanced. Those who truly need care will receive 
it  and  those  who  may  be  suffering  from  less  serious  problems,  like  indigestion,  will 
be  spared  the  unnecessary  risks,  worries,  and  costs  that  accompany  unnecessary 
hospitalizations.  As  this  improved  diagnostic  capability  is  deployed  throughout  the 
Nation, annual savings are estimated at $720 million. 

Improving  quality  is  also  about  improving  communication  among  care  providers 
through  IT  systems  that  allow  clinicians  to  quickly  access  patient  information,  in-
cluding  remote  information  such  as  radiology  or  laboratory  studies  performed  off- 
site.  It  is  about  improving  the  complicated  coordination  required  when  patients 
transfer  from  one  care  setting  to  another.  We  have  several  projects  supporting  the 
transition of patients, such as pregnant women or post-surgical adults, from the in-
tensive  hospital  setting  into  an  outpatient  clinic.  And  improving  quality  is  about 
supporting  the  communication  between  the  provider,  the  patient,  and  the  patients’ 
caregivers through electronic mediums such as e-mail. 

Our research also has made clear the importance of system issues such as organi-
zational culture and workflow. Our investments evaluate specific strategies to close 
the  gap  between  the  potential  of  health  IT  to  improve  care  quality  and  the  less 
promising reality experienced by many providers due to sub-optimal product design 
or  challenges  in  integrating  health  IT  with  the  work  of  clinicians.  For  example,  we 
are  funding  studies  of  technology  integration,  using  time-motion  studies,  culture 
surveys,  and  observational  techniques  to  understand  why  technologies  are  accepted 
or  sabotaged  by  the  clinical  users.  But  we  don’t  stop  there.  AHRQ  funds  research 
projects  to  explore  how  the  technology  can  adapt  in  intelligent  ways  to  clinician 
needs.  We  have  a  suite  of  projects  with  Partners  HealthCare  System  in  Boston  to 
develop ‘‘SmartForms’’ for various settings—smart because they anticipate the phy-
sicians’  needs  for  information  based  on  the  patient,  and  automatically  assist  the 
physician in pulling together the various action plans necessary to execute the right 
care plan. 

Finally,  the  breadth  of  our  current  portfolio  has  been  instrumental  in  enabling 
AHRQ  to  take  health  IT  into  settings  where  traditionally  there  has  been  under-
investment.  These  include  nursing  homes  and  pharmacies,  waiting  rooms,  schools 
and  homes,  in  rural  and  small  settings.  These  projects  have  benefited  parents  and 
caregivers,  including  the  blind,  chronically  ill  and  those  recovering  from  serious 
acute events. Each of these new frontiers requires the discovery of the unique needs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

of  the  targeted  population,  growing  new  partnerships,  and,  creatively  transferring 
knowledge about lessons learned. 
Reducing the Cost of Care 

The potential for cost savings from systematic use of health IT includes avoidable 
expenditures in the administrative and financial aspects of health care institutions, 
improved  efficiencies  in  workflow,  improved  physician  decisionmaking  (especially 
when  decision  support  systems  provide  immediate  access  to  information  on  com-
parative effectiveness and cost effectiveness), and in the reduced need for additional 
patient care that medical errors often entail. There are also significant financial and 
non-financial  costs  to  patients  that  can  be  reduced  through  the  introduction  of 
health IT: the potential for bringing health care to the patient’s location (which can 
be  a  serious  issue  for  those  geographically  isolated,  homebound,  or  in  nursing 
homes), removing the inconvenience, expense and increased risk of harm associated 
with  inpatient  admission,  reducing  or  eliminating  the  need  to  return  to  a  tertiary 
care hospital for follow-up consultations, and the potential for patients to substitute 
e-mail  or  other  web-based  consultations  in  place  of  office  visits  with  their  physi-
cians. One-third of Americans reported that they needed to return for a repeat visit 
because their clinical information was not available during their first visit. 

AHRQ’s prior investments provide evidence of the potential for savings in selected 
care settings and our work in progress will demonstrate the value obtained from in-
vestments  in  health  IT  in  a  broad  array  of  settings.  Over  the  last  decade  work  by 
one  of  our  grantees  demonstrated  that  computerized  reminders  can  reduce  the  cost 
of  tests  ordered  for  hospitalized  patients  by  approximately  10  percent.  Another  ex-
ample  is  the  Utah  Health  Information  Network,  developed  a  decade  ago  by  then- 
Governor  Leavitt,  which  demonstrated  the  potential  for  savings  in  administrative 
and  billing  costs  through  the  use  of  health  IT.  By  creating  a  more  efficient  way  to 
submit bills, UHIN both reduced costs and reduced the administrative burden of re- 
entering  the  same  data  for  different  payers.  AHRQ  now  is  working  with  UHIN  to 
add  clinical  data  to  their  statewide  system  to  enhance  its  potential  to  improve  the 
quality and safety of patient care as well. 

AHRQ is funding another statewide regional health information exchange in Indi-
ana, for which the Regenstrief Institute, a national health IT leader, is a key player. 
This  statewide  initiative  builds  upon  the  successful  NLM-funded  Indianapolis  pa-
tient  care  network,  which  was  developed  to  make  health  care  information  reliably 
available for patients seen in Emergency Departments regardless of where they usu-
ally  get  care  and  to  improve  the  exchange  of  information  between  health  care  pro-
viders  and  the  public  health  authorities.  When  current  data  are  available,  redun-
dant  testing  can  be  avoided  and  the  right  care  can  be  delivered  more  rapidly.  In 
an  effort  to  more  definitively  identify  the  cost  savings  of  health  IT,  we  are  concur-
rently funding an evaluation of the value of that exchange, not only in the hospital 
system  but  also  throughout  the  Indiana  primary  care  and  specialty  clinics.  This 
well-designed evaluation will provide the Nation with clear evidence of whether the 
actual  savings  are  as  significant  as  many  hope.  It  will  provide  crucial  evidence  for 
those seeking to make a business case for health IT. 

AHRQ will also understand the costs and benefits of the statewide electronic pre-
scribing  roll-out  in  Massachusetts,  undertaken  by  a  consortium  that  includes  Blue 
Cross Blue Shield. AHRQ researchers will have access to claims and utilization data 
for  over  1,000  prescribers,  translating  to  approximately  480,000  prescriptions  over 
the course of the year. 

The results of AHRQ’s current research will also inform America about the wide- 
ranging effects of the large investments in health IT by integrated delivery systems. 
One evaluation project studies the effects on patient outcomes and resource utiliza-
tion resulting from Kaiser Permanente’s $3 billion investment in electronic medical 
records  for  ambulatory  physician  practices.  The  evaluation  findings  from  these 
major  investments  will  be  available  to  the  public.  This  may  accelerate  adoption  by 
enabling health care institutions to learn from the early adopters. 
National Resource Center for Health IT 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  cannot  over-emphasize  how  essential  technical  assistance  is  to 
the  successful  adoption  and  implementation  of  health  IT.  To  assure  that  as  many 
Americans as possible benefit from our research, we are committed to exporting les-
sons  learned  from  current  demonstrations  rapidly  and  widely.  We  have  been  inun-
dated  with  requests  for  help  from  providers  and  health  care  systems  attempting  to 
adopt  health  IT.  In  response,  we  have  created  a  National  Resource  Center  for 
Health IT, the largest single commitment to technical assistance in AHRQ’s history. 
The Resource Center leverages our investments in health IT by offering help where 
it’s needed—real world clinical settings that may feel ill-equipped to meet the imple-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

mentation challenge—facilitating expert and peer-to-peer collaborative learning and 
fostering the growth of online communities who are planning, implementing, and re-
searching health IT. Our initial needs assessment led to the development of a series 
of  educational  teleconferences  on  critical  topics  for  health  IT  implementers:  how  to 
comply  with  rules  and  regulations,  how  to  design  workflow,  how  to  evaluate  effec-
tiveness,  and  how  to  tackle  clinical  decision  support  systems.  Early  this  month,  we 
convened  a  highly  successful,  week-long  meeting  attended  by  over  700  doctors, 
nurses, pharmacists, and IT professionals to share practical knowledge about health 
IT,  and  linked  it  closely  with  the  Department’s  goals  for  patient  safety.  As  one  of 
our grantees from Kentucky said, ‘‘this meeting brought real life case study experi-
ence to so many of the issues facing us today.’’ 

AHRQ has also used the Resource Center to assist states that are initiating state-
wide  clinical  data  sharing.  We  have  convened  small,  round-table  working  meetings 
of  experts  to  share  detailed  expertise  with  states  that  are  starting  the  process  of 
determining the governance and technical architecture of their data-sharing organi-
zations. The first of these was in Tampa, at the invitation of the Florida Governor’s 
Health  Information  Infrastructure  Advisory  Board  on  Healthcare;  we  have  planned 
expert  roundtables  in  New  York,  Wyoming,  and  Montana,  with  further  assistance 
to  Delaware,  Maryland,  and  Georgia.  In  these  roundtables,  AHRQ  has  been  fortu-
nate to draw upon the expertise of our state contractors who are intimately involved 
with this work in their own states, as well as consultants from our Resource Center. 
The  Resource  Center  provides  a  web  portal  with  critical  infrastructure  for  con-
vening  practitioners,  encouraging  collaboration,  and  disseminating  best  practices. 
The  portal  gathers  communities  of  practice  with  similar  interests  and  concerns  to 
share  and  learn.  While  it  was  initially  only  open  to  AHRQs  grantees,  we  are  open-
ing this rich resource to other Federal grantees. We recently announced that AHRQ 
will  support  a  special  portal  for  the  Nation’s  community  health  centers  as  they 
struggle to adopt health IT, with plans to expand to providers involved in the Medi-
care  initiative  to  expand  the  use  of  health  IT  in  physician  offices  known  as  DOQ– 
IT  and  to  providers  in  the  Indian  Health  Service  (IHS).  In  recognition  of  the  wide-
spread  interest  in  rapid  turnaround  of  health  IT  knowledge,  the  Resource  Center 
will be expanding its practical, educational teleconferences to any organization, and 
providing  in-depth  ‘‘learning  collaborative’’  curricula  for  a  smaller  subset  of  inter-
ested organizations. 
Working in Partnership 

To advance health IT, AHRQ is working closely with public and private organiza-
tions, such as the National Governors Association (NGA), eHealth Initiative, Markle 
Foundation,  Connecting  for  Health,  and  America’s  Health  Insurance  Plans  to  pro-
mote  solution  development  for  many  of  the  challenges  I  have  described.  With  the 
NGA,  we  will  be  participating  in  developing  and  providing  leadership  resources  for 
State officials on investing in health IT and healthcare quality improvement. 

Health IT can accelerate improvements in safety and quality if there are clear ob-
jectives.  Working  closely  with  leading  medical  professional  organizations  (including 
the  American  Medical  Association,  American  Academy  of  Family  Physicians,  and 
American  College  of  Physicians),  America’s  Health  Insurance  Plans,  payers,  con-
sumers  and  other  stakeholders,  AHRQ’s 
leadership  has  been  essential  for 
prioritizing  goals  for  improving  physician  performance  in  ambulatory  care.  The  re-
sults  of  this  collaboration,  known  as  the  Ambulatory  care  Quality  Alliance  (AQA) 
will  be  adopted  broadly  in  early  2006  in  the  private  sector  as  well  as  by  CMS.  The 
AQA  is  now  developing  strategies  to  collect  and  report  the  requisite  data  including 
the  use  of  health  IT  when  feasible.  Improvements  in  care  will  start  now  and  can 
be accelerated by efforts to establish a nationwide information infrastructure led by 
Secretary Leavitt. 

AHRQ is working with the Leapfrog Group, an organization of leading employers 
to  develop  an  evaluation  tool  that  allows  hospitals  and  physicians  to  ensure  that 
their computerized physician order entry (CPOE) systems and electronic prescribing 
are  effectively  reducing  medical  errors.  These  tools  will  be  available  by  the  end  of 
the year. AHRQ is also providing support to the Medical Group Management Asso-
ciation  (MGMA)  Center  for  Research  to  understand  the  level  of  adoption  of  elec-
tronic  health  records  and  other  new  technologies  in  medical  groups  and  the  issues 
associated  with  their  successful  implementation.  By  documenting  barriers  encoun-
tered  in  adopting  these  technologies  and  mechanisms,  we  will  know  better  how  to 
target our research to overcome these barriers. 

AHRQ is collaborating with other Federal agencies to align our health IT efforts. 
With  CMS,  we  are  active  participants  in  the  design  and  evaluation  of  health  IT 
projects  in  pay-for-performance,  electronic  prescribing,  and  the  implementation  of 
the  Medicare  Modernization  Act.  With  the  IHS,  we  have  supported  enhancements 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

to  their  electronic  health  record,  and,  incidentally,  that  system  has  been  chosen  by 
the  National  Aeronautical  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  to  be  its  electronic 
health record. With the Food and Drug Administration and NLM, we are supporting 
standards  development  and  coordination  efforts.  In  all  of  our  efforts,  AHRQ  main-
tains  close  relationships  with  other  agencies,  in  order  to  maximize  the  Federal  in-
vestment  of  health  IT  dollars.  We  maintain  these  relationships,  in  part,  through 
working  with 
(FHA)/Consolidated  Health 
Informatics  (CHI)  Initiative  managed  by  the  Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for 
Health  Information  Technology.  The  FHA  has  been  tasked  to  provide  an  architec-
ture, or framework, to guide Federal health IT investments, and to foster interoper-
ability through the selection and adoption of health data standards. 

the  Federal  Health  Architecture 

The  Agency  is  working  directly  with  the  Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for 
Health  Information  Technology  on  a  number  of  issues  including  an  analysis  of  the 
intersection health IT forms with various state privacy laws and business practices. 
This  FY  2005  $11.5  million  initiative,  working  with  up  to  40  states  or  territories, 
will assess variations in business policies and state laws that affect health informa-
tion exchange and identify practical solutions while assuring the preservation of pri-
vacy and security. These important efforts will assure patients, providers and other 
stakeholders  that  personal  and  sensitive  health  data  will  remain  safe  and  secure. 
Concluding Observations 

Mr. Chairman, I would like to conclude by offering a few brief observations based 

upon our work in health IT. 

First, health IT alone cannot provide the improvements needed in our healthcare 
system. These improvements will depend upon the integration of high quality health 
IT  into  the  very  fabric  of  care  by  incorporating  systems  into  our  individual  clinical 
practices, hospitals and other settings. 

Second,  for  most  health  care  settings,  health  IT  is  not  likely  to  afford  an  ‘‘out- 
of-the-box’’  solution.  Effective  use  of  health  IT  begins  with  a  careful  examination  of 
the  health  care  setting  and  then  uses  the  power  of  IT  to  enhance  its  effectiveness 
and efficiency. 

Third,  to  accelerate  the  pace  of  health  IT  adoption  and  implementation,  we  need 
to facilitate the sharing of both knowledge and experience through additional oppor-
tunities for voluntary peer-to-peer learning. Given the level of economic investment 
that  is  required,  providers  are  understandably  worried  that  a  mistake  in  judgment 
could prove financially catastrophic. 

Finally,  the  development  of  an  interoperable  health  IT  infrastructure  will  be  a 
critical  element  in  our  Nation’s  effort  to  accelerate  the  pace  of  innovation  and  the 
speed with which patients will benefit from new medical breakthroughs. The inher-
ent  delays  in  our  current  system  for  assessing  the  effectiveness  of  new  drugs,  de-
vices,  and  procedures  will  decrease  dramatically  with  widespread  use  of  health  IT 
and advance our common goal of evidence-based medicine. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  will  be  delighted  to  an-

swer any questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Dr. Clancy. Dr. Brailer. 

STATEMENT  OF  DAVID  J.  BRAILER,  M.D.,  PH.D.,  NATIONAL 
COORDINATOR  FOR  HEALTH  INFORMATION  TECHNOLOGY, 
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 
Dr.  BRAILER.  Thank  you  Chairman  Ensign,  and  members  of  the 
Committee,  I  am  pleased  to  be  here  with  my  colleagues  today  to 
talk about health information technology. And let me start with the 
Executive  Order  of  April  2004  that  established  my  office  and  the 
activities  that  the  Administration  has  under  way  today.  The  goals 
that  we  had  for  that  Executive  Order  have  already  been  outlined. 
But  again,  they  are  to  lower  costs,  reduce  medical  errors,  improve 
quality, and reduce the hassle that consumers face when they come 
to  healthcare.  We  seek  to  have  widespread  adoption  of  interoper-
able  electronic  health  records  within  10  years.  The  goal  of  the 
interoperability, simply put, is to have information that follows pa-
tients where they want it to, and not follow them where they don’t. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Over  the  course  of  the  past  year  we’ve  been  working  to  set  the 
foundations  for  this  work,  and  there  are  three  that  I  would  like  to 
highlight. 

The  first  is  a  Clinical  Foundation,  and  this  raises  the  question 
that  many  of  us  are  very  aware  of  today:  What  are  the  benefits 
that  health  information  technology  brings?  You’ve  already  heard 
cited today that the Institute of Medicine reports on deaths that re-
sult from inpatient medical errors, from ambulatory medical errors, 
and from related other accidents and incidents. We also know from 
the literature that missing information when a physician sees a pa-
tient  can  be  harmful.  Thirty-two  percent  of  Americans  report  that 
they  create  and  carry  some  form  of  a  personal  health  record,  be-
cause they don’t want to come to an emergency room and not have 
their  information  available,  or  see  a  specialist  and  not  have  them 
know what has happened to that patient in the past. You’ve heard 
citations  of  the  potential  savings  that  come  from  the  use  of  health 
information technology ranging from 7.5 percent of expenditures, to 
30 percent, depending upon the level of concomitant industry trans-
formation.  We’ve  seen  studies  that  have  demonstrated  that  use  of 
electronic  health  records  and  appropriate  order  entry  can  reduce 
adverse  drug  events  by  70  to  80  percent.  That’s  an  astounding  re-
duction. 

We  know  that  health  information  technology  can  save  lives,  im-
prove  care,  and  reduce  costs.  Now,  in  addition  to  this  Clinical 
Foundation,  we’ve  been  working  to  understand  the  business  or  in-
dustry foundation, in a Technical Foundation. We recently released 
a  report  from  the  CEOs  of  Fortune  100  companies  that  we  con-
vened  to  help  us  understand  the  Business  Foundation.  The  CEOs 
are not only the leaders of larger purchasers, but they’re also lead-
ers  of  industries  that  had  been  through  an  information  trans-
formation. IT has changed the structure and the efficiency of their 
industry,  retailing,  financial  services,  manufacturing,  banking, 
transportation and shipping. These CEOs reported to us two major 
findings.  First,  they  believe  that  healthcare  could  derive  the  same 
kinds of benefits that their industries have, in terms of sustainable 
productivity  from  widespread  use  of  point-of-service  information 
technologies and second, that, as purchasers, they believe this is an 
urgent  priority.  They  called  on  the  Federal  Government  to  act  as 
a leader and a catalyst and a convener to take a market-based ap-
proach  and  to  bring  this  forward  on  a  basis  that  can  engage  the 
private  sector  on  an  active  basis.  The  Technical  Foundation  was 
also  recently  released  which  was  the  summary  of  the  RFI  that  we 
asked  the  industry  to  respond  to.  These  were  numerous  questions 
about technology, about policy, about the use of technology, and the 
changes  that  are  needed  to  create  positive  opportunities  in 
healthcare.  We  had  more  than  500  responses,  totalling  more  than 
5,000  pages  of  responses.  We  had  a  100-employee  Federal  Task 
Force  to  review  these,  and  that  report  was  released  3  weeks  ago. 
This discussion lead to a number of key findings. These findings in-
clude  the  critical  role  of  standards,  and  not  just  to  have  standards 
communicated  but  to  have  them  detailed  to  a  level  of  specificity, 
and a level of clarity that allowed our software developers, our hos-
pitals and physicians to be able to have absolute clarity about what 
these  standards  mean  and  how  they  can  be  used.  They  need  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

have  an  architecture;  they  need  to  have  an  capacity  to  share  and 
move  information.  The  standards  create  a  framework  by  which  in-
formation can flow and advances in privacy and security that allow 
us to have both flexibility and the ability of information to be port-
able. 

Building  on  these  three  foundations,  we  saw  two  critical  chal-
lenges  that  have  become  the  focus  of  the  Administration’s  policy. 
The first is how do we create portability of health information. Sec-
ond  is,  how  do  we  close  the  electronic  health  record  adoption  gap. 
Speaking  to  the  latter  we  know  there’s  a  gap  between  the  adop-
tion rates of large and small health systems. Very large health sys-
tems,  some  of  which  you  will  hear  from  today,  have  been  adopting 
electronic  health  records  over  the  past  2  years,  and  have  acceler-
ated  in  the  past  year.  Many,  many  small  doctors,  small  hospitals, 
and  rural  providers  have  not  been  able  to  do  so.  This  has  resulted 
in an overall low adoption rate in the industry. We believe we have 
an opportunity now, because of the low adoption rate, to create the 
foundation  for  interoperability  so  that,  as  we  move  forward,  we’re 
able  to  have  portability,  and  to  build  this  into  the  infrastructure 
that  will  be  put  in  place  over  the  next  few  years.  Toward  this  end 
we’ve  begun  a  number  of  public/private  initiatives  that  have  been 
going  forth  from  RFPs  we  have  out  now.  There  are  four  that  I’ll 
briefly highlight. 

One is for standard harmonization, this is to allow the standards 
development  organizations  and  others  that  are  in  place  today  to 
come together to give us a single set, a national fabric of standards, 
that is unambiguous, clear, non-duplicative, and complete. 

Second  is  compliance  certification,  which  allows  for  a  process  to 
be  developed  to  base  inspection  of  electronic  health  records  and 
other  products  to  ensure  that  they  meet  minimal  standards  for 
safety,  for  security,  and  for  protection.  We  know  that  not  all  elec-
tronic  health  records  are  created  equal  and  until  we  get  this  in 
place  we’re  not  able  to  ensure  that  the  software  that  is  used  by 
physicians on patients will deliver the kinds of quality, and safety, 
and privacy results that we want to have. 

The  third  is  to  develop  architectures,  solutions  for  information 
sharing  that  can  be  designed  in  the  public  interest  to  allow  not 
only capacity for information to move, but also motivating commer-
cial investment in the health information technology and interoper-
ability industry. 

Fourth is to advance security and privacy, particularly to identify 
mechanisms that can preserve the flexibility that is built into Fed-
eral  and  many  state  laws,  and  at  the  same  time,  allow  seamless 
portability of information, so information can follow patients wher-
ever they go. 

We’ve allocated $85 million in this fiscal year to these goals and 

have requested $125 million to achieve these goals in 2006. 

I appreciate the leadership of this committee and look forward to 

the work that will come in the future. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Brailer follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID J.  BRAILER,  M.D.,  PH.D.,  NATIONAL COORDINATOR 
FOR HEALTH INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY,  DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN 
SERVICES 
Chairman Ensign, and members of the Subcommittee, I am Dr. David Brailer, the 
National Coordinator for Health Information Technology. The Office of the National 
Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology  is  a  component  of  the  Department 
of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS).  I,  along  with  my  colleague  Dr.  Carolyn 
Clancy, will provide a brief overview of some of the Department’s health information 
activities underway. 
Setting the Context 

On  April  27,  2004,  the  President  signed  Executive  Order  13335  (EO)  announcing 
his  commitment  to  the  promotion  of  health  information  technology  (IT)  to  lower 
costs, reduce medical errors, improve quality of care, and provide better information 
for patients and physicians. In particular, the President called for widespread adop-
tion  of  electronic  health  records  (EHRs)  within  10  years  so  that  health  information 
will follow patients throughout their care in a seamless and secure manner. Toward 
that  vision,  the  EO  directed  the  Secretary  of  the  Department  Health  and  Human 
Services  (HHS)  to  establish  within  the  Office  of  the  Secretary  the  position  of  Na-
tional  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology  (National  Coordinator),  with 
responsibilities  for  coordinating  Federal  health  information  technology  (health  IT) 
programs with those of relevant Executive Branch agencies, as well as coordinating 
with the private sector on their health IT efforts. On May 6, 2004, Secretary Tommy 
G. Thompson appointed me to serve in this position. 

On  July  21,  2004,  during  the  Department’s  Health  IT  Summit,  we  published  the 
‘‘Strategic  Framework:  The  Decade  of  Health  Information  Technology:  Delivering 
Consumer-centric and Information-rich Health Care,’’ (The Framework). The Frame-
work  outlined  an  approach  toward  nationwide  implementation  of  interoperable 
EHRs  and  in  it  we  identified  four  major  goals.  These  goals  are:  (1)  inform  clinical 
practice by accelerating the use of EHRs, (2) interconnect clinicians so that they can 
exchange  health  information  using  advanced  and  secure  electronic  communication, 
(3)  personalize  care  with  consumer-based  health  records  and  better  information  for 
consumers,  and  (4)  improve  public  health  through  advanced  bio-surveillance  meth-
ods  and  streamlined  collection  of  data  for  quality  measurement  and  research.  The 
Framework has allowed many industry segments, sectors, interest groups, and indi-
viduals  to  review  how  health  IT  could  transform  their  activity  or  experience,  con-
sider  how  to  take  advantage  of  this  change,  and  to  participate  in  ongoing  dialogue 
about  forthcoming  efforts.  My  office  has  obtained  significant  additional  input  con-
cerning how these four goals can best be met. 

• We  have  consulted  with,  and  actively  partnered  with,  numerous  Federal  agen-
cies in the U.S. Government including the Departments of Veterans Affairs, De-
fense, Commerce, and Homeland Security. 

• We  have  met  with  many  organizations  and  individuals  representing  stake-

holders of the healthcare system to obtain their individual views. 

• We  have  reached  out  to  states  and  regions  through  site  visits  and  town  hall 
meetings  to  understand  the  health  IT  challenges  experienced  at  the  local  level 
as  well  as  best  practices  for  the  use  of,  and  collaboration  regarding,  health  IT. 
• We  have  regularly  testified  before,  and  been  informed  by,  the  National  Com-
mittee on Vital and Health Statistics (NCVHS) on issues critical to the Nation’s 
health IT goals. 

• We  have  monitored,  and  coordinated  with,  the  efforts  of  the  Commission  for 
Systemic  Interoperability.  (The  Medicare  Modernization  Act  called  for  the  Sec-
retary to establish the Commission to develop a comprehensive strategy for the 
adoption  and  implementation  of  health  care  information  technology  standards 
that  includes  a  timeline  and  prioritization  for  such  adoption  and  implementa-
tion.) and 

• We have met with delegations involved with health IT from other countries, in-
cluding  Canada,  the  Netherlands,  Japan,  Australia,  Great  Britain,  and  France 
to learn from their individual country experiences. 

Building on the EO, The Framework, and this input, we have developed the clin-
ical,  business,  and  technical  foundations  for  the  HHS  health  IT  strategy.  Let  me 
turn to some of those now. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The Clinical Foundation: Evidence of the Benefits of Health IT 

24 

We  believe  that  health  IT  can  save  lives,  improve  care,  and  reduce  costs  in  our 
health  system.  Five  years  ago,  the  Institute  of  Medicine  (IOM)  estimated  that  as 
many  as  44,000  to  98,000  deaths  occur  each  year  as  the  result  of  medical  errors. 
Health  IT,  through  applications  such  as  computerized  physician  order  entry  can 
help  reduce  medical  errors  and  improve  quality.  For  example,  studies  have  shown 
that adverse drug events have been reduced by as much as 70 to 80 percent by tar-
geted  programs,  with  a  significant  portion  of  the  improvement  stemming  from  the 
use of health IT. 

Every  primary  care  physician  knows  what  a  recent  study  in  the  Journal  of  the 
American  Medical  Association  (JAMA)  showed:  that  clinical  information  is  fre-
quently missing at the point-of-care, and that this missing information can be harm-
ful  to  patients.  That  study  also  showed  that  clinical  information  was  less  likely  to 
be  missing  in  practices  that  had  full  electronic  records  systems.  Patients  know  this 
too  and  are  taking  matters  into  their  own  hands.  A  recent  survey  by  the  Agency 
for  Health  Care  Research  and  Quality  (AHRQ)  with  the  Kaiser  Family  Foundation 
and  the  Harvard  School  of  Public  Health  found  that  nearly  1  in  3  people  say  that 
they  or  a  family  member  have  created  their  own  set  of  medical  records  to  ensure 
that their health care providers have all of their medical information. 

There  are  mixed  signals  about  the  potential  of  health  IT  to  reduce  costs.  Some 
researchers  estimate  that  savings  from  the  implementation  of  health  IT  and  cor-
responding  changes  in  care  processes  could  range  anywhere  from  7.5  percent  of 
health  care  costs  (Johnston  et  al.,  2003;  Pan  et  al,  2004)  to  30  percent  (Wennberg 
et  al.,  2002;  Wennberg  et  al.,  2004;  Fisher  et  al.,  2003;  Fisher  et  al.,  2003).  These 
estimates are based in part on the reduction of obvious errors. For example, a med-
ical  error  is  estimated  to  cost,  in  2003  dollars,  about  $3,700  (Bates  et  al,  1997).  If 
poorly designed or implemented, health IT will not bring these benefits, and in some 
cases may even result in new medical errors and potential costs. 

Therefore,  achieving  cost  savings  requires  a  much  more  substantial  trans-
formation  of  care  delivery  that  goes  beyond  simple  error  reduction.  But,  health  IT 
must  be  combined  with  real  process  change  in  order  to  see  meaningful  improve-
ments  in  our  delivery  system.  It  requires  the  industry  to  follow  the  best  diagnostic 
and treatment practices everywhere in the Nation. 

So,  this  is  the  clinical  foundation  for  our  work,  which  demonstrates  that  health 
IT  can  save  lives,  improve  care,  and  improve  efficiency  in  our  health  system;  now 
let me turn to the business foundation. 
The Business Foundation: The Health IT Leadership Panel Report 

Recognizing that the healthcare sector lags behind most other industries in its use 
of  IT,  an  HHS  contractor  convened  a  Health  IT  Leadership  Panel  for  the  purposes 
of  understanding  how  IT  has  transformed  other  industries  and  how,  based  upon 
their experiences, it can transform the health care industry. 

The  Leadership  Panel  was  comprised  of  nine  CEOs  from  leading  companies  that 
purchase large quantities of healthcare services for their employees and dependents 
and  that  do  not  operate  in  the  healthcare  business.  The  Leadership  Panel  included 
CEOs  from  FedEx  Corporation,  General  Motors,  International  Paper,  Johnson  Con-
trols,  Target  Corporation,  Pepsico,  Procter  &  Gamble,  Wells  Fargo,  and  Wal-Mart 
Stores.  The  business  leaders  were  called  upon  to  evaluate  the  need  for  investment 
in  health  information  technology  and  the  major  roles  for  both  the  government  and 
the  private  sector  in  achieving  widespread  adoption  and  implementation.  Based 
upon  their  own  experiences  using  IT  to  reengineer  their  individual  business—and 
by  extension,  their  industries—the  Leadership  Panel  concluded  that  investment  in 
interoperable  health  IT  is  urgent  and  vital  to  the  broader  U.S.  economy  due  to  ris-
ing health care demands and business interests. 

As identified by the Lewin Group, the Leadership Panel unanimously agreed that 
the Federal Government must begin to drive change before the private sector would 
become fully engaged. Specifically, the Leadership Panel concluded: 
• Potential benefits of health IT far outweigh manageable costs. 
• Health IT needs a clear, broadly motivating vision and practical adoption strat-

• The  Federal  Government  should  provide  leadership,  and  industry  will  engage 

egy. 

and follow. 

• Lessons of adoption and success of IT in other industries should inform and en-

hance adoption of health IT. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

• Among  its  multiple  stakeholders,  the  consumer—including  individual  bene-
ficiaries,  patients,  family  members,  and  the  public  at  large—is  key  to  adoption 
of health IT and realizing its benefits. 

• Stakeholder incentives must be aligned to foster health IT adoption. 
The Leadership Panel identified as a key imperative that the Federal Government 
should act as leader, catalyst, and convener of the Nation’s health information tech-
nology  effort.  The  Leadership  Panel  also  emphasized  that  Federal  leverage  as  pur-
chaser  and  provider  would  be  needed—and  welcomed  by  the  private  sector.  Private 
sector  purchasers  and  health  care  organizations  can  and  should  collaborate  along-
side the Federal Government to drive adoption of health IT. In addition, the Leader-
ship Panel members recognized that widespread health IT adoption may not succeed 
without  buy-in  from  the  public  as  health  care  consumer.  Panelists  suggested  that 
the  national  health  IT  vision  must  be  communicated  clearly  and  directly  to  enlist 
consumer support for the widespread adoption of health IT. 

These  findings  and  recommendations  from  the  Leadership  Panel  were  published 
in  a  report  released  in  May  2005  and  laid  the  business  foundation  for  the  HHS 
health IT strategy. Now, let me turn to the technical foundation. 
The  Technical  Foundation:  Public  Input  Solicited  on  Nationwide  Network 
HHS  published  a  Request  for  Information  (RFI)  in  November  2004,  that  solicited 
public  input  about  whether  and  how  a  Nationwide  Health  Information  Network 
(NHIN)  could  be  developed.  This  RFI  asked  key  questions  to  guide  our  under-
standing  around  the  organization  and  business  framework,  legal  and  regulatory 
issues, management and operational considerations, standards and policies for inter-
operability, and other considerations. 

We  received  over  500  responses  to  the  RFI,  which  were  reviewed  by  a  govern-
ment-wide RFI Review Task Force. This Task Force was comprised of over 100 Fed-
eral employees from 17 agencies, including the Departments of Homeland Security, 
Defense,  Veterans  Affairs,  Treasury,  Commerce,  Health  and  Human  Services,  as 
well  as  multiple  agencies  within  the  departments.  The  resulting  public  summary 
document has begun to inform policy discussions inside and outside the government. 
We  know  that  the  RFI  stimulated  substantial  and  unprecedented  discussions 
within and across organizations about how interoperability can really work, and we 
have continued to build on this. These responses have yielded one of the richest and 
most  descriptive  collections  of  thoughts  on  interoperability  and  health  information 
exchange  that  has  likely  ever  been  assembled  in  the  U.S.  As  such,  it  has  set  the 
foundation for actionable steps designed to meet the President’s goal. 

While  the  RFI  report  is  an  illustrative  summary  of  the  RFI  responses  and  does 
not attempt to evaluate or discuss the relative merits of any one individual response 
over  another,  it  does  provide  some  key  findings.  Among  the  many  opinions  ex-
pressed  by  those  supporting  the  development  of  a  NHIN,  the  following  concepts 
emerged: 

private effort. 

health information. 

the determination of standards and policies. 

• A NHIN should be a decentralized architecture built using the Internet, linked 
by  uniform  communications  and  a  software  framework  of  open  standards  and 
policies. 
• A  NHIN  should  reflect  the  interests  of  all  stakeholders  and  be  a  joint  public/ 
• A governance entity composed of public and private stakeholders should oversee 
• A  NHIN  should  provide  sufficient  safeguards  to  protect  the  privacy  of  personal 
• Incentives  may  be  needed  to  accelerate  the  deployment  and  adoption  of  a 
• Existing  technologies,  Federal  leadership,  prototype  localized  or  regional  ex-
change efforts, and certification of EHRs will be the critical enablers of a NHIN. 
• Key challenges to developing and adopting a NHIN were listed as: the need for 
additional and better refined standards; addressing privacy concerns; paying for 
the development and operation of, and access to the NHIN; accurately verifying 
patients’ identity; and addressing discordant inter- and intra-state laws regard-
ing health information exchange. 

NHIN. 

Key Actions 

Building  on  these  steps,  two  critical  challenges  to  realizing  the  President’s  vision 
for  health  IT  are  being  addressed:  (a)  interoperability  and  the  secure  portability  of 
health information, and (b) electronic health record (EHR) adoption. Interoperability 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

and  portability  of  health  information  using  information  technology  are  essential  to 
achieve the industry transformation goals sought by the President. Further, the gap 
in  EHR  adoption  between  large  hospitals  and  small  hospitals,  between  large  and 
small  physician  practices,  and  between  other  healthcare  providers  must  be  ad-
dressed.  This  adoption  gap  has  the  potential  to  shift  the  market  in  favor  of  large 
players  who  can  afford  these  technologies,  and  can  create  differential  health  treat-
ments and quality, resulting in a quality gap. 

To address these challenges, HHS is focusing on several key actions: harmonizing 
health  information  standards;  certifying  health  IT  products  to  assure  consistency 
with  standards;  addressing  variations  in  privacy  and  security  policies  that  can 
hinder  interoperability;  and,  developing  an  architecture  for  nationwide  sharing  of 
electronic health information. HHS has allocated $86.5 million to achieve these and 
other goals in FY 2005 and has requested $125 million in FY 2006. 
Standards Harmonization 

We have issued a Request For Proposal (RFP) to develop, prototype and evaluate 
a  process  to  harmonize  industry-wide  standards  development,  and  also  unify  and 
streamline  maintenance  of  and  refinements  to  existing  standards  over  time.  Today, 
the  standards-setting  process  is  fragmented  and  lacks  coordination,  resulting  in 
overlapping  standards  and  gaps  in  standards  that  need  to  be  filled.  Additionally, 
within  the  Federal  Government,  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology 
(NIST) will develop a process to take output from the standards harmonization proc-
ess and consider them as Federal Information Processing Standards (FIPS) relevant 
to Federal agencies. 

We  envision  a  process  where  standards  are  identified  and  developed  around  real 
scenarios—i.e.,  around  use  cases  or  breakthroughs.  A  ‘‘use  case’’  is  a  technology 
term to describe how actors interact in specific value-added scenarios—for example, 
rapidly assembling complete patient information in an emergency room; we also call 
them ‘‘breakthroughs.’’ 
Compliance Certification 

We  have  issued  an  RFP  to  develop,  prototype  and  evaluate  a  process  to  specify 
criteria for the functional requirements for health IT products—beginning with am-
bulatory  EHRs,  then  inpatient  EHRs,  and  then  the  infrastructure  components 
through  which  EHRs  interoperate  (e.g.,  NHIN  architecture).  This  RFP  will  also 
evaluate  a  process  for  inspection  based  on  conformance  with  these  criteria.  NIST 
will  collaborate  with  the  RPF  contractor  in  this  effort,  where  appropriate,  as  di-
rected by HHS. 
NHIN Architecture 

We  have  issued  an  RFP  to  develop  models  and  prototypes  for  a  NHIN  for  wide-
spread  health  information  exchange  that  can  be  used  to  test  specialized  network 
functions,  security  protections  and  monitoring,  and  demonstrate  feasibility  of  scal-
able models across market settings. The NHIN architecture will be coordinated with 
the  work  of  the  Federal  Health  Architecture  and  other  interrelated  RFPs.  The  goal 
is  to  develop  real  solutions  for  nationwide  health  information  exchange  and  ulti-
mately  develop  a  market—particularly  the  supply  side—for  health  information  ex-
change,  which  does  not  exist  today.  This  RFP  will  fund  6  architectures  and  oper-
ational  prototypes  that  will  maximize  the  use  of  existing  resources  such  as  the 
Internet, and will be tested simultaneously in three markets with a diversity of pro-
viders in each market. HHS intends to make these prototype architectures available 
in the public domain to prevent control of ideas and design. Through the RFP proc-
ess, we encourage the development of a complete open source solution. 
Security and Privacy 

We  issued  an  RFP,  which  Dr.  Clancy  will  discuss  further,  to  assess  variations  in 
state laws and organization-level business policies around privacy and security prac-
tices,  including  variations  in  implementations  of  HIPAA  privacy  and  security  re-
quirements  that  may  pose  challenges  to  automated  health  information  exchange. 
Variations  in  organizational  level  policies  and  state  laws  may  create  barriers  to 
interoperability.  This  RFP,  administered  by  AHRQ,  will  seek  to  define  workable 
mechanisms  and  policies  to  address  these  variations,  while  maintaining  the  levels 
of security and privacy that consumers expect. 

We expect to award contracts for these RFPs by October 2005. 

Fraud and Abuse Study 

HHS  has  a  6-month  project  underway  to  determine  how  automated  coding  soft-
ware  and  a  nationwide  interoperable  health  information  technology  infrastructure 
can  address  healthcare  fraud  issues.  The  project  is  being  conducted  through  a  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

tract  with  the  Foundation  of  Research  and  Education  (FORE)  of  the  American 
Health Information Management Association (AHIMA) 

While  only  a  small  percentage  of  the  estimated  4  billion  healthcare  claims  sub-
mitted  each  year  are  fraudulent,  the  total  dollars  in  fraudulent  or  improper  claims 
is  substantial.  The  National  Health  Care  Anti-Fraud  Association  (NHCAA)  esti-
mates that healthcare fraud accounts for 3 percent of U.S. health expenditures each 
year,  or  an  estimated  $56.7  billion.  They  cite  other  estimates,  which  may  include 
improper  but  not  fraudulent  claims,  as  high  as  10  percent  of  U.S.  health  expendi-
tures or $170 billion annually. 

At  present,  the  contractor  is  working  to  perform  two  main  tasks.  One  task  is  a 
descriptive  study  of  the  issues  and  the  steps  in  the  development  and  use  of  auto-
mated  coding  software  that  enhance  healthcare  anti-fraud  activities.  The  second 
task  is  identifying  best  practices  to  enhance  the  capabilities  of  a  nationwide  inter-
operable health information technology infrastructure to assist in prevention, detec-
tion and prosecution, as appropriate, in cases of healthcare fraud or improper claims 
and  billing.  An  expert  cross-industry  committee  composed  of  senior  level  executives 
from both the private and public sectors is guiding this second task. 

The project’s final report is scheduled for completion in September 2005. 

Conclusion 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  this  summary  of  the  activities  of  the 
Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology.  A  year  ago, 
the President created this position by Executive Order. In that time, we have estab-
lished  the  clinical,  business  and  technical  foundations  for  the  HHS  health  IT  strat-
egy.  Now,  we  have  begun  to  execute  key  actions  that  will  give  us  real,  tangible 
progress toward that goal. 

HHS,  under  Secretary  Michael  Leavitt’s  leadership,  is  giving  the  highest  priority 
to  fulfilling  the  President’s  commitment  to  promote  widespread  adoption  of  inter-
operable  electronic  health  records—and,  it  is  a  privilege  to  be  a  part  of  this  trans-
formation. 

Mr. Chairman, this concludes my prepared statement. I would be delighted to an-

swer any questions that you or the Members of the Subcommittee may have. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you, Dr. Brailer. Dr. Semerjian. 
STATEMENT OF DR. HRATCH G. SEMERJIAN, 

ACTING DIRECTOR, NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS 

AND TECHNOLOGY, TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION, 

DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Chairman  Ensign, 
Senator Kerry, and Senator Allen, I would like to thank you for the 
opportunity  to  add  to  this  discussion  regarding  health  information 
technology. I certainly was very pleased to hear some of the discus-
sion  earlier,  discussion  on  standards  and  interoperability.  And,  in 
fact,  NIST  has  a  long  and  productive  history  of  engaging  industry 
sectors and overcoming interoperability and data exchange barriers 
to improve competitiveness and reduce costs. 

Inadequate interoperability problems have been found to cost the 
automotive industry, for example, some $5 billion a year. The semi- 
conductor industry $4 billion, and construction industry more than 
$15  billion.  And,  we  have  been  working  with  industry  and  stand-
ards organizations to address these issues. With the increasing use 
of  information  technology  in  healthcare  delivery,  issues  associated 
with  health-related  information  sharing,  security,  privacy,  and 
interoperability  issues  need  to  be  addressed.  NIST  has  been  work-
ing  with  the  healthcare  community  to  improve  the  reliability  and 
reduce  the  costs  of  U.S.  healthcare  since  the  1960s.  We’ve  devel-
oped, for example, standards that are used by the College of Amer-
ican  Pathologists  as  their  benchmark  for  purposes  of  testing  for 
more than 15,000 U.S. clinical laboratories. Manufacturers are, for 
example, turning to NIST for accurate measurements, for emerging 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

medical  treatments  and  clinical  diagnostics,  in  areas  such  as  coro-
nary  stents,  and  radioactive  seeds  for  heart  attack  and  cancer  pa-
tients. In the mid to late 1990s, as part of our Advance Technology 
Program  on  information  infrastructure  for  healthcare,  NIST  and 
our U.S. industry partners invested over $300 million in health in-
formation technology to aid the U.S. healthcare enterprise in devel-
oping an infrastructure to improve coordination and enable admin-
istrative  efficiencies,  avoid  medical  errors,  reduce  cost,  and  open 
new technological opportunities. 

NIST  has  worked  with  the  healthcare  industry  to  establish 
concensus-based standards and to develop tests, prototypes and di-
agnostic  tools  for  building  robust  interoperable  commercial  solu-
tions.  In  fact,  early  on,  NIST  built  a  prototype  that’s  called  a  re-
mote procedure, a call broker for the Veteran’s Health Administra-
tion  (VHA),  my  colleague  here,  to  enable  communication  among 
their  geographically  disparate  hospital  system.  More  recent  efforts 
in support of VHA included prototyping, emerging technology solu-
tions such as the use of Smart Cards by veterans, and single sign- 
on capabilities for doctors. 

Building  on  this  initial  interest  in  health  enterprise  integration, 
NIST  is  collaborating  on  integrating  the  healthcare  enterprise 
project  sponsored  by  the  Radiological  Society  of  North  America, 
Healthcare  Information  and  Management  System  Society,  and  the 
American College of Cardiology. 

As  part  of  this  approach,  NIST  has  been  instrumental  in  devel-
oping  the  Cross-Enterprise  Document  Sharing  standard.  This 
standard  provides  a  mechanism  to  securely  access  a  patient’s 
multifaceted  clinical  information,  especially  when  they’re  remotely 
located and controlled. 

In  addition,  NIST  works  within  Health  Level  7,  in  defining 
standard  functionality  and  conformance  criteria  for  electronic 
health  record  systems,  forming  the  basis  for  their  certification. 
Similarly  within  the  medical  device  community  NIST  is  applying 
the  expertise  in  automatic  test  generation  to  develop  tests  and  as-
sociated tools for devices within intensive care units. In accordance 
with  the  National  Technology  Transfer  and  Advancement  Act  of 
1995, NOMB Circular A119, NIST supports the development of vol-
untary  industry  standards  as  the  preferred  source  of  standards,  to 
be used by the Federal Government. 

In  addition,  if  there  are  specific  Federal  Government  require-
ments that cannot be fulfilled by voluntary standards, NIST devel-
ops Federal Information Processing Standards, FIPS, to meet these 
needs.  This  extensive  record  of  promoting  standards  and  the  tech-
nical  expertise  on  NIST’s  staff  will  be  extremely  useful  in  meeting 
the  President’s  goal  of  making  our  country’s  premier  healthcare 
system  safer  by  reducing  medical  errors,  improving  the  quality  of 
care,  making  it  more  affordable  by  reducing  the  cost  of  care  and 
making healthcare more accessible, by making health-related infor-
mation available at the point of care. 

As a football coach, who we loved and cherished would have said, 
the  future  is  now  for  healthcare,  health  IT.  At  NIST  we’re  com-
mitted  to  supporting  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Serv-
ices,  in  the  implementation  of  the  President’s  health  IT  initiative. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

We’re  looking  forward  to  working  with  Dr.  Brailer’s  office  and 
other  organizations  to  help  harmonize  health  information  stand-
ards,  to  certify  health  IT  products,  to  ensure  conformance  with 
these  standards  and  assisting  in  the  development  of  a  nationwide 
architecture  for  sharing  electronic  health  information.  In  doing  so 
NIST’s  widely  recognized  technical  expertise  in  cybersecurity  and 
privacy will be applied to secure the nationwide health information 
network. 

Once  again  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  about  NIST  ac-
tivities,  and  I’ll  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  may  have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Semerjian follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  HRATCH G.  SEMERJIAN,  ACTING DIRECTOR,  NATIONAL 
INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY,  TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION, 
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Chairman Ensign and Members of the Committee, I am Hratch Semerjian, Acting 
Director  of  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  part  of  the 
Technology  Administration  of  the  Department  of  Commerce.  I  am  pleased  to  be  of-
fered  the  opportunity  to  add  to  this  discussion  regarding  health  information  tech-
nology. 

I  will  focus  my  testimony  on  the  role  that  timely  and  reliable  measurement  and 
consensus-based  standards  can  play  in  increasing  the  accuracy,  privacy,  security, 
and  reliability  of  health  information  to  meet  the  President’s  mandate  to  make  our 
country’s  premier  healthcare  system  safer,  more  affordable,  and  more  accessible 
through  the  utilization  of  information  technology  (IT).  A  cultural  transformation  of 
our  Nation’s  $1.9  trillion 1 national  healthcare  system  can  reverse  troubling  statis-
tics  such  as  44,000–98,000  Americans  dying  each  year  from  inpatient  medical  er-
rors; 2 Americans  are  being  injured  or  are  dying  each  year  from  adverse  drug 
events; 3 and  a  significant  annual  expenditure  on  treatments  that  may  not  improve 
health, may be redundant, or may be inappropriate. 

As a result of the President’s initiative, the Nation will have a healthcare revolu-
tion  that  will  connect  IT  systems  for  payment,  prescriptions,  and  patient  care.  In 
order  for  this  model  to  succeed,  it  will  require  interoperable  IT  standards  and  clin-
ical  diagnostic  tools  that  are  technically  sound,  robustly  specified,  and  traceable  to 
national standards and reference materials. 

These standards and measurements go directly to the heart of NIST’s core metrol-
ogy  mission.  Several  years  ago,  NIST  recognized  the  growing  importance  of  critical 
measurements  and  standards  needed  to  advance  the  healthcare  industry,  and  im-
prove the quality and cost-effectiveness of health care delivery systems. Accordingly, 
NIST  established  a  cross-disciplinary  effort  to  address  these  needs.  While  a  good 
portion  of  NIST  healthcare  portfolio  makes  a  priority  of  providing  the  healthcare 
community  with  standards  and  diagnostic  tools,  our  involvement  is  actually  much 
broader. NIST has a long and effective history in working with health-related orga-
nizations to improve our Nation’s healthcare system. 

In Fiscal Year 2005, NIST health-related projects encompassed many areas of the 
healthcare sector, including screening and prevention, diagnostics, treatments, den-
tistry, quality assurance, bio-imaging, systems biology, and clinical informatics. Rec-
ognizing  the  importance  of  this  area  and  NIST’s  crucial  responsibilities,  President 
Bush  has  requested  an  additional  $7.2  million  for  this  area  for  Fiscal  Year  2006. 
In all aspects of this Strategic Focus Area in healthcare-related activities, NIST rec-
ognizes  the  importance  of  directly  addressing  the  needs  of  the  doctors,  clinics,  and 
patients. 

NIST’s  experience  in  managing  the  Baldrige  National  Quality  Program,  which 
promotes  performance  excellence  among  U.S.  manufacturers,  service  companies, 
educational  institutions,  and  health  care  providers,  is  another  way  in  which  NIST 
stays  connected  with  health-related  organizations.  A  large  number  of  healthcare 
providers now are using or beginning to learn more about the Baldrige Quality Pro-
gram  as  a  framework  for  performance  excellence  within  their  organizations.  The 

1 National Healthcare Expenditures Projections: 2004–2014. Office of the Actuary. Centers for 

Medicare and Medicaid Services. 

2 Institute of Medicine. 
3 ADE. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

ways in which organizations manage and protect critical, electronic healthcare infor-
mation  and  use  IT  systems  to  improve  their  performance  is  a  major  aspect  of  the 
Baldrige Health Care Criteria. Dealing with this sector and its senior leaders closely 
has  provided  NIST  special  insight  into  how  these  organizations  operate  and  their 
special needs. 

NIST  is  committed  to  supporting  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services 
(HHS) in the implementation of the President’s Health IT initiative. Commerce Sec-
retary Gutierrez and NIST stand ready to be helpful in ensuring the success of the 
President’s  initiative.  Secretary  Leavitt  is  aware  of  NIST’s  capabilities  and  we  look 
forward  to  his  guidance  as  to  how  we  can  best  utilize  our  resources  to  assist  the 
initiative. 

As  you  know  the  President  has  set  a  goal  of  widespread  adoption  of  electronic 
health  records  within  10  years  so  that  health  information  will  follow  patients 
throughout their care in a seamless and secure manner. To achieve this goal, NIST 
and the Department of Health and Human Services have developed a strategic part-
nership  that  leverages  each  Department’s  core  expertise  and  resources  to  facilitate 
science  and  technology  innovation  to  improve  human  health  and  the  U.S.  economy. 
This  agreement  to  work  together  on  the  key  actions  that  will  enable  us  to  achieve 
the  President’s  goal,  which  the  HHS  witnesses  will  discuss  in  more  detail,  builds 
upon already-existing and successful collaborations between NIST and HHS in can-
cer  research  and  treatment,  standards  for  medical  devices,  and  a  host  of  other 
areas. 

architecture; 

issued by HHS; 

To assist HHS in the first phase of NHIN development, NIST will: 
• Assist  in  evaluating  responses  to  the  Request  For  Proposals  (RFP)  recently 
• Provide technical expertise for Nationwide Health Information Network (NHIN) 
• Assist in Standards Harmonization; 
• Develop Performance and Conformance Metrics for NHIN; 
• Assist in the development of procedures for certifying conformance; and 
• Provide guidance for Security. 
Specifically,  HHS  is  soliciting  proposals  for  a  series  of  government  contracts  that 
will help advance health IT adoption. To support this effort in the near term, NIST 
has  been  asked  to  participate  in  the  review  and  evaluation  of  responses  to  the  Re-
quest For Proposals and will work in a technical advisory capacity to the contractors 
selected,  as  requested  by  the  HHS  National  Coordinator  for  Health  IT.  To  support 
the  long-term  vision  of  a  NHIN  where  clinicians,  laboratories,  pharmacies,  and  pa-
tients  have  secure  access  to  key  medical  information,  NIST  will  continue  its  re-
search  with  standards  and  emerging  technologies,  and  provide  testbeds  for  tech-
nology evaluation and standards harmonization for the NHIN. 

NIST  is  uniquely  situated  to  contribute  significantly  to  the  advancement  of  this 
plan.  NIST  draws  upon  the  expertise  that  exists  in  many  of  its  programs.  NIST’s 
scientific  measurement  laboratories  respond  to  the  measurement,  standards  and 
technology  needs  of  U.S.  industry,  government,  and  academia.  NIST’s  industrial 
programs  seek  to  further  U.S.  technology  development,  as  well  as  help  ensure  the 
growth  of  U.S.  small  manufacturers,  and  have  developed  rigorous  review  and  eval-
uation procedures for responses to open solicitations. 

As  the  lead  Federal  agency  for  measurements  and  standards,  NIST  has  a  long 
and  successful  history  of  collaborating  with  industry  sectors  to  respond  to  their 
needs,  and  is  poised  to  be  successful  in  a  strong  collaboration  with  both  industry 
and  government  partners  in  the  development  of  widespread  interoperability  of 
healthcare applications. It bears repeating that in all aspects our healthcare-related 
activities,  NIST  recognizes  the  importance  of  directly  addressing  the  needs  of  the 
doctors, clinics, and patients 

In  the  remainder  of  my  testimony,  I  will  provide  details  on  NIST’s  track  record 
in  evaluating  technical  proposals  and  in  IT  standards  harmonization,  certification, 
accreditation,  and  measurement  science  to  support  the  rigorous  testing  that  is  re-
quired  for  the  development  of  the  NHIN.  The  real  value  of  a  health  IT  system  will 
only  be  achieved  if  such  systems  are  interoperable  and  electronic  connectivity  is 
achieved,  so  that  clinicians  have  key  information,  related  to  past  patient  experi-
ences,  laboratory  results,  and  prescriptions,  when  and  where  it  is  needed—at  the 
point  of  care.  The  development  of  such  a  health  IT  system  will  depend  upon  inter-
operability  standards  and  clinical  diagnostic  tools  that  are  technically  sound, 
robustly  specified,  and  traceable  to  national  standards  and  reference  materials.  It 
is critical that all systems be secure and reliable. Sometimes, it is literally a matter 
of life and death. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Based  on  many  decades  of  expertise  in  information  technology,  clinical  measure-
ments  and  decision  support,  NIST  will  contribute  to  both  the  short-term  and  long- 
term goals of establishing a National Health Information Network. 
NIST Experience in Evaluating Responses to RFPs 

NIST  has  valuable  experience  reviewing  requests  for  proposals  in  several  of  its 
programs, including the Advanced Technology Program’s Information Infrastructure 
for  Healthcare.  NIST  evaluates  each  submission  against  specific  criteria,  locating 
appropriate reviewers for technology areas represented, formulating Source Evalua-
tion Boards as decisionmaking bodies, maintaining confidentiality of proprietary in-
formation,  securely  moving  large  number  of  documents  and  maintaining  complete 
and  accurate  records,  providing  each  submission  full  consideration  and  fair  treat-
ment, and providing unsuccessful candidates in-depth debriefings. A recent National 
Academy of Sciences report applauds NIST for its effectiveness and efficiency in this 
effort. Those capabilities will assist HHS in making very important health informa-
tion technology awards. 

Second,  NIST  researchers  have  specific  technical  and  business  expertise  that 
would  add  value  to  the  review  and  evaluation  of  the  submissions  to  the  current 
RFP’s. This expertise spans broad areas of healthcare informatics and includes, but 
is not limited to: architectures, networks, interoperability, security and privacy, elec-
tronic  health  records,  automation  of  clinical  notes,  expert  alert  systems,  decision 
support  systems,  telemedicine,  virtual  reality  training  modules  and  simulation  of 
minimally invasive surgery. 
NIST Technical Expertise for NHIN Architecture 

NIST  works  with  industry,  government,  and  academia  to  establish  consensus- 
based  standards,  develop  associated  test  metrics  to  ensure  that  implementations  or 
devices perform according to the defined standard, and establish comprehensive cer-
tification capabilities for the IT industry. NIST has for many years been focused on 
developing metrics for the information technology industry. We develop tests and di-
agnostic  tools  for  building  robust,  interoperable,  commercial  solutions.  Applying 
such tools early in the life cycle process helps industry determine whether its prod-
ucts conform to the standard, and ultimately, will interoperate with other products. 
In  addition,  the  development  and  use  of  these  metrology  tools  fosters  thorough  re-
view  of  the  standard,  which  will,  in  turn,  aid  in  resolving  errors  and  ambiguities. 
The integration of information technology into the health industry has the potential 
to reduce medical costs by as much as 20 percent, a significant savings in an annual 
healthcare  bill  that  was  14.9  percent  of  the  GDP  $1.6  trillion—in  2002,4 estimated 
to be $1.9 trillion in 2005 5 and projected to rise to $3.6 trillion by 2014.6 
(a) Standards Harmonization 

As the U.S. National Measurement Institute, NIST is frequently looked to for re-
search  and  measurements  that  provide  the  technical  underpinning  for  standards, 
ranging from materials test methods to standards for building performance, and for 
a range of technologies, from information and communications technologies to nano- 
and bio-technologies. As a matter of policy, NIST encourages and supports participa-
tion  of  researchers  in  standards  developing  activities  related  to  the  mission  of  the 
Institute. More than a quarter of NIST’s technical staff—363 employees—participate 
in  standards  developing  activities  of  90  organizations.  These  include  U.S.  private 
sector  standardization  bodies,  industry  consortia,  and  international  organizations. 
The  NIST  staff  hold  1,183  committee  memberships,  and  chair  142  standards  com-
mittees. 

In  the  information  technology  area,  40  NIST  researchers  have  taken  leadership 
roles  and  served  with  distinction  in  80  national  and  international  standards  com-
mittees promoting the interests of many essential U.S. industries. Participation var-
ies  across  a  number  of  core  information  technology  disciplines,  including  advancing 
and securing Internet and wireless networks, data exchange, data imaging, security 
and  privacy,  biometrics,  and  usability  and  accessibility  of  IT  systems.  In  the  area 
of  telemedicine,  NIST  has  worked  in  conjunction  with  the  American  Telemedicine 
Association to define standards and guidelines that enable the development and ad-
vancement of telemedicine. ATA and NIST have conducted a series of workshops to 

4 National  Center  for  Health  Statistics.  Health,  United  States,  2004.  With  Chartbook  on 
Trends in the Health of Americans. Hyattsville, Maryland: 2004. Table 116. Page 326. Available 
at: http://www.cdc.gov/nchs/data/hus/hus04trend.pdf#116. 

5 National Healthcare Expenditures Projections: 2004–2014. Office of the Actuary. Centers for 
Medicare  and  Medicaid  Services.  Available  at:  http://www.cms.hhs.gov/statistics/nhe/projec-
tions-2004/proj2004.pdf. 

6 Ibid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

identify  standards  needed  to  provide  ocular  care  through  telecommunications  tech-
nology. 

In the health IT arena, the NIST staff participates in the following key IT stand-

ards-related efforts: 

• ANSI Healthcare Informatics Standards Board (HISB). 
• ASTM International—Operating Room of the Future. 
• Markle Foundation’s Connecting for Health. 
• American Telemedicine Association (ATA). 
• Federal Health Architecture/Consolidated Health Informatics (FHA/CHI). 
• Medical Device Communications, Wireless Networks (IEEE). 
• Healthcare  Information  and  Management  Systems  Society/Integrating  the 
• Health Level 7 (HL7). 
In  accordance  with  the  National  Technology  Transfer  and  Advancement  Act  of 
1995 (Pub. L. 104–113) and Administration policies, NIST supports the development 
of voluntary industry standards both nationally and internationally as the preferred 
source  of  standards  to  be  used  by  the  Federal  Government.  NIST  collaborates  with 
national  and  international  standards  committees,  users,  industry  groups,  consortia, 
and research and trade organizations, to get needed standards developed. 

Healthcare Enterprise (HIMSS/IHE). 

NIST  will  work  with  HHS  to  develop  a  strategy  to  promote  such  voluntary  con-
sensus  standards,  or  Federal  Information  Processing  Standards  for  use  in  the  Fed-
eral sector. 

As  part  of  this  process  toward  standardization  of  Federal  health  information, 
NIST will begin to formalize the first set of data standards agreed upon in the Fed-
eral Health Architecture/Consolidated Health Informatics Initiative, through the de-
velopment  of  appropriate  Federal  Information  Processing  Standards  and  guidance 
to  Federal  agencies  through  NIST  Special  Publications.  This  will  help  the  Federal 
Government to achieve a greater level of interoperability of Federal health data. 
(b) Performance and Conformance Metrics for the NHIN 

NIST  works  with  industry  to  establish  credible,  cost-effective  metrics  to  dem-
onstrate  software  interoperability  and  conformance  to  particular  standards.  These 
metrics often form the basis or criteria upon which certifications are based. Typical 
NIST  metrics  include  models,  simulations,  reference  implementations,  test  suites, 
and testbeds. 

Specific activities in support of health information technology include: 

HIMSS/IHE: A key problem today in the realization of electronic health records 
for  the  patient’s  continuity  of  care  is  the  inability  to  share  patient  records 
across  disparate  enterprises.  To  address  this  problem,  NIST  is  collaborating 
with  industry  to  develop  standardized  approaches  to  sharing  electronic  clinical 
documents across healthcare organizations and providers. NIST staff have built 
reference  implementations  and  developed  validation  tools  to  demonstrate  the 
feasibility  and  correctness  of  implementations,  and  worked  with  implementers 
to  create  integrated  solutions  based  on  these  approaches.  In  particular,  NIST 
is  collaborating  with  the  ‘‘Integrating  the  Healthcare  Enterprise’’  (IHE)  project 
sponsored by the Radiological Society of North America, Healthcare Information 
and Management Systems Society (HIMSS) and the American College of Cardi-
ology.  The  goal  is  to  develop  an  approach  called:  Cross-Enterprise  Document 
Sharing (XDS). This standards-based approach provides a mechanism to access 
a patient’s multi-faceted clinical information, regardless of where it is physically 
located,  while  maintaining  local  control  and  ownership  of  that  information  and 
without  compromising  the  privacy  and  security  of  the  patient’s  clinical  history. 
HL7:  Health  Level  7  is  a  standards  development  organization  that  provides 
standards  for  the  exchange,  management  and  integration  of  data  that  support 
clinical patient care and the management, delivery and evaluation of healthcare 
services. NIST is collaborating with HL7 in defining standard functionality and 
conformance  criteria  for  EHR  systems.  These  criteria  form  the  basis  for  EHR 
certification efforts and will help ensure that HL7 messaging and EHR systems’ 
conformance can be defined and measured at an appropriate level. NIST is also 
developing  a  conformance-testing  tool  that  automatically  generates  test  mes-
sages for HL7 Version 2 message specifications. 
IEEE  Medical  Device  Information:  In  a  typical  intensive  care  unit  (ICU),  a  pa-
tient may be connected to one or more vital-sign monitors and receive medicine 
or  other  fluids  through  multiple  infusion  pumps.  More  acutely-ill  patients  may 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

fusion,  virtual  reality,  workflow 

also  be  supported  by  devices  such  as  ventilators,  defibrillators  or  hemodialysis 
machines.  Each  of  these  medical  devices  has  the  ability  to  capture  volumes  of 
data, available multiple times per second. NIST is collaborating with the IEEE 
Medical Device Communications working group in developing conformance tests 
and  associated  tools  to  provide  the  medical  device  industry  with  the  necessary 
tools  to  ensure  that  critical  devices  properly  implement  the  medical  device 
standards. 
Operating Room of the Future: It is estimated that 10–20 percent of hospital er-
rors  occur  in  the  perioperative  environment  (before,  during,  and  after  surgery). 
Technology can play a major role in increasing the overall patient safety in such 
situations  through  the  development  of  the  operating  room  of  the  future  (ORF). 
The  ORF  will  consist  of  a  network  of  interoperable  plug  and  play  medical  de-
vices, where the utilization of advanced technologies, such as robot-assisted sur-
gery,  sensor 
integration,  and  surgical 
informatics, will result in a higher quality of healthcare by considerably increas-
ing patient safety. NIST is working with the Center for the Integration of Medi-
cine  and  Information  Technology  (CIMIT)  in  the  development  of  an  architec-
tural framework for medical device integration, development of clinical require-
ments  for  device  plug-and-play  standards,  identification  of  current  interfaces, 
and development, testing and simulation of interfaces. 
Clinical  Informatics:  Building  on  past  experience  in  information  modeling  and 
research  to  support  interchange  standards  for  the  manufacturing  industry, 
NIST  is  preparing  a  comprehensive  report  of  all  clinical  information-oriented 
standards,  their  development  organizations,  their  scope  and  the  vocabularies/ 
ontologies  they  employ.  NIST  will  use  the  report  as  the  basis  for  developing  a 
plan  for  applying  NIST’s  experience  to  assist  in  clinical  information-oriented 
standards development and closer harmonization. 
Improved  Internet  Protocols:  The  Internet  Engineering  Task  Force  (IETF)  is  a 
large,  open  international  community  of  network  designers,  operators,  vendors, 
and  researchers  concerned  with  the  evolution  of  the  Internet  architecture  and 
the smooth operation of the Internet. NIST is actively participating in IETF ef-
forts in the areas of: IP security, key management, Internet Protocol version 6, 
integrated  services  and  resource  reservation,  IP  switching,  advanced  routing 
and mobile ad hoc networks. NIST leads the IETF effort to develop and deploy 
a  secure  Internet  naming  and  routing  infrastructure.  NIST  metrics  are  used 
within  this  premier  organization  to  expedite  the  development  and  deployment 
of  standardized  Internet  infrastructure  protection  technologies.  A  secure  infra-
structure  is  an  absolute  first  step  in  developing  a  National  Health  Information 
Network that can assure the confidentiality of electronic patient records. 
WPAN’s  for  Health  Information:  NIST  is  assisting  industry  in  the  development 
of  an  universal  and  interoperable  wireless  interface  for  medical  equipment,  ex-
pediting the development of standards for wireless technologies, and promoting 
their  use  in  the  healthcare  environment.  In  close  collaboration  with  the  Insti-
tute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) and the U.S. Food and Drug 
Administration, NIST developed theoretical and simulation models for two can-
didate  Wireless  Personal  Area  Network  (WPAN)  technologies  including  the 
Bluetooth  and  the  IEEE  802.15.4  specifications.  NIST  evaluated  their  perform-
ance for several realistic healthcare scenarios and contributed our results to the 
appropriate  IEEE  working  group.  NIST  contributions  will  constitute  the  basis 
of standard requirements on the use of wireless communications for medical de-
vices. 

(c) Certification 

NIST  has  an  established  history  of  developing  procedures  for  certifying  conform-
ance  to  consensus-based  standards.  Conformity  assessment  activities  form  a  vital 
link  between  standards,  which  define  necessary  characteristics  or  requirements  for 
software  products,  and  the  performance  of  the  products  themselves.  Conformity  as-
sessment procedures provide a means of ensuring that the products, services, or sys-
tems produced or operated have the required characteristics, and that these charac-
teristics are consistent from product to product, service to service, or system to sys-
tem. Conformity assessment includes: sampling and testing; inspection; certification; 
management system assessment and registration; accreditation of the competence of 
those  activities  and  recognition  of  an  accreditation  program’s  capability.  NIST  has 
been  in  the  certification  business  since  its  inception  in  2001,  and  is  well  positioned 
to  provide  technical  guidance  in  the  development  of  a  technical  certification  regi-
men, including specific certification metrics, software to perform comprehensive cer-
tification tests, and certification procedures. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

(d) Security 

34 

For  many  years,  NIST  has  made  great  contributions  to  help  secure  our  Nation’s 
sensitive  information  and  information  systems.  Our  work  has  paralleled  the  evo-
lution  of  IT  systems,  initially  focused  principally  on  mainframe  computers,  now  en-
compassing today’s wide gamut of information technology devices. Our important re-
sponsibilities were re-affirmed by Congress with passage of the Federal Information 
Security  Management  Act  (FISMA)  of  2002  and  the  Cyber  Security  Research  and 
Development Act of 2002. 

Beyond  our  role  to  serve  the  Federal  Agencies  under  FISMA,  our  FIP  standards 
and guidelines are often voluntarily used by U.S. industry, global industry, and for-
eign  governments  as  sources  of  information  and  direction  for  securing  information 
systems.  Our  research  also  contributes  to  securing  the  Nation’s  critical  infrastruc-
ture systems. Moreover, NIST has an active role in both national and international 
standards  organizations  in  promoting  the  interests  of  security  and  U.S.  industry. 
Current areas that are applicable to the NHIN include: 

• Security Management and Guidance; 
• Cryptographic Standards and Applications; 
• Security Testing; and 
• Security Research/Emerging Technologies. 
Recent activities specifically related to health IT include: 

Guidance for Understanding the HIPAA Security Rule: The Security Rule issued 
under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) 
directs certain health care entities, known as ‘‘covered entities,’’ to comply with 
standards  for  keeping  certain  health  information  that  is  in  secure  electronic 
form.  NIST  has  published  a  document,  An  Introductory  Resource  Guide  for  Im-
plementing  the  HIPAA  Security  Rule  that  summarizes  and  clarifies  the  HIPAA 
Security  Rule  requirements  for  Federal  agencies  that  are  covered  entities.  It 
also  directs  readers  to  other  NIST  publications  that  can  be  useful  in  imple-
menting the Security Rule. 
Healthcare Accreditation Guidance: NIST in conjunction with URAC (not an ac-
ronym) and the Workgroup of Electronic Data Interchange (WEDI) sponsors the 
NIST/URAC/WEDI  Health  Care  Security  Workgroup.  The  group  promotes  the 
implementation of a uniform approach to security practices and assessments by 
developing  white  papers,  crosswalks  (of  regulations  and  standards),  and  edu-
cational  programs.  The  group  brings  together  stakeholders  from  the  public  and 
private  sectors  to  facilitate  communication  and  consensus  on  best  practices  for 
information security in healthcare. Ultimately, these best practices will be inte-
grated  into  accreditation  criteria  used  by  hospitals  and  other  healthcare  facili-
ties.  The  group  draws  heavily  upon  information  technology  security  standards 
and guidelines developed by NIST. 

Clinical Decision Support 

In addition to our contributions to building a NHIN, NIST is developing measure-
ments and technologies that can be used in providing advanced clinical decision sup-
port.  Doctors  rely  on  diagnostic  tests  to  optimize  patient  care.  Many  of  these  tests 
owe their high accuracy to a variety of NIST standards, measurements, and calibra-
tions. These measurements are essential for patient care and the most efficient use 
of available health care funds. NIST is contributing to increased efficiency in health 
care  delivery  by  ensuring  that  the  measurement  quality  assurance  tools—reference 
measurement methods, certified reference materials and calibrations—are available 
and well integrated in the NHIN. Some examples of NIST work include: 

• In Vitro Diagnostic Medical Device Measurements; 
• Standard Reference Materials for Clinical Diagnostic Markers; 
• Joint Committee on Traceability in Laboratory Medicine; 
• Gene Expression Analysis; 
• Point-of-Care Testing; and 
• Analytical Information Exchange. 

Conclusion 

As the Committee can see by the few examples I have cited, NIST has a very di-
verse portfolio of activities supporting our Nation’s health information technology ef-
fort.  With  its  long  experience  as  well  as  a  diverse  array  of  expertise,  NIST  is  able 
to assist the Department of Health and Human Services in achieving the President’s 
goal  and  respond  meeting  both  the  short-term  and  long-term  needs  of  the  Nation-
wide Health Information Network. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Once  again  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  about  NIST’s  activities,  and  I 

would be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. 
Dr. Kolodner. 

STATEMENT  OF  ROBERT  M.  KOLODNER,  M.D.,  ACTING  CHIEF 
INFORMATICS  OFFICER,  VETERANS  HEALTH 

HEALTH 
ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS 
Dr.  KOLODNER.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  Good  morning,  Mr. 
Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee. Thank you for invit-
ing  VA  here  today  to  discuss  our  work  in  the  field  of  health  infor-
mation  technology.  Dr.  Jonathan  Perlin,  VA’s  Under  Secretary  for 
Health,  regrets  that  he  is  unable  to  be  with  you  today,  and  has 
asked  me  to  talk  with  you  on  his  behalf  about  VA’s  successes  in 
the  area  of  health  IT.  VA’s  electronic  health  record  system,  known 
as  VistA,  is  recognized  as  one  of  the  most  comprehensive  and  so-
phisticated  electronic  health  records,  or  EHRs,  in  use  today.  As  a 
doctor and as a patient, I am passionate about the use of this tech-
nology and the very real effects it can have on patients’ lives. It can 
mean the difference between life and death. 

In  addition  to  describing,  and  then  actually  showing,  VistA  I 
want to reinforce two areas that I think are pivotal to the success-
ful widespread adoption of electronic health records, and have been 
mentioned  here  today;  and  those  are  interoperability  and  data 
standardization.  In  VA  today,  virtually  all  clinical  documents  cre-
ated  by  VA  providers  are  stored  in  VistA.  To  give  you  an  idea  of 
the  magnitude  of  data  now  available;  there  are  over  650  million 
progress notes, discharge summaries, and other clinical documents, 
more  than  1.3  billion  orders,  and  300  million  images  in  VistA  as 
of March 2005. 

An  estimated  40  percent  of  veterans  treated  by  VA  each  year 
also  receive  care  from  non-VA  health  providers.  Just  imagine  the 
benefit  to  veterans  when  VA  is  able  to  exchange  electronic  health 
data  with  their  other  doctors  in  real  time,  appropriately  and  se-
curely,  so  that  their  complete  health  information  is  available  re-
gardless of where the veterans seek care. Interoperability of health 
information  systems  is  crucial,  and  we  need  to  make  sure  that  we 
share  not  only  data  but  meaning,  which  brings  us  to  data  stand-
ardization. 

We’re  working  with  our  public-  and  private-sector  health  part-
ners on a variety of standards-related activities, as mentioned pre-
viously,  and  these  also  include  key  collaborations  with  FDA  and 
the  National  Library  of  Medicine  on  drug  information  standards. 
Our  standardization  efforts  have  already  improved  our  ability  to 
share  information  with  other  agencies.  For  example,  we  can  now 
share selected health information back and forth with DoD in real- 
time.  And  by  this  fall,  we  will  be  performing  immediate  drug-al-
lergy and drug-drug checks on all outpatient medications a veteran 
receives  from  either  VA  or  DoD.  Use  of  health  data  standards  is 
crucial. 

Before  I  demonstrate  our  current  VistA  system,  I  just  want  to 
briefly  mention  our  next-generation  health  information  system, 
HealtheVet-VistA, which will build on our successful VistA system. 
Like VistA, this software will be in the public domain. This means 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

that  providers,  other  Federal,  state,  and  local  agencies,  and  small 
medical practices, as well as the EHR system vendors can leverage 
our  country’s  investment  in  VA’s  world-class  EHR.  HealtheVet- 
VistA,  along  with  my  HealtheVet,  which  is  a  personal  record  we 
provide  for  use  directly  by  veterans,  will  help  us  to  continue  to 
transform  VA’s  healthcare  system  from  being  organization-centric 
to being truly patient-centric. 

We  in  VA  look  forward  to  sharing  our  systems,  knowledge,  and 
expertise  with  our  partners  throughout  the  healthcare  community 
to  contribute  to  and  support  the  President’s  plan  for  transforming 
healthcare  in  the  U.S.  I  know  that  I  can’t  do  our  EHR  justice  just 
by talking about it. So I would like to show you how it works. 

I  have  on  this  laptop  the  entire  VistA  system  that  runs  in  hos-
pitals across the Nation, as well as an imaging system. I’ve opened 
here the application called ‘‘CPRS.’’ That’s the electronic chart that 
our  providers  use  whenever  they’re  taking  care  of  the  patients. 
When  I’ve  signed  on,  the  system  gives  me  notifications  that  are 
specific to me—notes that I need to sign or abnormal results I need 
to follow up on. The information I’m going to share with you is real 
patient  data,  but  it  has  been  scrubbed  so  there  is  no  patient  iden-
tity—it’s  protected.  And  we’re  going  to  start  by  looking  at  Mr. 
Madl’s  chart.  When  I  select  Mr.  Madl,  I  have  a  screen  that  looks 
like  a  chart  that  you  might  have  on  paper—that  is,  it  has  tabs 
across  the  bottom—so  physicians  are  familiar  with  the  structure. 
And I can open up a cover sheet that has lots of information. From 
the information on this sheet, I can drill down and get information 
directly  on  diagnosis  or  medications.  And  where  it  becomes  more 
useful is when I bring up the patient’s vital signs—in this case, the 
blood  pressure.  I  can  immediately  graph  years  and  years  of  data, 
and  engage  the  patient  by  actually  having  the  patient  look  at  the 
screen together with me. And I can talk to Mr. Madl about the in-
crease in his blood pressure and why we need to get this under con-
trol. And it’s very clear to him that his blood pressure has been ris-
ing,  and  I  can  engage  him  much  more  effectively  in  terms  of  his 
care. 

Mr.  Madl  is  here  today  because  of  something  that  is  reflected  in 
his  abnormal  blood  results.  I  can  look  quickly  at  what  that  blood 
work  is.  I’m  going  to  bring  up  his  hematocrit,  his  red  count,  and 
look  at  all  the  results  and  review  his  record.  You  can  see  the  nor-
mal  range  at  the  top  here.  Mr.  Madl  has  been  anemic  most  of  his 
life. But there are a couple of episodes where his blood count drops 
even  more  dramatically.  You  can  notice  a  rapid  drop  and  a  rapid 
rise, since the body can’t make the red cell count that is increasing 
quickly.  That  means  he’s  received  a  blood  transfusion  on  at  least 
two  occasions  during  this  episode.  So  we’re  looking  for  where  Mr. 
Madl  is  bleeding.  We  can  do  something  else  that  is  unique  to  VA 
and  that  is  open  up  images.  This  can  include  everything  that  can 
be imaged. It can be records from another hospital; it can be papers 
the  patient  signs,  or  in  this  case  we  can  actually  look  at  his 
colonoscopy  and  see  that  he  has  diverticulosis.  These  are  blind 
alleys  in  his  colon,  but  more  importantly,  he  actually  has  bleeding 
while  we’re  doing  the  colonoscopy.  As  I  mentioned,  this  was  a  real 
case.  In  1992  before  we  had  our  PACS  systems—our  radiology  im-
ages—this  was  the  film  that  was  collected  on  what’s  called  an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

angiography study, where dye is injected into the arteries. We look 
for where the blood vessels are not sharp and the bleeding is occur-
ring. When we put the X-ray up against the light box, we were not 
able  to  find  where  the  bleeding  was.  One  of  the  physician  assist-
ants said, ‘‘Wait a minute. We’ve got this new-fangled imaging sys-
tem. Can we use it? ’’ So they scanned in the X-ray, and this is the 
image  of  the  scanned  piece  of  film.  You  say,  ‘‘OK  it’s  a  scanned 
piece  of  film.  What  can  you  do  with  it? ’’  Well,  once  it’s  electronic, 
you actually can manipulate it very nicely. You can adjust the con-
trast  as  I  am  doing  now.  If  you  want  to  look  at  the  boney  struc-
tures  in  the  spine,  you  can  change  the  contrast  to  see  the  bones 
better.  But  today  we’re  looking  for  where  the  bleeding  is,  so  we 
look  out  into  these  areas  near  the  sides.  We’re  looking  for  a  fuzzy 
area.  By  inverting  the  image,  we  can  see  over  here  where  a  blood 
vessel’s  a  little  fuzzy.  Let  me  zoom  in  so  you  can  see  where  the 
bleeding  was.  The  treatment  team  was  able  to  locate  it  because  of 
this technology and stop the bleeding for this particular veteran. 

Let me just show you one more patient. This is Mr. Green. We’ll 
select  Mr.  Green,  and  bring  up  his  chart  very  quickly.  You  notice 
that the veteran’s picture changes. This gentlemen may look famil-
iar  to  you,  probably  a  relationship  in  the  past.  Mr.  Green  came  to 
the VA for a different reason. 

We  talked  about  safety,  and  the  importance  of  saving  lives.  For 
Mr. Green, we went to prescribe a medication for him—in this case, 
penicillin. I entered all of the necessary dosage information to order 
the  penicillin.  When  I  went  to  accept  the  order,  CPRS  displays  a 
warning  to  me,  because  Mr.  Green  is  allergic  to  penicillin.  It  has 
now  stopped  me  from  giving  him  medication  that  he  is  allergic  to. 
Today,  Mr.  Green  is  here  because  of  chest  pain.  If  you  look  at 
his progress notes, we can see one with a little icon. When we open 
up  the  note,  it  brings  up  the  associated  images.  Mr.  Green  had  a 
cardiac catheterization. At any of the PCs throughout the hospital, 
and  soon  across  the  country,  Mr.  Green’s  cardiac  angiography  can 
be retrieved and viewed. What’s important is that the study shows 
us  where  the  narrowing  is,  and  why  Mr.  Green  is  having  chest 
pain.  We  can  then  do  the  corrective  procedure,  in  this  case  a  bal-
loon  angioplasty.  You  can  see  the  balloon  in  place  in  this  picture. 
Finally, we can see following that procedure that the blood vessels 
are now open, and Mr. Green can go on without the chest pain. 

As a follow-up, in his next clinic visit, we can show these images 
to  Mr.  Green,  explain  to  him  why  it  is  important  for  him  to  follow 
his diet, for him to take his medicine, and exercise. Again, it is that 
teachable  moment  that  we  have  for  helping  Mr.  Green  to  lead  a 
better, safer life. 

Mr.  Chairman,  that’s  the  end  of  my  remarks.  I  look  forward  to 

any questions you might have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Kolodner follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT M.  KOLODNER,  M.D.,  ACTING CHIEF HEALTH 
INFORMATICS OFFICER,  VETERANS HEALTH ADMINISTRATION,  DEPARTMENT OF 
VETERANS AFFAIRS 
Good Morning, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee. 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today  to  discuss  our  work  in  the  field  of  health 

information technology. 

One  year  ago,  Dr.  Jonathan  B.  Perlin,  M.D.,  Ph.D.,  MSHA,  FACP,  Under  Sec-
retary for Health, Department of Veterans Affairs, appeared before the House Com-
mittee  on  Veterans’  Affairs,  Subcommittee  on  Oversight  and  Investigations  to  dis-
cuss  the  importance  of  electronic  health  records  and  the  role  of  the  Department  of 
Veterans  Affairs  (VA)  in  the  development,  use,  and  sharing  of  this  valuable  tech-
nology.  President  Bush  had  just  outlined  an  ambitious  plan  to  ensure  that  most 
Americans  have  electronic  health  records  within  10  years.  The  President  noted  a 
range  of  benefits  possible  with  the  expanded  use  of  information  technology,  includ-
ing  reduced  costs;  improved  health  care  quality;  reduced  frequency  of  medical  er-
rors;  advancements  in  the  delivery  of  appropriate,  evidence-based  medical  care; 
greater  coordination  of  care  among  different  providers;  and  increased  privacy  and 
security protections for personal health information. 

A lot has happened in the field of health information technology in the year since 
the  President’s  call  to  action  announced  at  the  VA  Maryland  Health  Care  System 
in  April  2004,  and  discussions  about  the  potential  of  electronic  health  records  have 
become part of the national conversation. I have included, for the record, a brochure 
that highlights President Bush’s April visit to the Baltimore VA Medical Center. 

Today I’d like to talk about VA’s leadership in the field of health information tech-
nology, and tell you about our next-generation health information system, known as 
HealtheVet. I’d also like to highlight our work in three areas that I think are pivotal 
to  the  broader,  successful  adoption  of  electronic  health  records:  data  standardiza-
tion, interoperability, and privacy. 
A History of Innovation 

With  one  of  the  most  comprehensive  electronic  health  record  (EHR)  systems  in 
use today, VA is a recognized leader in the development and use of EHRs and other 
information  technology  tools.  VA’s  work  in  health  information  technology  goes  back 
almost  30  years,  when  VA  created  the  Decentralized  Hospital  Computer  Program 
(DHCP),  one  of  the  first  automated  health  information  systems  ever  developed  to 
support  multiple  sites  and  cover  the  full  range  of  health  care  settings.  VA  has  con-
tinued to lead the health care community in the development of new health IT tools, 
building  on  the  foundation  of  DHCP  to  create  the  VistA  system  in  use  today—a 
suite  of  over  100  applications  which  support  the  day-to-day  clinical,  financial,  and 
administrative functions of the Veterans Health Administration (VHA). These appli-
cations form the foundation of VistA—the Veterans Health Information Systems and 
Technology Architecture, the automated health information system used throughout 
VHA. 

Many VistA enhancements were designed to support the transformation of the VA 
health system over the past decade, as VA shifted its emphasis from inpatient care 
to outpatient care, and introduced performance measures and performance-based ac-
countability  throughout  its  health  care  system.  In  the  mid-1990s,  VHA  embarked 
on  an  ambitious  effort  to  improve  the  coordination  of  care  by  providing  integrated 
access  to  these  applications  through  implementation  of  an  electronic  health  record, 
known  as  the  Computerized  Patient  Record  System  or  CPRS.  CPRS  provides  a 
graphical user interface, or GUI, to the information captured in VistA. 

With CPRS, providers can access patient information at the point of care—across 
multiple  sites  and  clinical  disciplines.  CPRS  provides  a  single  interface  through 
which  providers  can  update  a  patient’s  medical  history,  place  a  variety  of  orders, 
and  review  test  results  and  drug  prescriptions.  The  system  has  been  implemented 
at all VA medical centers and at VA outpatient clinics, long-term care facilities, and 
domiciliaries—1,300 sites of care throughout VHA. 
The Benefits of Electronic Health Records 

Electronic health records, or EHRs, are appealing for a number of reasons, includ-
ing  convenience,  availability,  and  portability.  The  most  compelling  reason  to  use  in-
formation technology in health care is that it helps us provide better, safer, more con-
sistent  care  to  all  patients.  The  President  referred  to  an  oft-cited  1999  report  in 
which  the  Institute  of  Medicine  (IOM)  estimated  that  between  44,000  and  98,000 
Americans die each year due to medical errors. Many more die or suffer permanent 
disabilities  because  of  inappropriate  or  missed  treatments  in  ambulatory  care  set-
tings.  IOM  cited  the  development  of  an  electronic  health  record  as  essential  for  re-
ducing  these  numbers  and  improving  the  safety  of  health  care.  In  its  2002  publica-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

tion,  Leadership  by  Example,  IOM  noted  that  ‘‘[c]omputerized  order  entry  and  elec-
tronic  medical  records  have  been  found  to  result  in  measurably  improved  health 
care and better outcomes for patients.’’ 

How  can  EHRs  improve  patient  safety  and  quality  of  care?  First,  with  an  EHR, 
all  relevant  information  is  available  to  clinicians  when  they  need  it,  where  they 
need  it—and  it’s  legible.  A  provider  can  quickly  review  information  from  previous 
visits,  have  ready  access  to  clinical  guidelines,  and  survey  research  results  to  find 
the latest treatments and medications. All of this information is available wherever 
patients are seen—in acute settings, clinics, examining rooms, nursing stations, and 
offices. 

Many  of  us  see  different  doctors  for  different  medical  conditions.  How  many  of 
these  physicians  have  access  to  all  of  the  information  that  has  been  collected  over 
the course of these visits? In VHA, patient records from multiple sites and different 
providers  can  be  viewed  at  the  same  time  at  the  point  of  care.  This  is  simply  not 
possible with paper records. 

In  addition  to  making  medical  records  more  accessible,  EHRs  can  help  clinicians 
better document the reasons a patient sought care and the treatment that was pro-
vided. Given the time constraints they face, many physicians resort to writing brief, 
sometimes  cryptic  notes  in  a  patient’s  chart,  and  then  write  more  complete  docu-
mentation  when  they  have  time.  EHRs  enable  clinicians  to  document  care  quickly 
and thoroughly, and can provide reminders based on the specific medical conditions 
and test results that have been documented. 

CPRS, for example, allows clinicians to enter progress notes, diagnoses, and treat-
ments  for  each  encounter,  as  well  as  discharge  summaries  for  hospitalizations.  Cli-
nicians can easily order lab tests, medications, diets, radiology tests, and procedures 
electronically; record a patient’s allergies or adverse reactions to medications; or re-
quest and track consults with other providers. 

Even if we could transfer paper records quickly and reliably from one provider to 
another,  and  make  sure  that  the  information  in  records  was  complete,  many  hard- 
copy  patient  records  simply  contain  too  much  information  for  a  clinician  to  sift 
through  effectively.  There  is  always  the  possibility  that  something  crucial  could  be 
missed. When health information is stored electronically, however, we can make use 
of  software  tools  to  analyze  that  information  in  real-time.  We  can  target  relevant 
information  quickly,  compare  results,  and  use  built-in  order  checks  and  reminders 
to support clinical decisionmaking. These capabilities promote safer, more complete, 
more systematic care. 

Consider  the  benefits  we  have  seen  in  VHA  in  the  area  of  medication  ordering. 
When orders for medications are handwritten or given verbally, errors and mistakes 
inevitably  occur.  However,  when  physicians  use  computerized  order-entry  systems 
to  enter  medication  orders  electronically,  errors  caused  by  illegible  handwriting  or 
misinterpretation  of  dosages,  strengths,  or  medication  names  are  virtually  elimi-
nated.  CPRS  includes  automated  checks  for  drug-drug  or  drug-allergy  interactions, 
alerting  the  prescribing  physician  when  potentially  dangerous  combinations  occur. 
Currently, 94 percent of all VHA medication orders are entered by the ordering pro-
vider directly into VistA using CPRS. 

Information  technology  can  also  serve  to  reduce  the  number  of  errors  that  occur 
when  medications  are  given  to  a  patient.  VHA’s  Bar  Code  Medication  Administra-
tion  system  (BCMA)  is  designed  to  ensure  that  each  patient  receives  the  correct 
medication, in the correct dose, at the correct time. In addition, the system reduces 
reliance  on  human  short-term  memory  by  providing  real-time  access  to  medication 
order information at the patient’s bedside. 

BCMA provides visual alerts—prior to administration of a medication—if the cor-
rect conditions are not met. For example, alerts signal the nurse when the software 
detects  a  wrong  patient,  wrong  time,  wrong  medication,  wrong  dose,  or  no  active 
medication  order.  These  alerts  require  the  nurse  to  review  and  correct  the  reason 
for the alert before actually administering the drug to the patient. Changes in medi-
cation orders are communicated instantaneously to the nurse administering medica-
tions,  eliminating  the  dependence  on  verbal  or  handwritten  communication  to  con-
vey  these  order  changes.  Time  delays  are  avoided,  and  administration  accuracy  is 
improved. 

BCMA also provides a system of reports to remind clinical staff when medications 
need  to  be  administered  or  have  been  overlooked,  or  when  the  effectiveness  of  ad-
ministered doses should be assessed. The system also alerts staff to potential aller-
gies, adverse reactions, and special instructions concerning a medication order, and 
order changes that require action. 

The VistA Imaging system is another application which has extended the capabili-
ties  of  VistA  and  CPRS.  VistA  Imaging  stores  medical  images  such  as  x-rays,  pa-
thology  slides,  scanned  documents,  cardiology  exam  results,  wound  photos,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

endoscopies  directly  into  the  patient  record  as  soon  as  they  become  available,  pro-
viding  clinicians  with  additional  information  essential  for  diagnosis  and  treatment. 
I  have  used  VA’s  electronic  health  record  system  for  years.  As  a  doctor—and  as 
a patient—I am very enthusiastic about the benefits of this technology. I don’t think 
I  can  fully  do  the  system  justice  by  talking  about  it.  I’d  like  to  show  you  how  it 
works. 

[Demonstration] 

The Importance of Standards 

The richness of VA’s EHR is evident, in terms of both clinical features and health 
data. Imagine the benefits of sharing this data—appropriately and securely—among 
VA’s  health  delivery  partners,  so  that  relevant  health  information  would  be  avail-
able  regardless  of  where  a  veteran  sought  care.  As  we  move  toward  this  goal,  we 
need  to  make  sure  that  we  share  not  only  data,  but  meaning.  And  to  do  this,  we 
need health data standards. 

Virtually  all  clinical  documents  created  by  VA  providers  are  stored  in  the  EHR, 
and data from commercial medical devices can be transmitted automatically directly 
into  a  patient’s  health  record.  To  give  you  a  sense  of  the  magnitude  of  EHR  use  in 
VA,  let  me  give  you  some  round  numbers:  As  of  March  2005,  VA’s  VistA  systems 
contained 658 million progress notes, discharge summaries, and other clinical docu-
ments;  1.35  billion  orders,  and  300  million  images.  More  than  550  thousand  new 
clinical  documents,  910  thousand  orders,  and  475  thousand  images  are  added  each 
workday - a wealth of information for the clinician. 

And yet, with an electronic health record—as with a paper record—more informa-
tion  isn’t  always  better  if  we  can’t  use  it.  How  can  we  be  sure  we  can  take  full  ad-
vantage  of  the  voluminous  information  we  collect  in  the  EHR?  The  key  is  data 
standardization. 

There’s  an  old  joke  in  the  standards  field:  ‘‘The  great  thing  about  standards  is 
that there are so many to choose from.’’ For nearly every kind of clinical data—from 
diseases, procedures, and immunizations, to drugs, lab results, and digital images— 
there are multiple sets of standards to choose from. For example, there are at least 
12  separate  systems  for  naming  medications,  and  the  ingredients,  dosages,  and 
routes of administration associated with them. 

It  is  often  necessary  to  use  a  combination  of  data  standards  to  transmit  a  single 
message  from  one  system  to  another.  Even  health  care  organizations  committed  to 
using standards have a difficult time figuring out which standards to use. 

Consolidated  Health  Informatics  (CHI)  is  an  eGov  initiative  involving  Federal 
agencies  with  responsibility  for  health-related  activities.  CHI  participants  evaluate 
and  choose  health  data  and  communication  standards  to  be  incorporated  into  their 
future health IT systems. VA was instrumental in the formation of CHI, and works 
closely  with  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  and  the  Department  of  Health  and 
Human  Services  (HHS)  to  help  foster  the  Federal  adoption  of  the  agreed-upon 
standards  as  part  of  a  joint  strategy  for  developing  Federal  interoperability  of  elec-
tronic  health  information.  To  date,  CHI  has  endorsed  20  communications  and  data 
standards  in  areas  such  as  laboratory,  radiology,  pharmacy,  encounters,  diagnoses, 
nursing information, and drug information standards developed through a collabora-
tion between VA and HHS. 

Within VA, we have established a formal program to coordinate the adoption, im-
plementation,  and  verification  of  health  data  standards  across  all  sites  of  care.  We 
also  work  with  external  Standards  Development  Organizations  (SDOs)  to  augment 
and  refine  available  standards  to  ensure  that  they  meet  health  care  delivery  needs 
in VA and elsewhere. The work involved in adopting and implementing data stand-
ards  is  deliberative  and  difficult.  It  requires  collaboration  among  clinicians,  health 
information  professionals,  developers,  and  business  process  experts.  Yet,  the  use  of 
data standards can have a very real effect on a patient’s care. 

When  VA  developed  its  first  EHR,  the  technological  environment  in  VA  hos-
pitals—as  in  other  hospitals  at  the  time—was  very  different  from  the  environment 
today. There was not a computer on every desk. There were no graphical user inter-
faces,  only  text-based  displays  on  ‘‘dumb  terminals.’’  There  were  no  multi-color 
screens, no Windows, no pull-down menus. No one had a mouse. When you wanted 
to  enter  data  in  an  electronic  health  record,  you  didn’t  point-and-click,  you  typed. 
For example, when a clinician wanted to document a patient’s allergy to penicillin, 
he typed the word ‘‘penicillin’’ in the allergy section of the patient’s electronic health 
record.  To  save  time,  many  clinicians  entered  ‘‘PCN’’,  a  common  abbreviation  for 
penicillin. 

As part of our data standardization effort, we went back and looked at the allergy 
data  that  had  been  collected  over  the  years.  We  found  that  ‘‘penicillin’’  and  ‘‘PCN’’ 
had  been  typed  in  more  than  75,000  times.  We  also  found  thousands  of  entries  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

which penicillin had been misspelled. Not only is it a waste of time to type the same 
information over and over, it introduces a potential patient-safety issue. Let me give 
you an example. 

Suppose a veteran comes in for a check-up and tells the physician that he is aller-
gic  to  sulfa  drugs.  The  physician  enters  this  information  in  the  patient’s  record 
under  allergies,  but  because  he  is  typing  quickly,  he  inadvertently  misspells  the 
word 
‘‘sulfa’’.  Suppose  that  on  a  subsequent  visit,  another  clinician  orders 
Sulfamethoprim,  which  is  a  type  of  sulfa  drug.  When  a  clinician  orders  a  medica-
tion, CPRS checks the patient’s record to see if the patient is allergic to the medica-
tion.  Although  the  system  checks  for  common  misspellings,  it  can’t  predict  every 
possible misspelling of every medication. In this case, CPRS might not alert the sec-
ond physician that he had ordered a drug the patient was allergic to, simply because 
the  word  ‘‘sulfa’’  was  misspelled  when  it  was  entered  by  the  first  physician.  By 
eliminating  misspellings  and  establishing  a  standard  vocabulary  across  sites,  we 
will  ensure  that  medication  order  checks  work  as  intended,  and  that  the  EHR  sup-
ports patient safety and clinical decisionmaking to the fullest extent. 
Data Standards and Interoperability 

The  use  of  electronic  health  records  and  other  information  technology  tools  in  a 
single medical office can improve health care quality, reduce medical errors, improve 
efficiency, and reduce costs for the patients treated there. However, as the President 
noted a year ago, the full benefits of IT will be realized when we have a coordinated, 
national  infrastructure  to  accelerate  the  broader  adoption  of  health  information 
technology. 

The  problems  created  by  a  lack  of  standardized  data  are  magnified  when  inter-
acting with other organizations. Even seemingly straightforward information can be 
misconstrued when it is interpreted by different organizations. 

Consider  two  simple  terms:  yes  and  no.  In  many  computer  systems,  the  number 
‘‘1’’  is  used  to  indicate  ‘‘yes’’,  and  the  number  ‘‘2’’  is  used  to  indicate  ‘‘no’’.  In  some 
systems, it is reversed: ‘‘1’’ means ‘‘no’’, and ‘‘2’’ means ‘‘yes’’. Some systems use ‘‘0’’ 
and  ‘‘1’’,  instead  of  ‘‘1’’  and  ‘‘2’’.  In  still  other  systems,  ‘‘Y’’  is  used  to  indicate  ‘‘yes’’, 
and  ‘‘N’’  is  used  to  indicate  ‘‘no’’.  Sometimes  lowercase  ‘‘y’’  and  ‘‘n’’  are  used.  Some-
times,  ‘‘yes’’  is  actually  stored  as  ‘‘y-e-s’’,  and  ‘‘no  as  ‘‘n-o’’.  In  VA,  we  found  30  dif-
ferent combinations of codes for ‘‘yes’’ and ‘‘no’’, stored in nearly 4,000 different data 
fields. We can standardize our representation of ‘‘yes’’ and ‘no’’ within VA computer 
systems, but unless our healthcare partners employ the same standards to exchange 
data with us, we cannot be sure that we are conveying the intended meaning of the 
data we are exchanging. 

The  Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology 
(ONCHIT)  recognizes  the  importance  of  data  and  communications  standards  in  de-
veloping  a  comprehensive  network  of  interoperable  health  information  systems 
across  the  public  and  private  sectors.  Without  data  standards,  we  might  be  able  to 
exchange  health  information,  as  we  do  now  when  we  copy  and  send  paper  records, 
but  we  won’t  be  able  to  use  it  as  effectively  to  deliver  safer,  higher-quality  care 
using  clinical  alerts  and  reminders.  True  interoperability  between  providers  simply 
cannot be achieved without data standardization. 

VHA  has  a  long  history  of  participation  in  standards  development  organizations. 
As a health care provider and early adopter of health IT on a large scale, VHA fre-
quently identifies areas for standards development and works with other public- and 
private-sector  organizations  to  develop  consensus-based  solutions.  HHS  Secretary 
Mike Leavitt recently announced the formation of the American Health Information 
Community. ONCHIT has released a Request for Proposal calling for standards har-
monization. This effort will foster a more cohesive, integrated approach to standards 
development, replacing the existing fragmented, inefficient approach in which stand-
ards are developed topic-by-topic. VHA supports these HHS activities and looks for-
ward to participating, along with other Federal partners, in these activities as they 
develop. 

Our data standardization efforts at VA have already improved our ability to share 
information with other agencies. I’d like to highlight our work with the Department 
of Defense. 

In April 2002, VA and DOD adopted a joint strategy to develop interoperable elec-
tronic  health  records  by  2005.  This  cross-cutting  initiative,  known  as  the  VA/DOD 
Joint Electronic Health Records Interoperability (JEHRI) Plan—HealthePeople (Fed-
eral),  is  based  on  the  common  adoption  of  standards,  the  development  of  interoper-
able  data  repositories,  and  joint  or  collaborative  development  of  software  applica-
tions  to  build  a  replicable  model  of  data  exchange  technologies.  The  progress  made 
by  VA  and  DOD  has  served  as  a  catalyst  to  move  the  health  care  industry  toward 
the  use  of  interoperable  health  information  technologies  that  have  the  potential  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

improve  health  care  delivery,  increase  patient  safety,  and  support  the  provision  of 
care in times of crisis. 

Through  collaborative  efforts,  VA  and  DOD  will  be  better  positioned  to  evaluate 
health problems among service members, veterans, and shared beneficiary patients; 
to address short- and long-term post-deployment health questions; and to document 
any changes in health status that may be relevant for determining disability. 
VistA-Office EHR 

As  a  physician,  I  have  seen  first-hand  the  benefits  of  electronic  health  records  in 
VA:  immediate  access  to  information,  elimination  of  duplicate  orders,  increased  pa-
tient  safety,  improved  information-sharing,  more  advanced  tracking  and  reporting 
tools,  and  reduced  costs.  VHA  is  now  working  with  the  Centers  for  Medicare  and 
Medicaid Services (CMS) to make the benefits of electronic health records available 
to providers in rural and underserved areas, as directed by President Bush in Exec-
utive  Order  13335  issued  in  April  2004.  CMS  is  sponsoring  the  development  of 
VistA-Office  EHR,  an  enhanced  version  of  VA’s  VistA  and  CPRS  designed  specifi-
cally  for  use  in  non-VA  clinics  and  physician  offices.  With  the  targeted  release  of 
VistA-Office EHR in August 2005, CMS hopes to stimulate the broader adoption and 
effective  use  of  electronic  health  records  by  making  a  robust,  flexible  EHR  product 
available in the public domain. 
The HealtheVet Program 

The  spirit  of  innovation  that  inspired  the  development  of  VistA,  CPRS,  BCMA, 
and VistA Imaging has led VA to the next step in the evolution of health care IT— 
HealtheVet.  HealtheVet-VistA  is  VA’s  next-generation  health  information  system, 
designed  to  support  more  personalized  care  for  our  veterans,  more  sophisticated 
clinical  tools  for  our  doctors  and  nurses,  and  more  advanced  communication  with 
our  health  care  partners.  HealtheVet  builds  on  decades  of  VA  expertise  in  health 
care  IT  to  support  the  strategic  goals  of  the  Department,  meet  interagency  obliga-
tions,  take  advantage  of  new  developments  in  technology  to  address  weaknesses  in 
the current system, and most importantly, improve the safety and quality of health 
care for veterans. 

VA  has  been  recognized  by  IOM  and  the  mainstream  press  as  having  one  of  the 
most  sophisticated  EHR  systems  in  the  world.  VistA  and  CPRS  are  in  the  public 
domain  and  have  served  as  models  for  healthcare  organizations  in  the  public  and 
the private sectors alike. VistA has been adopted for use by the District of Columbia 
Department  of  Health,  and  State  veterans  homes  in  Oklahoma.  A  number  of  other 
countries  have  either  implemented  VistA  or  expressed  an  interest  in  acquiring  the 
technology. VA’s DHCP system was modified for use in DOD and DHCP, and VistA 
is used in modified form by the Indian Health Service. By the late-1990s, the three 
largest  Federal  systems  providing  direct  health  care  were  using  derivatives  of  VA’s 
EHR,  although  only  VA  was  using  the  current  and  more  robust  version  including 
CPRS. 

Under the HealtheVet-VistA program, VA will incrementally enhance and supple-
ment  the  current  functional  capabilities  of  VistA  and  will  provide  increased  flexi-
bility,  more  sophisticated  analytical  tools,  and  support  for  seamless  data  sharing 
among providers both within and outside VA. Like VistA, software developed under 
the  HealtheVet  program  will  be  available  in  the  public  domain.  Federal  agencies, 
small medical practices, and EHR system vendors will all benefit from the advances 
made through HealtheVet-VistA. 

Given the success of VistA, some people have asked why we are changing it. The 

short answer is ‘‘to benefit the veteran.’’ 

VA  health  IT  systems  have  been  forged  and  tested  in  the  real  world  of  health 
care.  I  can  think  of  no  other  successful  organization,  with  a  history  of  innovation 
and a world-class system, that would simply rest on its laurels. 

One  reason  there  is  so  much  interest  in  VistA  is  that  it  has  never  been  a  static 
system.  The  health  care  environment  of  today  is  not  the  health  care  environment 
of  10  years  ago.  Nor  is  the  VistA  system  today  the  VistA  system  of  10  years  ago— 
or even of 1 year ago. VA has continued to refine and enhance VistA since its intro-
duction  to  reflect  advances  in  clinical  practice,  the  availability  of  new  commercial 
products,  the  changing  VA  health  care  model,  new  Congressional  mandates  (such 
as  those  related  to  current  combat  engagements),  and  new  Federal  laws  (such  as 
the  Health  Insurance  Portability  and  Accountability  Act  and  cybersecurity  require-
ments). 

We have to make these types of changes all the time—that’s the nature of health 
care.  The  current  VistA  system  has  served  us  well  through  decades  of  trans-
formation  in  health  care.  But  VA  has  outgrown  its  facility-centric  architecture,  and 
the system has simply become too expensive to maintain. HealtheVet-VistA will give 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

us  a  more  flexible  architecture  so  that  we  can  support  integrated  ambulatory  care 
and  home-base  health  care,  maintain  continuity  of  operations  in  the  event  of  a  dis-
aster,  and  improve  response  time  by  increasing  system  capacity  and  communica-
tions speed. 

HealtheVet-VistA will also allow us to strengthen privacy and security protections 
through  use  of  features  such  as  role-based  access.  We  will  be  able  to  limit  access 
to information based on the user’s identity, location, job function, or legal authority, 
for  example.  We  will  strengthen  our  ability  to  track  exactly  who  looks  at  the  infor-
mation, at what time, and for how long. 

An  estimated  40  percent  of  veterans  we  treat  at  VA  each  year  also  receive  care 
from non-VA physicians. VA is working with DOD, ONCHIT, and other partner or-
ganizations to develop a longitudinal health record that will incorporate information 
from  DOD,  VA,  and  private-sector  health  providers  from  whom  the  veteran  has 
sought  care.  Throughout  these  collaborative  projects,  safeguards  have  been  imple-
mented to ensure that the privacy of individuals is protected in accordance with the 
various  confidentiality  statutes  and  regulations  governing  health  records,  including 
the  Privacy  Act,  the  HIPAA  Privacy  Rule,  and  several  agency-specific  authorities. 
As we work toward greater data exchange and true interoperability with our health 
care partners, privacy and security of medical information will be a top priority. 
Personal Health Records and My HealtheVet 

I’d  like  to  highlight  another  key  component  of  the  HealtheVet  initiative:  the  My 
HealtheVet  personal  health  record  system,  designed  specifically  to  meet  the  needs 
of veterans. 

Personal  health  records  are  an  adjunct  to  the  electronic  health  records  used  in 
a  clinical  setting,  providing  patients  a  secure  means  of  maintaining  copies  of  their 
medical  records  and  other  personal  health  information  they  deem  important.  Infor-
mation  in  a  personal  health  record  is  the  property  of  the  patient;  it  is  the  patient 
who  controls  what  information  is  stored  and  what  information  is  accessible  by  oth-
ers.  Personal  health  records  enable  patients  to  consolidate  information  from  mul-
tiple  providers  without  having  to  track  down,  compile,  and  carry  around  copies  of 
paper records. By simplifying the collection and maintenance of health information, 
personal  health  records  encourage  patients  to  become  more  involved  in  the  health 
care decisions that affect them. 

The VHA My HealtheVet project was conceived as a way to help veterans manage 
their  personal  health  data.  My  HealtheVet  is  a  secure,  web-based  personal  health 
record  system  designed  to  provide  veterans  key  parts  of  their  VHA  health  record 
as  well  as  enabling  them  to  enter,  view,  and  update  additional  personal  health  in-
formation. Patients who take over-the-counter medications or herbs, or who monitor 
their own blood pressure, blood glucose, or weight, for example, can enter this infor-
mation in their personal health records. They can enter readings such as cholesterol 
and  pain,  and  can  track  results  over  time.  My  HealtheVet 
includes  the 
Medlineplus.gov  library  of  information  on  medical  conditions,  medications,  health 
news,  and  preventive  health  from  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  and  other  au-
thoritative  sources.  Veterans  can  use  the  system  to  explore  health  topics,  research 
diseases and conditions, learn about veteran-specific conditions, understand medica-
tion and treatment options, assess and improve their wellness, view seasonal health 
reminders, and more. 

The  implications  of  My  HealtheVet  are  far-reaching.  Clinicians  will  be  able  to 
communicate and collaborate with veterans much more easily. With My HealtheVet, 
veterans are able to consolidate and monitor their own health records and share this 
information  with  non-VA  clinicians  and  others  involved  in  their  care.  Patients  who 
take a more active role in their health care have been found to have improved clin-
ical outcomes and treatment adherence, as well as increased satisfaction with their 
care. 

The first version of My HealtheVet was released on Veterans Day 2003, and more 
than 50,000 veterans are now registered to use the system. The My HealtheVet user 
community  is  growing,  with  over  300  new  registrants  joining  each  day.  By  the  end 
of  this  summer,  veterans  who  receive  their  health  care  at  VA  will  be  able  to  use 
My HealtheVet to refill prescriptions online. By this time next year, veterans receiv-
ing  care  at  VA  medical  centers  will  be  able  to  request  and  maintain  copies  of  key 
portions  of  their  health  records  electronically  through  My  HealtheVet  and  to  grant 
authority to view that information to family members, veterans’ service officers, and 
VA and non-VA clinicians involved in their care. This would allow a relative to pro-
vide support and care—even at a distance—by being better informed about the vet-
eran’s  health  and  medical  status.  Subsequent  releases  will  provide  additional  capa-
bilities,  enabling  veterans  to  view  upcoming  appointments  and  see  co-payment  bal-
ances. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Summary 

44 

For  decades,  VA  has  developed  innovative  IT  solutions  to  support  health  care  for 
veterans.  Over  the  past  several  years,  VA  has  worked  with  Federal,  state,  and  in-
dustry  partners  to  broaden  the  use  of  information  technology  in  health  care.  We 
have continued to enhance the capabilities of the EHR while protecting the privacy 
of  our  veteran  population  and  maintaining  the  integrity  of  our  systems.  These  ef-
forts have laid the groundwork for the President’s health IT initiative. 

The  team  of  VHA  developers,  clinicians,  and  administrators  who  designed  VistA 
changed the practice of medicine in VA by creating IT tools such as these to support 
the interaction between providers in VA and their patients, increase patient safety, 
and  improve  reporting  and  tracking  of  clinical  and  administrative  data.  VA  is  now 
involved  with  public-  and  private-sector  partners  in  the  development  of  a  new  na-
tional  model  for  the  use  of  IT  in  health  care,  featuring  more  sophisticated  clinical 
decision support tools, increased data sharing among health care providers, and the 
availability of affordable EHR technology to providers large and small. 

When he announced his plan to transform health care through the use of informa-
tion technology, the President noted our country’s long and distinguished history of 
innovation—as well as our failure to use health information technology consistently 
as an integral part of medical care in America. 

We  still  have  a  long  way  to  go  in  optimizing  our  use  of  information  technology 
in health care; yet, we are not starting from scratch. Electronic health records, per-
sonal  health  records,  data  and  communication  standards,  and  sophisticated  analyt-
ical tools—the building blocks of a comprehensive, national health information infra-
structure—have  already  been  implemented  in  some  communities  and  settings  and 
are  maturing  quickly.  Our  challenge  is  to  create  a  technology  infrastructure  that 
will  revolutionize  health  care  without  interfering  with  the  human  interaction  be-
tween physicians and patients that is at the core of the art of medicine. 

The President recognized America’s medical professionals and the skill they have 
shown  in  providing  high-quality  health  care  despite  our  reliance  on  an  outdated, 
paper-based  system.  At  VA,  we  know  that  the  support  of  clinicians  is  essential  to 
the  successful  implementation  of  electronic  health  records  and  new  IT  tools.  Clini-
cians, while often the greatest proponents of health information technology, can also 
be  the  greatest  critics.  At  VA,  physicians,  nurses,  and  other  providers  are  actively 
involved  in  defining  requirements  and  business  rules  for  systems,  prioritizing  en-
hancements,  and  conducting  end-user  testing.  This  involvement  improves  system 
usability,  increases  user  acceptance,  minimizes  disruption  during  upgrades,  and 
most importantly, enables us to tailor systems to the needs of the health care com-
munity. 

Throughout VA, the electronic health record is no longer a novelty—it is accepted 
as  a  standard  tool  in  the  provision  of  health  care.  For  20  years,  VA  has  been  an 
innovator  in  health  care  IT.  We  are  now  at  the  brink  of  a  new  era  in  health  care, 
in  which  a  new  national  model  for  the  use  of  IT  will  support  the  development  of 
more  sophisticated  clinical  decision  support  tools,  increased  data  sharing  among 
health  care  providers,  and  the  broader  availability  of  affordable  EHR  technology  to 
providers  large  and  small.  As  VA  refines  and  expands  its  use  of  information  tech-
nology,  we  look  forward  to  sharing  our  systems  and  expertise  with  our  partners 
throughout  the  health  care  community  to  support  the  President’s  plan  for  trans-
forming health care—and the health of our veterans. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  completes  my  statement.  I  will  now  be  happy  to  answer  any 

questions that you or other members of the Subcommittee have. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you.  I  would  like  to  thank  the  entire 
panel  for  its  fascinating  testimony.  I  would  like  to  start  with  a 
round of questions. I think there is great work occurring at the VA 
and I am impressed with some of the health information technology 
projects  that  are  occurring  around  the  country.  There  is  certainly 
excitement  concerning  the  issue  or  health  information  technology. 
Dr.  Clancy,  you  mentioned  something  that  I  think  is  really  impor-
tant—and  something  that  we  need  to  try  and  incorporate  into 
health  information  technology—and  that  is  the  idea  of  best  prac-
tices. 

If we can incorporate best practices with health information tech-
nology,  I  believe  the  savings  range  you’re  talking  about  would  be 
more  toward  the  higher  end,  rather  than  the  lower  end.  In  addi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

tion, the outcomes would obviously increase much more. From what 
I understand, only a quarter of physicians routinely use best prac-
tices  in  their  daily  clinical  practice.  So  my  question  to  you  is,  how 
can  we  incorporate  best  practices  into  health  information  tech-
nology? 

Dr.  CLANCY.  We  have  supported  the  development  of  evidence 
that  is  the  foundation  for  the  kind  of  best  practices  you’re  talking 
about.  What  health  IT  is  going  to  allow,  is  that  information  to  be 
delivered to a specific patient for a particular encounter. 

Consider  the  example  of  an  electronic  rule  that  helps  decide 
whether  patients  with  pneumonia  need  to  be  hospitalized.  I  don’t 
really need that if someone is in with a sprained ankle. So the real 
trick—and I think what will come out of the efforts to establish the 
infrastructure,  and  harmonized  standards  and  so  forth—is  to  de-
velop the capacity; as better evidence develops, to be able to deliver 
relevant information at the point of care. 

If you think about all the investments that we have made in bio-
medical  science  both  in  the  public  and  private  sectors,  there  are 
more and more times when a clinician and patient are facing really 
a host of choices—which is great news for all of us. The trick is try-
ing to have easy access to the evidence underlying those choices so 
you  can  figure  out  what  is  right  for  the  patient.  And  that  I  think 
is going to be the great potential and one we’re very excited about. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  I  realize  that  the  use  of  evidenced-based  medi-
cine  and  best  practices  are  good.  Is  this  something  we  just  allow 
to happen, or is it something that we need to try and force to hap-
pen, or encourage to happen? We’re policymakers. When we’re writ-
ing laws, should we incentivize through payment systems, through 
Medicare, Medicaid, and the VA? How do we make sure that appro-
priate  information  is  communicated?  Do  we  try  to  incentivize  in 
some way? 

Dr. CLANCY. Through the support that you provide for the devel-
opment  of  science  at  AHRQ,  and  NIH,  and  other  places,  you  cer-
tainly  are  giving  support  for  the  substrate  for  that.  Applying  it  lo-
cally,  I  think,  is  probably  best  done  as  it’s  customized  to  that  set-
ting. How that’s going to be delivered to the point of care, in a very 
small  practice  is  probably  much  different  than  how  Dr.  Kolodner 
will use it in VA and so forth. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Dr.  Kolodner,  the  VA  has  obviously  invested 
quite a bit of money in health information technology. Do you have 
any  figures  on  how  much  the  VA  has  invested  in  health  informa-
tion  technology?  I  would  also  like  to  know  more  about  the  return 
on  investment,  and  how  much  is  saved.  I  am  not  only  interested 
in  paperwork  reduction,  but  also  in  decreased  costs  of  care.  Have 
there  been  any  studies  like  this  conducted  in  the  VA?  In  other 
words, are there studies that show that a patient gets out of a hos-
pital  faster  because  a  proper  diagnosis  was  made?  I  don’t  know  if 
any long-term studies have been conducted, or if any peer-reviewed 
studies  have  been  conducted  on  cost  savings  and  outcomes  since 
health IT was introduced within the VA. 

Dr.  KOLODNER.  Mr.  Chairman,  our  system  was  developed  over 
about  20  years,  so  it  started  when  the  technology  was  very  rudi-
mentary.  Thus,  the  figures  for  the  development  of  our  system  are 
probably  not  meaningful  today.  However,  there  are  some  studies 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

that  we  have  regarding  the  treatment  of  pneumonia.  Because  we 
are able to vaccinate such a high percentage of our veterans, in fact 
our  benchmarks  for  vaccination  exceed  anything  that  is  published 
in  the  country,  what  we  have  been  able  to  show  is  that  each  vac-
cination we give saves about $290 of our healthcare costs. We have 
actually  had  a  decrease  in  the  total  number  of  hospitalizations  for 
pneumonia in patients with chronic pulmonary disease, despite the 
fact  that  we  doubled  the  number  of  veterans  we  treated  over  that 
period  of  time.  This  is  one  of  the  pieces  of  evidence  that  we  have 
for  the  cost  savings  and  the  cost  avoidance  we  have  achieved  from 
using our health IT. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Dr.  Brailer,  I  have  one  quick  question  as  my 
time  is  about  to  expire.  You  mentioned  interoperability.  We’ve 
heard a lot about that issue today. To address Senator Allen’s con-
cern,  how  do  we  make  interoperability  technology-neutral  so  that 
we  aren’t  limiting  technology  as  it  is  advancing?  A  few  years  ago, 
I  remember  that  the  French  wanted  to  be  ahead  of  the  world  con-
sequently,  so  they  bought  everybody  in  the  government  a  certain 
type  of  hardware  and  software.  They  were  only  ahead  of  the  rest 
of  the  world  for  about  a  month—because  technology  advances  so 
quickly.  Then,  they  were  stuck  with  a  certain  type  of  information 
technology  system.  How  do  we  make  sure  that  interoperability 
standards  are  written  in  a  manner  that  is  technology  neutral  so 
that  we’re  not  unintentionally  mandating  and  trapping  ourselves 
into old technology? 

Dr.  BRAILER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  The  first  precept  that 
we want to follow, to make sure that technology stays at the state- 
of-the-art  and  we  don’t  lock  it  in,  is  to  make  it  a  fluid  process, 
which  means  to  not  require  it  through  regulations  which  are  very 
difficult  for  us  to  update.  We  have  gone  out  to  the  private  sector 
to develop a process for standards, not only to harmonize today, but 
to  develop  a  roadmap  and  a  process  to  keep  them  into  the  future. 
This way it can be a living and breathing part of the industry. 

Second, we want to put intellectual property, particularly the ar-
chitecture,  or  the  blue  prints,  in  the  public  domain.  We  are  not 
going  to  support,  if  you  would,  proprietary  standards,  or  royalty 
bearing, or copyrighted standards that have some kind of a burden 
imposed  on  users,  nor  would  we  do  so  with  architecture.  While  in 
our  RFPs  we  allow  proprietary  implementations  of  the  actual  soft-
ware, so the commercial market will come and invest, we want the 
architecture to be put in the public domain so they can be reviewed 
and turned into requirements for the whole industry. 

While  we  are  relying  on  the  private  sector  for  developments, 
we’re  relying  on  governance  that  is  public  and  private,  and  we’re 
relying on an organic process that continues to stay ahead of tech-
nology. 

Senator ENSIGN. Very good, thank you. Senator Kerry. 
Senator KERRY. Thank you Mr. Chairman, thank you all for your 
testimony.  Dr.  Brailer,  in  the  long  time  I’ve  been  here  now  in  this 
committee,  I  guess  I’ve  been  21  years  in  the  Senate,  we’ve  had  a 
lot  of  fights  about  standards,  and  standards  have  often  been  able 
to  become  a  roadblock  unto  themselves.  What  concerns  me  a  little 
bit  is  that  if  you  put  everything  on  hold  until  we  quote  ‘‘get  the 
standards,’’  we’re  going  to  ignore  the  reality  of  what’s  happening. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

A  lot  of  other  places,  including  the  private  sector  in  the  United 
Kingdom  for  instance,  they  don’t  have  standards  across  the  board, 
they’re  developing  them.  But  they  have  proceeded  to  put  the  tech-
nology  out  and  they  have—almost  every  desktop  in  the  healthcare 
industry  is  crisscrossing  information,  and  they’re  working  it 
through to the great savings of the system and the savings of lives 
and greater efficiency. 

And  to  a  degree  the  standards  are  evolving  as  they  do  that.  So 
I mean my question to you is, can we afford to not provide signifi-
cant  incentives  for  the  basic  technology  to  get  in  place—and  to 
many  of  healthcare  delivers  throughout  the  system,  particularly 
given  the  experience  of  others  in  this  field,  including  the  VA  over 
20 years? 

Dr. BRAILER. Well Senator, your question is a very good one and 
it  is  one  that  we’ve  spent  a  lot  of  time  looking  at,  not  only  within 
our  own  strategies  but  with  success  stories  in  the  United  States, 
and  abroad.  There  are  two  strategies  going  forward.  There  is  an 
adoption  gap  you’ve  just  described  and  second,  there  is  this  inter-
operability problem, making sure the data is portable. We are con-
cerned about the taking, if you would, of an adoption forward strat-
egy  where  we  pushed  that  forward  as  a  principal  effort,  because 
that could foreclose the one time opportunity we have in the United 
States to have interoperability and portability. For example, in the 
case  of  an  electronic  health  record  today,  it’s  hard  for  a  buyer  to 
know which ones could be connectable to a system, which ones are 
interoperable and which ones are not. 

Senator KERRY. Well can I just—I don’t want you—but I want to 
try  to  follow  up  on  that  if  I  can  Dr.  Kolodner.  I  was  introduced  I 
think  to  the  VA  system,  I  can’t  remember,  maybe  eight,  10  years 
ago, when I went through the VA hospitals. Let me ask you a ques-
tion.  Is  the  pain  management  system  within  the  VA  part  of  the 
VistA? 

Dr. KOLODNER. Yes it is. 
Senator KERRY. It is, that’s what I thought, because I remember 
seeing the pain management at the bedside a number of years ago, 
and  I  was  struck  by  it.  What  really  got  me  interested  in  this  was, 
frankly,  a  visit  to  the  VA  and  I  became  aware  that  the  VA  is  al-
ready  doing  this  way  ahead  of  everybody  else.  Give  us  a  kind  of 
ballpark  figure  of  what  we’re  talking  about,  about  the  VA  invest-
ment  even  if  you  discard  the  early  startup  years  where  you  were 
kind  of  dealing  with  primitive  technology  et  cetera.  What  would 
you—put it into sort of current dollars in effect? 

Dr.  KOLODNER.  The  current  estimate  is  that  about  $450  million 
a  year  is  spent  operating  and  maintaining  the  VistA  system.  That 
amounts  to  about  $78  per  enrollee  per  year,  so  if  we  avoid  one  or 
two  lab  tests,  certainly  one  hospitalization,  that  more  than  covers 
the cost. 

Dr. KOLODNER. I really couldn’t give a figure. 

Senator KERRY. Does that include the purchasing cost, capitaliza-

Dr. KOLODNER. That includes all the costs that we have. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  would  you  figure  the  capitalization  costs 

tion cost? 

was? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  KERRY.  Well  $450  million,  you’re  talking  about  several 

billion dollars, correct? 

48 

Dr.  KOLODNER.  In  terms  of  the  hardware,  probably  a  billion,  a 
billion  and  half  for  the  whole  system.  I  think  some  of  the  people 
on the second panel may actually be able to give you a better num-
ber for that. 

Senator  KERRY.  I’m  sure  they  will,  but  I’m  trying  to  get—Dr. 
Brailer, what’s your estimate of what it would take. And one of the 
interesting  things  is  with  respect  to  the  alignment  of  incentives.  I 
think that’s a really important issue here. Because the benefits, the 
expenditure  has  to  come  out  of  the  pocket  of  the  doctor.  A  doctor’s 
office. The expenditure has to come out of the hospital or clinic, but 
the  benefit  doesn’t  flow  to  them.  The  benefit  flows  to  Medicaid, 
Medicare, to the health insurance company, the HMO, correct? 

Dr. BRAILER. That’s right. 
Senator  KERRY.  So  the  question  is,  how  do  we  provide  an  ade-
quate  incentive?  It  seems  to  me  it’s  got  to  be  through  some  kind 
of  either  tax  incentive,  tax  credit,  grant,  direct  grant,  or  low  loan, 
some combination thereof, isn’t that accurate? 

Dr.  BRAILER.  Well  again,  I  think  the  question  we  focused  on  is 
making  sure  that  what  is  put  in  place  ultimately  serves  the  goal 
of  portable  information  for  consumers.  And,  the  examples  that  we 
have  of  VA  or  Kaiser,  or  the  Cleveland  Clinic,  or  that  in  Britain 
are  closed  systems.  Closed  systems  are  not  interoperable  with  oth-
ers.  And  most  of  healthcare  involves  small  doctor  practices  and 
hospitals. 

Senator  KERRY.  Let’s  take  the  healthcare  system,  what  we  saw 

is pretty effective. 

Dr. BRAILER. Yes, absolutely. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  would  assume  some  people  would  love  to  rep-
licate  that.  But  they  can’t.  Not  so  much  because  of  operability  but 
because of costs. I mean people would grab at that. I’ve heard that 
from  people  all  through  the  system,  they  would  love  to  have  that, 
they  just  can’t  afford  it.  So  how  much  are  you  figuring  it  really 
would  cost  to  put  a  first  rate,  state-of-the-art,  information  system, 
health record system in America? 

Dr.  BRAILER.  Well,  we’ve  not  done  our  own  estimates.  Estimates 
range between $30 billion and $250 billion; and obviously, you can 
imagine  with  estimates  that  broad,  there  are  numerous  assump-
tions  about  technology  cost,  about  changes,  and  about  the  way  the 
industry  operates.  We  have  not  developed  our  own  estimate,  but  I 
think it’s fair to say that it is expensive. 

Senator  KERRY.  Let’s  take  the  low  ball  on  that  $30  billion,  the 
high  ball  is  $250  we’re  spending  $150  million.  It’s  interesting  you 
know,  the  VA  is  a  government  program  using  taxpayer  dollars. 
They’ve  got  the  system  and  the  other  place  where  we  don’t  spend 
the money doesn’t. Thank you Mr. Chairman. 

Senator ENSIGN. Senator Allen. 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you. And thank you to all of our witnesses 
for your insightful leadership and knowledge, and movement in the 
right  direction,  plus  an  example  from  Dr.  Kolodner  as  to  what  the 
VA is doing. 

I  do  think  that  everyone  does  benefit,  not  just  the  taxpayers, 
from this, I think physicians and healthcare professionals also ben-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

efit from more accurate diagnoses, fewer errors. Obviously the goal 
of  every  healthcare  professional  is  to  have  a  successful  outcome  as 
best  they  can  achieve  it,  in  their  profession.  All  of  this  gets  to  a 
few questions, and it is good that Dr. Brailer, that you all—you and 
Dr. Clancy are also talking with the clinicians, the people who are 
involved  in  it.  We  all  could  say,  ‘‘isn’t  this  great  and  wouldn’t  that 
be wonderful,’’ but if they don’t think that works, and it’s a burden, 
it’s an aggravation, they’re not going to want to do that as opposed 
to this paper-based system which I guarantee you most people un-
doubtedly don’t like. But whatever the changes need to be accepted 
by them. 

Dr. Semerjian, in your testimony, you said that NIST is going to 
be certifying a standard for use in electronic patient records across 
government. How long will it take for that to take place? 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  I  would  like  to  clarify  that,  I  did  not  mean  we 
would  do  the  certification.  When  you  set  a  standard,  that’s  only 
part  of  the  process.  Then  you  need  to  establish  a  process  that  en-
ables you to assess the compliance with the standards you have es-
tablished. You need criteria for that assessment. 

We  usually  help  with  the  development  of  that  criteria,  usually 
the certification is done by private sector entities. So first we have 
to  set  the  standards,  once  the  standards  are  set  then  we  have  to 
develop certification criteria. 

Senator ALLEN. All right. I’m using two words, but how long will 

it take you all to develop a standard? 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  That  standard  has  to  be  developed  by  the  entire 
community.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  that  is  what  Dr.  Brailer  is  trying 
to do. 

Senator  ALLEN.  How  long  will  that  take?  Since  you  brought  up 

that the future is now. 

be in years. 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  It  is  not  going  to  be  in  months  certainly.  It  will 

Senator  ALLEN.  What  can  we  do?  You  all  are  the  experts.  It’s 
going  to  take  you  a  while  to  do  this.  What  can  we  do,  and  that’s 
the  purpose  of  this  hearing  really,  what  can  we  do  in  Congress  to 
assist  you,  or  facilitate  the  development  of  uniform  standards  in 
this  area?  Maybe  it’s  just  leave  you  all  alone  and  let  you  do  your 
work. But is there anything we can do? 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  I  think  Dr.  Brailer’s  office  already  has  the 
marching orders. Certainly I’m sure he wouldn’t mind having some 
cheers on the sideline to encourage that work. But I think the proc-
ess  is  pretty  much  in  place.  I  think  you  should  perhaps  encour-
age—there are clearly a lot of players in this process as you heard 
VA,  quality  issues,  and  NIH  et  cetera.  Certainly  encouragement  of 
further  collaboration  et  cetera,  but  I  think  the  process  is  in  place. 
And  everybody  is  working  as  hard  as  they  can  to  make  this  hap-
pen. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you.  Dr.  Kolodner,  you  showed  this  dem-
onstration,  and  so  that’s  all  interoperable  within  the  VA  system 
and also within the Department of Defense. That may be the state- 
of-the-art  right  now,  and  in  five,  10  years  from  now  that  may  not 
be  the  state-of-the-art  method  of  keeping  track  of  veterans,  or  any 
non-veteran patient. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

However, and this is what the gist of all of this is, is that if one 
of  these  veterans,  who  you  have  all  of  this  information,  let’s  as-
sume  he  or  she  gets  injured  and  they  go  to  the  University  of  Vir-
ginia Emergency Room, or the Reno Nevada Emergency Room, and 
it’s  not  a  veteran’s  hospital  they  would  not  have  that  information, 
right? Is that correct or is there some way of making that available 
to the University of Virginia, or University of Nevada Hospital? 

Dr.  KOLODNER.  There  are  some  universities  we  have  affiliations 
with and we’re able to provide remote access, but if it is something 
as  you  described,  where  someone  is  injured  and  shows  up  today, 
that university capability is not there, that is why we’re very eager 
to  work  with  Dr.  Brailer’s  office  to  move  that  forward.  But  one  of 
the  other  possibilities 
is  next  year,  when  we  provide  the 
HealtheVet  record  to  the  veteran  and  are  uploading  the  data  from 
VistA,  then  the  veteran  themselves  would  have  the  capability  of 
taking  that  information  and  sharing  it  with  whomever  they  want. 
So that would be another mechanism for tying things together. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Real  quick.  Is  this  system  able  to  communicate 

with the current commercially available systems? 

Dr. KOLODNER. Right now, none of the systems out there commu-

nicate with each other. 

Senator ALLEN. The answer is no then. Real quickly, if you could 
each and everyone of you, I already asked Dr. Semerjian what can 
we  do,  and  I  guess  you’ve  looked  at  Senator  Enzi’s  bill,  but  what 
if  you  could  give  us  two  sentences,  what  the  Congress  ought  to  do 
to assist you all in your missions? 

Dr.  CLANCY.  Well,  we  appreciate  the  continued  support  for  the 
practical technical assistance and the development of the evidence, 
and  for  deploying  those  as  best  practices,  as  the  Chairman  noted. 
I would also say that your interest in this topic is itself an incred-
ibly potent stimulus across the country. 

Dr. BRAILER. Sir, I think it is fair to say the Administration wel-
comes  the  interest  that  the  Senate  has  shown  in  this  topic.  Our 
concern  is  making  sure  that  given  that  we  are  now  underway  and 
moving  as  quickly  as  possible,  that  we  don’t  actually  have  events 
that could slow us down. There is concern about legislation slowing 
down this process. 

Senator ALLEN. Do you see any such legislation introduced? 
Dr. BRAILER. I wouldn’t comment on specifics. I think I’m speak-
ing  more  generally  about  creating  a  lot  of  uncertainty,  or  concern 
about which direction to go. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Would  Senator  Enzi’s  bill  be  a  help  or  a  hin-

Dr.  BRAILER.  I  can’t  comment  on  that  bill  in  particular,  but  I 
think  as  a  general  construct  we  are  moving  forward  and  it’s  very 
important for us to get these standards put in place quickly. We’re 
working  with  the  available  parts  and  with  the  authority  we  have 
to do this. So we want to be able to make sure this is done quickly 
so we can speak to the issue that Senator Kerry raised about mak-
ing sure that we can get interoperability done—then to move on to 
the other issues. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Senator  Allen,  if  I  could  interrupt  quickly  on 
that point I would greatly appreciate it. I think what Senator Allen 
is trying to convey, is that we would like to obtain suggestions from 

drance? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

any  and  all,  on  how  we  can  be  a  help,  not  a  hindrance.  We  defi-
nitely  don’t  want  to  be  a  hindrance  in  this  case,  we  want  to  be 
helpful.  We  are  open  to  suggestions.  One  of  the  purposes  of  this 
hearing  is  to  listen  to  any  suggestions  you  have  now,  or  any  sug-
gestions you want to make in writing. We want to obtain your sug-
gestions, so that we can incorporate your views and insights within 
legislation that we bring forward in the Senate, and include in any 
final  product.  We  want  to  make  sure  that  any  legislation  that 
moves forward is helpful, not hurtful. 

Senator ALLEN. We want to be good teammates. That’s the point 
of  this,  is  if  you  do  see  something,  and  I  think  that  we’re  all  well 
intentioned  in  a  bipartisan  manner  on  this.  And  sometimes  people 
can  help,  and  get  in  the  way.  On  the  other  hand,  there  are  things 
we  can  do  to  help  propel  and  set  the  parameters  that  will  help  as 
you  all  interact  with  the  people  who  are  actually  delivering  the 
healthcare services in our country. 

Senator ENSIGN. And by the way, I have just one quick question 
on  that  issue.  Do  we  have  to  make  any  modifications  to  HIPAA  to 
make  health  information  technology  move  forward?  The  VA  has 
certain policies that it can get around. But if the VA system is con-
nected  to  the  private  system,  are  there  changes  that  need  to  be 
made?  There  was  mention  about  the  Stark  laws  and  HIPAA—and 
I  know  there  are  other  things  that  can  be  done  to  accelerate  the 
deployment of this technology. 

Dr.  SEMERJIAN.  If  I  may  Mr.  Chairman,  this  is  a  huge  under-
taking as everybody realizes, so clearly your continued support and 
interest I think will go a long way in making it happen. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Dr.  Kolodner  do  you  have  anything  to  add?  You 
all  are  doing  it.  We’re  trying  to  get  the  rest  of  the  private  sector 
moving  that  way  as  well,  maybe  not  under  the  same  system.  Do 
you have any insight as to what the Congress should do? 

Dr.  KOLODNER.  In  terms  of  supporting  the  efforts  that  are  going 
on  in  the  Administration  and  with  the  standards  community,  I 
think your continued support is the best course of action, sir. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you.  I  would  like  to  excuse  this  panel.  I 
appreciate  your  comments,  wonderful  testimony,  and  great  discus-
sion. I would now like to welcome the second panel. 

On the second panel, we will hear from Ms. Susan Bostrom, Sen-
ior  Vice  President,  Cisco  Systems;  Dr.  John  Glaser,  Vice  President 
and  Chief  Information  Officer,  Partners  HealthCare  System;  Dr. 
Peter  Basch,  Medical  Director  for  eHealth,  MedStar  Health;  Ms. 
Pamela  Pure,  Executive  Vice  President,  McKesson  Corporation; 
and  Ms.  Karen  Ignagni,  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer, 
America’s Health Insurance Plans. 

Once again we will start to my left, and work our way down the 

table. We will start with you, Ms. Bostrom. 

STATEMENT OF SUSAN L. BOSTROM, SENIOR VICE 

PRESIDENT, INTERNET BUSINESS SOLUTIONS GROUP AND 
WORLDWIDE GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, CISCO SYSTEMS, INC. 
Ms.  BOSTROM.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Ensign,  for  inviting  me  to 
testify  today.  It’s  good  to  see  you  and  Senator  Allen,  and  we  cer-
tainly  appreciate  the  focus  on  healthcare  information  technology. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

As  you  mentioned,  I’m  the  Senior  Vice  President  at  Cisco,  I  have 
responsibility  for  Internet  Business  Solutions  Group,  and  also 
Worldwide Government Affairs. I also have the privilege of serving 
on  two  boards  of  directors  that  may  be  relevant,  first  is  the  Stan-
ford  Hospital  in  Palo  Alto  and  second  is  Varian  Medical  Systems, 
which  is  a  provider  of  cancer  radiation  treatment  equipment.  And 
both  of  these  positions  have  given  me  an  opportunity  to  see  some 
of  the  challenges  that  the  healthcare  industry  is  facing,  up  close 
and personal. 

As Dr. Brailer mentioned, and as many of you are aware over the 
last  10  years  the  implementation  of  information  technology  and 
Internet  applications  specifically  has  been  a  major  contributor  to 
U.S.  productivity  growth,  across  a  wide  range  of  industries,  retail, 
manufacturing,  financial  services,  and  in  contrast  the  healthcare 
industry  actually  has  been  a  drain  on  the  U.S.  economy,  it’s  rank-
ing in the bottom five industries in terms of its contribution to U.S. 
productivity based on a Harvard study. 

More recently Cisco, and other members of the IT industry have 
been  asked  the  question,  why  is  it  that  the  productivity  improve-
ment that we’ve seen come from IT and other industries; why don’t 
they apply this to the U.S. healthcare industry, especially when IT 
can  be  used  not  only  to  help  control  increasing  costs,  but  also  to 
help save the lives of our citizens? And my answer to that question 
is  that  now  is  the  time  for  IT  to  move  into  that  major  contributor 
part  as  it  relates  to  U.S.  healthcare,  and  the  reason  being  that 
there are really three factors that we’re seeing in the healthcare in-
dustry right now, that say that it’s ready for IT. 

First  of  all,  there’s  a  real  sense  of  urgency  for  change.  Because 
as you mentioned this is going to be tough, and so you need to real-
ly have those driving pressures for change. 

Second,  there  have  been  early  pioneers  in  the  industry,  whether 
it’s the VA, or whether it’s private hospitals that have been moving 
forward and demonstrating that this is all possible. 

And  then  finally,  there  have  to  be  significant  returns.  So  is  it 
going to be worth the financial and human capital investment that 
is  going  to  be  required  to  get  some  of  these  benefits?  Is  it  going  to 
be worth the kind of change that is going to be required? 

Regarding the first factor, the need for change, I think this point 
has been articulated this morning. As we all know the aging popu-
lation combined with the advances in medical error are really driv-
ing  up  the  increases  in  the  healthcare  cost  structure.  By  2010, 
healthcare  spending  could  reach  $2.5  trillion  and  that  would  be 
about 15 percent of the U.S. GDP. 

One  study  as  you  mentioned  has  suggested  that  30  percent  of 
this  spending  is  what  we  call  waste,  unnecessary  test,  errors,  et 
cetera. And as a result half their insurance premiums are rising at 
four  to  five  times  the  growth  of  inflation.  Employers  are  reaching 
their  limit.  And  employees  are  unwilling,  or  unable  to  bear  any-
more  of  the  cost.  And  still  we  have  a  situation  where  45  million 
Americans are uninsured. So the situation from a cost increase per-
spective,  none  of  us  want  to  give  up  quality  care  says  that  now  is 
the time for change. 

The  second  factor  affecting  the  use  of  IT  in  healthcare  is  that 
there are numerous success stories, from early adopters in the pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

vider community. The hospital, the clinic, the doctor, this is where 
80  percent  of  healthcare  costs  occur.  And  we’ve  seen  evidence 
across  the  board  that  early  adopters  of  IT  are  getting  benefits. 
There’s  a  400  bed  community  hospital  in  Silicone  Valley  that  im-
plemented a computerized position order entry system based on an 
EHR. They’ve got it spread across their 500 doctors and the results 
are that they’ve got order errors down by 50 percent, adverse drug 
reaction errors down by 70 percent, and they’re reducing the length 
of stay of the average patient by a day. 

A  health  system  in  Virginia  has  implemented  what  is  called  an 
EICU,  or  Electronic  Intensive  Care  Unit.  It  allows  one  doctor  to 
view  six  or  seven  different  hospitals  and  those  patients.  ICUs  ac-
count  for  30  percent  of  our  hospitals  cost.  In  this  case,  this  health 
system is reducing its ICU costs by 25 percent. The average patient 
stay  is  down  20  percent,  and  of  course  the  mortality  rate  is  de-
creasing.  They’re  seeing  more  and  more  patients  coming  out  with 
better outcomes because they’ve got an ICU specialist present. 

These  healthcare  IT  pioneers  have  embraced  technologies  that 
are now available, whether it be broadband, or whether it be wire-
less,  to  drive  improved  results  at  lower  costs.  But  unfortunately 
these  pioneers  in  healthcare  are  the  exception,  not  the  rule.  While 
industries on average in the U.S. spend about $8,000 per employee 
per year on information technology capital, the healthcare industry 
spends $1,100 per employee per year. 

It’s  discouraging  to  think  about  the  investment  that  is  going  to 
be required for the healthcare industry to catch up. But if they do, 
the  returns  can  be  significant.  Based  on  our  analysis  at  Cisco,  we 
believe that up to $280 billion a year, that is 17 percent of the $1.6 
trillion  spent  on  healthcare  could  be  saved,  if  just  8  to  10  proven 
IT applications could be adopted across the entire industry. 

Just  look  at  some  of  the  examples,  EICUs  spread  across  the  en-
tire  industry  could  save  $10  billion  a  year.  In  addition  to  control-
ling  costs,  these  applications  could  help  to  reduce  the  hundreds  of 
thousands  of  medical  errors  that  occur  each  year,  so  that  doctors 
have up-to-the-minute information at the point of care with the pa-
tient.  Despite  the  proven  value  of  these  IT  solutions  though,  when 
we look at the adoption of them they range anywhere from 5 to 20 
percent  within  the  provider  community,  and  I  think  we’re  all  too 
familiar  with  what  some  of  the  road  blocks  have  been.  Lack  of 
interoperable  data  standards,  across  the  industry.  It’s  a  highly 
fragmented  industry.  It’s  so  much  different  than  you  would  see  in 
financial services, where they’ve been able to implement standards, 
and there’s a misalignment of financial incentives. So who pays the 
bills,  and  who  provides  the  care,  the  incentives  are  quite  different 
there.  But  all  of  these  road  blocks  can  be  tackled  through  the  pri-
vate  sector  and  the  government  working  together.  Many  of  these 
actions are already underway, but if you look at it, the Federal and 
the  state  governments  pay  for  50  percent  of  all  healthcare  cost,  so 
therefore  you  can  be  highly  influential  in  determining  how  pro-
viders  decide  to  invest,  and  where  they  should  invest,  and  where 
will  they  get  returns.  Both  from  the  government  and  in  terms  of 
quality of care when they make those investments. 

Accelerating IT—— 
Senator ENSIGN. If you could wrap up please. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Ms.  BOSTROM.  In  conclusion,  if  we  could  save  this  $280  billion, 
we could get down to a gross domestic product healthcare spending 
being  like  it  was  in  the  1990s  in  terms  of  representing  GDP  and 
we  could  use  that  money  for  ensuring  that  all  Americans  have 
healthcare insurance and coverage. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Bostrom follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SUSAN L.  BOSTROM,  SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT,  INTERNET 
BUSINESS SOLUTIONS GROUP AND WORLDWIDE GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS,  CISCO 
SYSTEMS, INC. 
Thank  you,  Chairman  Ensign,  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today.  I  would  also  like 
to  thank  Ranking  Member  Kerry  and  the  other  Senators  on  the  Subcommittee  for 
holding  and  participating  in  this  important  hearing  on  health  information  tech-
nology. 

My  name  is  Sue  Bostrom,  Senior  Vice  President  of  the  Internet  Business  Solu-

tions Group (IBSG) and Worldwide Government Affairs at Cisco Systems, Inc. 

I  also  have  the  privilege  of  sitting  on  the  board  of  directors  at  Stanford  Hospital 
and  Varian  Medical  Systems,  a  manufacturer  of  radiation  equipment  for  cancer 
treatment. These positions have given me the opportunity to witness first-hand the 
challenges facing major sectors of the healthcare industry—providers, payers, phar-
maceutical and medical device firms, and government agencies. 

My  goal  here  today  is  to  share  with  you  what  we’ve  learned  through  Cisco’s  cus-
tomers and in our own practice in the area of improving healthcare quality, increas-
ing productivity and driving down costs through technology. 

There  is  one  overwhelming  challenge  faced  by  all  sectors—the  spiraling  cost  of 
health care. As you well know, healthcare spending in the U.S. has topped $1.6 tril-
lion a year and will reach $2.5 trillion by 2010—that’s more than 15 percent of the 
Gross Domestic Product. 

Meanwhile,  healthcare  insurance  premiums  are  rising  at  four  to  five  times  the 

rate of growth in wages and inflation. 

Much  of  these  rising  costs  can  be  attributed  to  underlying  demographic  trends 
and advances in medical care. The healthcare industry is being asked to offer ever- 
more sophisticated and expensive treatments for an aging population. 

Another  major  cost  driver  is  the  enormous  amount  of  ongoing  paperwork,  waste, 
and re-work. For instance, of the 30-billion individual healthcare communications in 
the  United  States,  more  than  90  percent  of  them  are  sent  by  fax,  surface  mail,  or 
telephone. A full 30 percent of the cost of healthcare can be attributed to these poor 
healthcare  practices.  In  fact,  this  industry  ranks  among  the  bottom  five  industries 
in  terms  of  contribution  to  U.S.  productivity,  according  to  a  Harvard  University 
study. 

If  we  look  at  other  industries,  we  see  a  direct  correlation  between  productivity 
gains and investment in information technology (IT) capital and solutions. These in-
dustries,  on  average,  invest  about  $8,000  per  year  per  employee  in  IT.  In  compari-
son, the healthcare industry invests only $1,100 per worker. 

But  saving  money  is  only  one  part  of  the  equation.  Information  technology  can 

also help reduce medical errors and save thousands of lives each year. 

Estimates  vary,  but  experts  believe  between  44,000  and  98,000  people  die  in  the 

United States each year from preventable medical errors. 

The  greatest  impact  on  cost,  productivity,  and  quality  can  be  driven  at  those 

points where patients receive care—in the physician’s office and in the hospital. 

If  healthcare  organizations  widely  adopted  just  one  information  technology  solu-
tion—electronic  health  records  (EHR)—the  industry  could  save  close  to  $78  billion 
annually. 

Taking  a  quick  look  at  the  IT  trends  in  healthcare,  we  find  that  deployment  of 
technology has been relatively slow, with implementation of each wave of new appli-
cations  taking  decades  rather  than  the  5  to  10  years  it  takes  in  other  IT-oriented 
industries. 

The  first  applications  implemented  in  the  late  1980s  to  early  1990s  were  depart-
mental  applications—lab  automation,  pictorial  archiving  systems,  human  resources 
systems, and patient admitting applications—all solutions designed to make specific 
departments in a healthcare provider more efficient. 

The  next  two  waves  of  applications  in  healthcare  have  been  broader,  including 
both enterprise solutions—such as electronic health record systems, clinical decision 
support  systems—and  inter-enterprise  applications  that  cross  institutional  bound-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

aries,  such  as  remote  patient  monitoring,  and  automated  payment  programs  that 
link providers with payors. 

Despite  the  proven  value  of  these  applications  in  specific  institutions,  less  than 
5  percent  of  healthcare  organizations  have  deployed  electronic  health  records,  10 
percent  computerized  physician  order  entry  systems  (CPOEs),  less  than  3  percent 
have  adopted  clinical  decision  support  and  less  than  one  percent  have  instituted 
support for Tele-Specialty—specifically electronic Intensive Care Units (eICU). 

The  most  challenging  roadblocks  to  adoption  overall  are:  a  lack  of  precise  inter-
operable standards, a misalignment of financial incentives across the industry, and, 
finally,  the  inherent  reluctance  to  change—especially  when  human  life  could  be  on 
the line. 

Like many enterprises, we have found at Cisco that IT can play a significant role 
in  improving  the  quality  of  care  while  driving  down  costs.  Cisco  Systems  provides 
healthcare  benefits  for  more  than  65,000  employees  and  dependents  worldwide. 
Looking  to  expand  the  use  of  technology  to  improve  the  healthcare  provided  to  our 
employees and dependents, Cisco is now focused on promoting the more rapid adop-
tion of electronic health records, electronic prescribing and secure physician-patient 
messaging,  and  will  be  adopting  a  pay  for  performance  program  in  2006  that  sup-
ports  these  objectives  with  key  physician  groups  serving  Cisco  employees  and  de-
pendents. 

The  advantages  of  e-prescribing  alone  are  significant,  given  that  50  percent  of 
calls  to  physician  offices  are  for  prescription  issues,  and  the  average  physician 
writes  30  prescriptions  a  day.  The  potential  impact  of  e-prescribing  includes  an  in-
crease  of  27  percent  generic  prescribing,  a  reduction  in  adverse  drug  prescribing  of 
15 percent, and an average per physician savings of $28,000 per year based on exist-
ing studies. 

Cisco has also had the privilege of participating in a number of IT healthcare de-
ployments  that  clearly  demonstrate  the  significant  role  information  technology  (IT) 
plays  in  improving  healthcare  quality,  reducing  costs,  and  enhancing  industry  pro-
ductivity. 

For example, we helped a community healthcare center in Florida deploy an elec-
tronic health records solution, which has cut lab turnaround time by 89 percent and 
is saving the center over $2 million annually. 

In  Virginia  and  North  Carolina,  we  assisted  a  healthcare  delivery  network  in  es-
tablishing a picture archive and communications system (PACs)—that delivers radi-
ology reports to doctors in minutes instead of days. 

And in the Mountain West, we helped a regional medical center set up a comput-
erized  physician  order  entry  system  (CPOEs),  which  reduced  antibiotic-related  ad-
verse drug events by 70 percent. 

I offer these examples to illustrate that health information technology is working 

to fix the major problems facing the healthcare industry today. 

Imagine  if  electronic  health  records  (EHR),  picture  archive  and  communication 
system  (PACs)  and  physician  computer  order  entry  system  (CPOE)  could  be  imple-
mented worldwide? Tens of thousands of lives could be spared and billions of dollars 
saved. 

Indeed,  study  after  study  demonstrate  the  impressive  impact  healthcare  IT  solu-

tions have on rising costs and quality of care. 

With  broad  adoption  of  proven  technology  solutions,  the  industry  could  save  over 
$200 billion annually, enough to bring healthcare costs in line with the current rate 
of inflation, or cover all the uninsured according to a variety of studies and presen-
tations  from  Center  for  Information  Technology  Leadership  (CITL),  and  American 
Health Quality Association (March 2004). 

It’s  clear  that  the  next  revolution  in  healthcare  will  use  information  to  drive  pa-
tient-centric,  safe,  and  efficient  care.  A  fitting  term  for  this  model  is  ‘‘Connected 
Health.’’ 

What is Connected Health? 
• Connected  Health  is  the  power  of  technology—not  simply  to  automate  old 
tasks—but  to  facilitate  richer  and  better  health  care  interactions  between  pa-
tients, physicians, and insurers. 
• Connected  Health  is  the  power  of  technology  to  place  information  at  the  point 
of care, empowering both providers and patients to make better, more informed 
decisions. 
• Connected  Health  is  the  power  of  technology  to  connect  doctors  with  hospitals, 
hospitals  with  pharmacies,  pharmacies  with  insurers,  insurers  with  patients, 
and finally, patients with doctors so that no one is stranded on their own island 
of information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

Changing  the  way  information  is  handled  may  not  seem  like  a  development  to 
rival  antibiotics  or  X-rays,  but  it  has  the  potential  to  be  every  bit  as  revolutionary. 
So  what’s  the  hold  up?  Why  is  healthcare  among  the  five  lowest  ranking  indus-

tries in information technology spending per employee? 

For  one,  the  industry  has  historically  under-invested  in  IT,  partly  because 

healthcare spending is decoupled from healthcare funding. 

And clearly complexity plays a part. Connected Health systems require significant 
investment,  standards,  metrics,  effective  change  management  and,  above  all,  a  top- 
down commitment to transformation. 

Healthcare organizations can get started by looking at their greatest needs, study-
ing what other institutions have done, and strategically deploying first-strike appli-
cations with proven impact. 

The challenge is great, but the stakes are higher. 
Healthcare  information  technology  has  proven  its  efficacy.  All  that’s  needed  now 

is the willpower and resources to deliver the solution nationwide. 

Thank you again, Mr. Chairman, Ranking Member Kerry, and other members on 
the Subcommittee for inviting me here today. I am happy to answer any questions. 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. Dr. Glaser. 

STATEMENT OF JOHN GLASER, PH.D., VICE PRESIDENT/ 
CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER, PARTNERS HEALTHCARE 

Dr. GLASER. Thank you Senators, my name is John Glaser, I am 
the  Chief  Information  Officer  for  Partners  HealthCare  in  Boston. 
Partners  provides  medical  care.  Our  academic  medical  centers, 
community hospitals, health centers, physician offices, and visiting 
nurses take care of over a million unique people a year. 

For  18  years  I’ve  been  responsible  for  the  implementation  of  in-
formation  technology  to  support  the  care  that  is  delivered  by  our 
physicians  and  nurses,  and  these  technologies,  include  the  elec-
tronic  medical  record,  e-prescribing,  tele-medicine  and  medical  im-
aging  system,  are  used  daily  by  over  10,000  care  providers  across 
Partners.  I  was  actually  responsible  for  the  implementation  of  the 
provider  order  center  at  Brigham—that  Senator  Kerry  mentioned, 
in his comments. I think it’s fair to say that Partners is one of the 
most  extensive  healthcare  users  of  information  technology.  Not 
only in this country but across the world. 

Now  based  on  our  experience,  I  think  there  is  no  question  at 
Partners that the systems when thoughtfully implemented can lead 
to  significant  improvements  in  the  care  that  we  deliver.  When  we 
study ourselves, we find that serious medication errors on the inpa-
tient side have been reduced by 55 percent. We find that the appro-
priateness  of  our  care  to  our  diabetic  population  increased  by  30 
percent.  We  find  we’ve  reduced  our  expenditures  on  expensive 
medications  by  15  percent,  and  we’ve  increased  the  productivity  of 
our  visiting  nurses  by  25  percent.  Now  if  you  use  our  experiences, 
and  the  experiences  of  others,  the  Center  for  Information  Tech-
nology  Leadership,  a  research  group  within  Partners  IS,  has  esti-
mated that if you took these systems and made them interoperable 
and  deployed  them  across  the  country,  it  would  provide  a  net  sav-
ings of $78 billion a year, equivalent to about 5 percent of the Na-
tion’s  healthcare  expenditure.  A  fairly  conservative  estimate,  but 
nonetheless a sizable amount of money. 

More  importantly  from  the  human  side,  there  would  be  a  reduc-
tion of about 2 million medication errors a year across the country 
from  these  kinds  of  technologies.  Partners  commits  about  $50  mil-
lion  a  year  to  doing  these  kinds  of  systems  and  is  committed  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

doing  so  for  the  foreseeable  future,  and  the  commitment  grows  by 
15 percent a year. 

In  fact  the  application  of  these  systems  is  the  most  strategic, 
critically  important  initiative  that  we  have  across  Partners,  and  I 
believe,  in  working  with  my  colleagues  across  this  industry,  that 
the  industry  as  a  whole  is  committed  to  advancing  IT  use. 
Healthcare providers, joined by employers, by insurance companies, 
by patients, by the industry overall are leading this effort and will 
continue to do so. 

Nonetheless,  I  think  the  Federal  Government  can  be  quite  help-
ful  to  us,  and  there  are  five  things  that  I  think  you  all  ought  to 
do. 

Number 1, these systems pose a very difficult financial challenge 
for most healthcare providers. This is what I brought up earlier. In 
our experience the electronic medical record can cost the physician 
$100,000 over 5 years. That’s what they’re going to pay out of their 
pockets.  Yet  89  percent  of  the  financial  value  that  results  accrues 
to  others.  So  if  we  reduce  medication  errors,  there’s  value  to  the 
payer,  there’s  a  value  to  the  employer,  there’s  obviously  value  to 
the  patient,  but  there  may  be  no  fiscal  reward  for  the  physician. 
So the physician while investing may see very little of the reward. 
Healthcare’s  rather  peculiar  in  this  country.  The  physician  is  gen-
erally not financially rewarded for delivering high-quality care and 
not  surprisingly  they  will  hesitate  to  make  investments  which 
cause them to lose money. 

As  the  country’s  largest  insurer  and  the  largest  employer,  you 
can  decide  to  reward  the  physician  for  delivering  better  care,  and 
for  making  the  investments  needed  to  deliver  the  best  care  that 
they  can.  I  also  think  there’s  some  stuff  you  can  do  regarding 
Stark, that allows us to share the cost with the physicians who are 
out in our community. 

Number 2, the country does need to settle on standards that en-
able us to connect these systems and share, as appropriate, the pa-
tient’s data between those that are involved in care. This is not al-
ways  a  shortage  of  standards,  but  rather  failure  to  decide  which 
standards  to  use  across  the  country.  The  Federal  Government  can 
convene,  and  through  its  size,  stature,  and  role  can  work  with  us 
to make decisions regarding standards. We’re not going to wait for 
standards. A lot of people are dying today. We need standards. But 
we’re not going to wait. Nonetheless progress should be made along 
those lines. 

Number  3,  implementation  of  these  systems  is  a  difficult  chal-
lenge for the physician. They must choose applications that involve 
complex  technology  and  they  must  change  the  way  they  do  work. 
Now  if  you’re  a  Partners  physician,  I  can  help  you.  If  you’re  an 
independent  physician,  or  a  small  hospital,  you  have  no  one  you 
can  turn  to.  Confronted  with  this  daunting  implementation  chal-
lenge  and  lack  of  someone  to  help  you,  physicians  will  either  hesi-
tate  to  adopt,  or  face  an  unnecessarily  risky  implementation.  The 
Federal Government can help establish mechanisms to support the 
independent  physician  and  small  hospital,  and  it  has  begun  to  do 
so through the quality improvement organizations. 

Number  4,  in  my  18  years  I’ve  seen  many  advances  in  informa-
tion technologies and these advances will continue through the rest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

of my career. The industry needs to learn which of these new tech-
nologies  hold  great  promise,  and  which  of  these  are  of  relatively 
minimal  value.  For  example,  if  we’re  able  to  actually  integrate  all 
of the providers in Eastern Massachusetts, how much unnecessary 
testing  can  we  avoid.  We  don’t  know  the  answer  to  that  kind  of 
question. Throughout the years the Federal Government most nota-
bly through AHRQ and the National Library of Medicine has been 
a  significant  sponsor  of  research  and  innovation  design  to  answer 
these  questions.  This  supported  sponsorship  is  essential,  and  it’s 
essential that it continue. 

Number  5,  across  the  country,  over  100  communities  have  come 
together  to  begin  to  put  in  place  the  infrastructure  necessary  to 
share electronic health records across their region, or their commu-
nity,  or  their  state.  In  Eastern  Massachusetts,  MA  SHARE,  and 
Massachusetts  eHealth  Collaborative  lead  these  efforts.  These  ef-
forts  hold  great  promise,  but  they’re  very  early  and  there’s  much 
to  be  learned.  The  Federal  Government  can  provide  seed  funding 
to  help  these  initiatives  get  started,  and  the  government  can  work 
with  organizations  such  as  the  eHeath  Initiative,  CHIME  which  is 
the  healthcare  CIO  gathering,  to  establish  mechanisms  through 
which  these  communities  can  share  experiences,  ideas,  and  work 
with each other. The Health Research, and Service Administration 
has  done  a  nice  job  in  the  Federal  Government  of  assisting  a  lot 
of this. 

So  anyway,  I  hope  my  comments  are  useful,  and  I  look  forward 

to the discussion that follows. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Glaser follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN GLASER, PH.D., VICE PRESIDENT/CHIEF INFORMATION 

OFFICER, PARTNERS HEALTHCARE 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee:  Good  morning.  My  name  is 
John  Glaser.  I  am  the  Vice  President  and  Chief  Information  Officer  of  Partners 
HealthCare.  Partners  HealthCare  is  an  integrated  system  of  medical  care  whose 
members  include  the  Brigham  and  Women’s  Hospital,  the  Massachusetts  General 
Hospital,  community  hospitals,  health  centers,  physician  practices  and  visiting 
nurses.  Over  the  course  of  a  year,  Partners  physicians  and  nurses  will  deliver  care 
in 4,000,000 outpatient visits and 160,000 admissions. 

I am also the President of the Board of the eHealth Initiative (eHI). The eHealth 
Initiative represents the multiple and diverse stakeholders in healthcare and health 
information—consumer and patient groups, employers and purchasers, health plans, 
hospitals,  laboratories,  practicing  clinicians,  public  health  agencies,  HIT  suppliers 
and  others—dedicated  to  driving  improvement  in  the  quality,  safety,  and  efficiency 
of healthcare through information and information technology. 
Implementation of Electronic Medical Records (EMRs) 

For the past 18 years, I have had the overall responsibility for the implementation 
of electronic health records (EHRs) at the Brigham and Women’s Hospital and then 
Partners HealthCare. 

During  this  time,  we  have  implemented  computerized  provider  order  entry 
(CPOE)  at  Brigham  and  Women’s  Hospital,  the  Massachusetts  General  Hospital, 
the Faulkner Hospital and the Dana Farber Cancer Institute. Physicians use CPOE 
to enter 30,000 clinical orders a day. Medical logic is applied to the order to ensure, 
for  example,  that  the  requested  medication  is  safe  or  the  radiology  procedure  being 
ordered  is  appropriate.  Implementation  across  all  our  community  hospitals  will  be 
completed by the end of next year. 

Currently,  we  have  2,600  Partners  physician  users  of  our  electronic  medical 
record  (EMR)  and  over  the  course  of  the  next  4  years,  we  will  add  an  additional 
2,000 physicians. Our implementation efforts are currently focused on physicians in 
our community practices. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

We  have  applied  telemedicine  to  offer  specialist  second  opinions  to  patients 
around the country and the world. And we support the home monitoring of patients 
with chronic diseases and recent surgical patients. 

We  provide  technologies  to  enable  patients  to  converse  with  their  physician  and 
access their medical record. Our base of 25,000 patients is growing at a rate of 7,000 
new patients a year. 

More  recently,  we  have  begun  to  invest  in  the  information  technology  necessary 
to  help  our  physician  researchers  understand  the  genomic  basis  of  disease.  These 
systems  help  the  researcher,  for  example,  to  determine  why  most  asthma  patients 
respond to steroid therapy, while 10 percent do not. 

In collaboration with regional providers and payers, we have recently begun to in-
tegrate our EHRs with those of other providers across the Commonwealth of Massa-
chusetts. 
Health Information Technology and Patient Safety 

Based  on  our  extensive  experience,  and  those  of  others,  there  is  no  question  that 
information technology, when thoughtfully applied, can be leveraged to effect signifi-
cant  improvements  in  the  safety,  quality  and  efficiency  of  the  care  that  we  deliver. 
Studies  of  CPOE  with  decision  support,  at  the  Brigham  and  Women’s  Hospital, 
show that medication errors were reduced by 80 percent and serious medication er-
rors were reduced by 55 percent. 

Additional  studies  of  CPOE  show  decreases  in  the  time  spent  by  patients  in  the 
hospital,  significant  reductions  in  inappropriate  antibiotic  use,  increased  appro-
priateness of medication and radiology procedure orders and significantly faster no-
tification of physicians regarding alarming patient test results. 

Electronic  medical  record  reminders  resulted  in  a  30  percent  increase  in  diabetic 
patients  and  25  percent  increase  in  patients  with  coronary  artery  disease  receiving 
recommended care. 

Our  electronic  medical  records  medication  ordering  system  provides  guidance  to 
the  physician  and  has  led  to  15  percent  of  all  orders  being  changed  to  lower  cost, 
but equally effective medications. 

Remote monitoring of elderly patients with congestive heart failure not only leads 
to  earlier  detection  of  possible  deterioration  in  heart  function,  but  also  results  in  a 
25 percent improvement in productivity for our visiting nurses. 

When data such as ours and others are extrapolated across the country, the Cen-
ter  for  Information  Technology  Leadership,  a  healthcare  information  technology 
analysis  group  at  Partners,  finds  that  the  widespread  implementation  of  interoper-
able  EHRs  would  provide  a  national  net  savings  of  $78B  per  year  (5  percent  of  the 
Nation’s  total  healthcare  costs)  by  avoiding  medical  errors,  reducing  unnecessary 
care  and  improving  administrative  efficiency.  Such  systems  are  projected  to  elimi-
nate 2,000,000 adverse drug events per year across the Nation. 
Challenges of Health Information Technology 

While  offering  significant  gains,  the  implementation  of  these  systems  and  the 
achievement  of  improvements  in  patient  care  are  very  complex  and  difficult  under-
takings. 

Physicians  and  nurses  must  learn  new  ways  of  doing  their  work.  Hospital  and 
physician practice workflow must change. At times, performing a task using a com-
puter takes longer than using paper. For providers already facing extreme demands 
on their time, these changes and time commitments can be overwhelming. 

Healthcare  providers  confront  a  complex  financial  decision  when  they  seek  to  in-
vest in these applications. While they are committed to the mission of delivering the 
best possible patient care, these systems represent significant capital commitments. 
With  a  reimbursement  system  that  very  often  does  not  reward  them  for  improving 
quality, or support them in making these investments, their precarious financial po-
sitions and limited resources prevents them from pursuing these systems. For exam-
ple, an EMR can have a five-year cost of $100,000 per physician. This cost can pose 
an  insurmountable  barrier  for  a  physician  who  is  facing  decreasing  Medicare  reim-
bursement. 

Assuming that physicians and hospitals can overcome the difficult changes in clin-
ical practice and can find the necessary funds, the majority of them have little expe-
rience with the acquisition and implementation of EHRs. They want to proceed but 
they don’t know how and they are rightfully concerned with making significant mis-
takes.  This  is  particularly  true  for  the  small  physician  practice  and  small  commu-
nity hospital. 

At Partners we confront these challenges every day. And every hospital, physician 
practice,  health  center  and  visiting  nurse  agency  in  the  country  confronts  these 
challenges. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Community Health Information Exchange 

60 

To  these  challenges,  we  are  beginning  to  add  a  new  dimension  of  complexity:  the 
formation  of  regional  and  national  networks  to  integrate  EHRs  across  providers. 
There  is  no  question  that  interoperable  EHRs  are  a  necessary  step  in  our  efforts 
to improve patient care. But there is also no question that there is very little experi-
ence  with  how  to  organize  communities,  develop  the  necessary  information  tech-
nologies,  identify  strategies  for  addressing  complex  issues  such  as  privacy,  and 
mechanisms  to  ensure  the  ongoing  financial  stability  of  these  efforts.  This  com-
plexity  is  compounded  by  the  bewildering  array  of  standards  that  are  often  incon-
sistent, hindering our ability to efficiently connect our systems. 

There  is  much  that  provider,  payers,  employers,  and  patients  can  do  to  address 
these challenges and further the thoughtful adoption of EHRs. Partners HealthCare 
is  an  example  of  an  organization  that  is  committed  to  improving  care  through  the 
use of information technology. We spend over $50M annually to acquire, implement 
and support EHRs. (This investment is in stark contrast to the $150M annual budg-
et  of  the  Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology.  A 
budget that, while well intentioned, is clearly insufficient to move the Nation toward 
the widespread adoption of interoperable electronic health records). 

Partners is not alone. Many provider organizations are making significant invest-
ments in EHRs. Across the country, the healthcare community and its stakeholders 
are coming together in national and regional forums to discuss the industry’s collec-
tive efforts, learn from each other and jointly develop analyses, guides and positions. 
The eHealth Initiative 

The eHealth Initiative is supporting these efforts through its formation of working 
groups  of  physicians,  employers/purchasers  and  community  collaboratives  whose 
members  come  together  to  address  the  mutual  challenges.  The  eHI,  national  meet-
ing, Connecting Communities for Better Health (CCBH), held 1 month ago, was at-
tended  by  representatives  of  over  100  communities  that  have  begun  to  implement 
local  interoperability.  The  Parallel  Pathways  Framework  of  eHI  has  been  hailed  as 
an important guide to the industry as it seeks to integrate financial incentives, qual-
ity reporting, EHR adoption and community-based interoperability. 
Federal Leadership 

And  while,  the  healthcare  industry  and  those  who  have  a  stake  in  the  industry’s 
efforts to improve care, must lead and are leading these efforts, the Federal Govern-
ment must play a critical role in supporting this work. 

A  very  significant  national  hurdle  is  the  misalignment  of  financial  incentives  for 
EHR  adoption.  The  provider  must  bear  100  percent  of  the  costs  of  these  systems 
and yet studies suggest that 89 percent of the economic benefit flows to groups and 
organizations  other  than  the  provider.  Improvements  in  the  safety  of  patient  care 
will  benefit  the  employer,  payer  and  patient  but  there  is  little  economic  benefit  to 
the provider. Hence the provider is confronting an investment that, while improving 
the  care  that  they  deliver,  has  a  high  likelihood  of  leading  to  an  economic  loss  for 
the practice. At Partners, we have begun to address this problem through very con-
structive  discussions  with  local  payers  that  have  led  to  modest  reimbursement  to 
physicians who adopt an EHR by the end of 2006. 

The Federal Government is the country’s largest employer and payer. The Federal 
Government can alter its Medicare reimbursement approaches and the provider ar-
rangements  for  its  employees  such  that  improvements  in  care  and  investments  in 
necessary information technology will be financially rewarded. 

The  inconsistency,  and  at  times  dearth,  of  necessary  data  and  data  exchange 
standards hinders our ability to create the necessary interoperability between EHRs 
and  our  ability  to  report  on  the  quality  and  cost  of  the  care  that  we  deliver.  The 
Federal Government can use its powers of convening and persuasion to help the in-
dustry  resolve  these  problems.  And  the  government  can  insist  that  the  Federal 
health sector adopts and implements standards. 

A  community  hospital  or  small  physician  group  in  Massachusetts  that  wants  to 
invest  in  information  technology  can  turn  to  me  and  my  staff  for  assistance.  How-
ever,  if  you  are  small  physician  practice  or  a  small  community  hospital,  there  may 
be no one who can provide this assistance. Mechanisms are needed to bring informa-
tion  technology  support  to  those  providers  who  do  not  have  the  benefit  of  an  infor-
mation technology staff. The Federal Government can leverage its resources to help 
establish and sustain needed support mechanisms. The current Doctors Office Qual-
ity Information Technology program (DOQ–IT) is an example. 

The  Federal  Government  should  consider  changes  in  the  Stark  and  Anti-Fraud 
laws to enable organizations such as Partners to extend its EHRs and its implemen-
tation expertise to physician practices and share the costs with the physician. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Partners is an active member of MA SHARE and the Massachusetts eHealth Col-
laborative  efforts  to  provide  Commonwealth-wide  interoperability  of  EHRs.  And  at 
the eHealth Initiative, we see over 100 comparable efforts across the country. 

These  efforts  need  to  be  nurtured  and  they  invariable  need  access  to  seed  funds. 
While  they  should  strive  to  be  financially  self-sustaining  within  a  couple  of  years, 
the availability of federally sponsored grants and loans will be a critical contributor 
to these early efforts. 

While we at Partners have been implementing EHRs for many years, there is still 
much that we do not know about their impact on patient care. New technologies and 
innovations bring new opportunities, but studies are needed to help the industry un-
derstand the potential contributions of these opportunities. We know even less about 
the  value  of  regional  and  statewide  interoperable  EHRs.  The  Federal  Government, 
in particularly AHRQ, has been a major supporter of research on the value and im-
pact of information technology in medical care. These studies provide very important 
insight for all of our efforts and should continue. 

The Federal Government has extraordinary leadership leverage. Both elected and 
appointed officials can use this role to convene the industry, to encourage its partici-
pants  to  resolve  problems,  to  use  speeches  and  appearances  to  continuously  stress 
the  need  for  interoperable  EHRs  and  to  respond,  as  needed,  to  industry  problems 
by  crafting  appropriate  legislation.  This  role  is  not  a  transient  one;  rather  it  will 
be needed for years to come. The industry does listen. 
Conclusion 

I  know  that  many  of  the  recommendations  described  above  are  being  analyzed 
and  several  are  in  the  process  of  being  put  in  place.  And  I  know  that  I  will  have 
undoubtedly  failed  to  appreciate  the  complexity  and  nuances  of  carrying  out  these 
recommendations. However, I live the reality of implementing EHRs every day and 
I  see  the  reality  of  my  colleagues  across  the  country.  From  those  perspectives  I  be-
lieve that I can see what is needed. 

All  of  us,  and  those  who  we  love,  seek  healthcare.  I  won’t  recite  the  now  well- 
known numbers that illustrate the litany of problems that afflict our healthcare sys-
tem.  I  do  know  that  I  want  my  kids  and  my  eventual  grand  kids  to  have  a 
healthcare  system  that  has  made  major  strides  in  safety,  appropriateness  and  effi-
ciency.  And  I  have  committed  my  professional  life  to  helping  to  create  that  system 
through the application of information technology. 

Providers,  payers,  employers  and  patients  must  shoulder  most  of  the  burden  to 
improve  healthcare.  And  they  are  willing  to  do  so.  I  am  often  struck,  during  con-
versations with health care leadership across the country, by the depth of their com-
mitment and that they will continue their EHR efforts, even if the Federal response 
is minimal. 

However, the Federal Government actions or inactions will have a very significant 
impact on the pace of change, the degree to which we avoid mis-steps and our even-
tual success. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  welcome  the  opportunity  to  respond 

to your questions. 

Senator ENSIGN. Dr. Basch. 

STATEMENT OF DR. PETER BASCH, MEDICAL DIRECTOR, 

EHEALTH INITIATIVES, MEDSTAR HEALTH 

Dr.  BASCH.  Good  morning,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator 
Allen. And thank you for the opportunity to address you today. I’ve 
also submitted more detailed testimony for the record. My contribu-
tion to this panel is to provide the input of a practicing general in-
ternist who has used an EHR, in practice for almost a decade, and 
also to show the Subcommittee concrete examples of how the EHR 
can be used to transform care particularly in the setting of a small 
practice,  where  80  percent  of  outpatient  care  is  delivered  in  this 
country.  I  also  hope  that  my  testimony  answers  the  Chairman’s 
questions to Dr. Clancy regarding how to bring best practices to the 
level of the physician practice. 

I  wholeheartedly  agree  that  the  EHRs  and  HIT  have  the  poten-
tial  to  make  healthcare  better,  safer,  and  more  affordable.  But  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

wish  to  introduce  this  note  of  caution.  The  mere  adoption  of  inter-
operable  EHRs  by  themselves  is  not  likely  to  result  in  the  signifi-
cant value that has been talked about today. Realizing the full po-
tential  of  the  EHRs  requires  additional  advanced  software,  secure 
connectivity,  and  most  importantly  a  sustainable  business  case  for 
care  management  and  quality.  Without  these  additional  compo-
nents,  coupled  with  reimbursement  and  policy  changes,  EHRs  are 
more likely to be used simply to automate the administrative func-
tions in practice, such as documentation, and coding for billing pur-
poses. 

This  is  a  view  of  the  electronic  health  record  that  I  use  in  my 
own  office,  and  as  good  as  it  is  by  itself,  it’s  essentially  a  digital 
filing cabinet. I agree that what it does give me is the potential to 
see  it  anywhere,  anytime;  as  well  as  to  be  able  to  look  at  vitally 
important  things  such  as  problem  lists,  medications,  allergies,  and 
other important clinical data. 

However  when  we  add  in  advanced  decision  support,  it  becomes 
far  more  powerful.  I’m  not  quite  sure  how  well  this  shows  up,  but 
let’s  assume  in  a  real  practice  setting  of  a  7  to  10  minute  office 
visit,  this  patient  comes  in  for  a  sinus  infection.  What  this  ad-
vanced  EHR  reminds  me  of,  by  having  the  little  boxes  on  the  bot-
tom  which  are  all  chronic  conditions,  (defined  as  important  by  my 
health  system)  other  conditions  that  this  patient  has.  So  while  I 
am  there  to  treat  the  patient  for  the  problem  he  came  in  with,  I 
see  I  also  should  address  these  other  conditions.  In  this  instance 
that  of  him  being  on  a  blood  thinner,  having  diabetes,  hyper-
tension, and high cholesterol. 

We can go a step further in using advanced decision support, and 
this  is  what  it  could  look  like  in  a  physician’s  office.  Here  it  is 
granular,  tailored  to  the  specific  patient  and  focused  on  his  or  her 
age, sex, labs, diagnoses, and meds. And it’s actionable. I’m able to 
look at it and take immediate action. 

In  this  decision  support  prompt  for  example,  while  this  patient 
is  here  for  a  sinus  infection,  if  I  chose  to  look  and  pay  attention 
to it, I would see that I have made some critical errors. I have not 
created  a  stop-date  for  this  medication  (a  blood  thinner)  or  set  a 
target  level.  And  let  me  reiterate  this,  this  is  an  exceedingly  dan-
gerous medication and without paying attention to those particular 
issues, patients can be harmed. 

In this next slide, which is showing decision support for diabetes, 
here  I’m  reminded  of  several  key  aspects  of  diabetic  care,  such  as 
the fact that I haven’t enrolled this patient in a diabetes education 
program;  or  this  patient  is  not  at  target  goals  for  cholesterol  man-
agement;  and  I  haven’t  done  any  of  the  necessary  diabetes  moni-
toring tests that we all recognize are important. 

My  point  is,  that  very  few  EHRs  provide  what  I’ve  just  shown 
you in these last two pictures. Either this level of detail, or decision 
support that is actionable. But given these tools and the incentives 
to use them, we can do more than what I would call informed care. 
We can begin to transform care. Now, what do I mean by transform 
care? 

Well  the  first  step  in  care  transformation  is  realizing  that  all 
care  does  not  have  to  occur  in  a  doctor-to-patient  office  visit.  The 
first  step  in  my  view  is  forming  a  partnership  with  the  patient. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Here  the  EHR  can  facilitate  this  collaboration  with  patient-level 
decision  support.  And  this  can  be  done  through  a  secure  patient 
portal,  interconnected  with  an  EHR,  as  you  can  see  on  the  screen, 
or with a personal health record (PHR). For example if I’m hound-
ing  my  patient  about  getting  something  called  microalbumin,  the 
patient  can  click  on  the  question  mark  and  actually  see  what  that 
means. 

Taking healthcare transformation to the next step requires using 
a  registry.  This  allows  us  to  practice  proactive  care,  or  population 
management, and this is integrated with my records so it’s fed with 
real clinical data. It allows me to address guidelines and best prac-
tices, not just when patients come for a visit, but for my entire pop-
ulation.  I  can  use  this  to  look  at  all  of  my  diabetic  patients,  for 
their blood sugars, their cholesterols, and so forth. 

Here’s  an  example  of  a  secure  patient  portal,  linked  to  the  EHR 
for  chronic  care  management,  as  well  as  some  acute  care  manage-
ment, which can be done safely and more efficiently without requir-
ing a face-to-face office visit. 

What I’ve just shown you is the use of the EHR to not just auto-
mate  care,  but  to  inform  care  through  detailed  actionable  decision 
support,  and  to  transform  care  through  the  use  of  patient-directed 
education,  an  integrated  registry,  and  a  patient  portal.  This  is 
where I believe the majority of the benefit of EHRs will arise. 

And  this  can  be  done  by  ordinary  physicians  even  in  the  small 
practice settings. These value-laden activities are rarely performed 
even  in  technologically  advanced  practices  as  they  add  cost  to  the 
already  expensive  EHR.  And  more  importantly,  their  use  can  sub-
stantially  reduce  the  physician’s  income,  as  unlike  office  visits  or 
procedures,  time  spent  on  care  coordination,  population  manage-
ment,  and  e-care  is  currently  uncompensated.  However  if  coupled 
with new payment paradigms including thoughtful pay-for-perform-
ance, these advanced features of the EHR can help them make the 
decade  of  the  EHR  a  success,  with  care  that  truly  becomes  better, 
safer, and more affordable. 

Mr.  Chairman,  and  Senator  Allen,  and  other  members  of  the 
Committee,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  address  you  today, 
and I’m available to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Basch follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. PETER BASCH, MEDICAL DIRECTOR, 

EHEALTH INITIATIVES, MEDSTAR HEALTH 

Mr. Chairman and the members of the Subcommittee: 
I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  the  Subcommittee  to  discuss  the  promise  of  elec-
tronic  health  records  (EHR),  and  the  barriers  to  their  optimal  use  in  outpatient 
medical  practice.  I  have  been  a  practicing  primary  care  physician  for  25  years,  and 
have  used  an  EHR  in  my  practice  for  the  past  8  years.  In  addition  to  practicing 
medicine  within  a  small  practice  located  here  on  Capitol  Hill,  I  also  serve  as  the 
Medical  Director  for  eHealth  at  MedStar  Health,  with  the  responsibility  of  deter-
mining  and  directing  strategies  for  physicians  regarding  e-health  applications  in 
ambulatory care, which are oriented toward improving patient care and quality, and 
improving practice efficiency and efficacy. MedStar Health is a not-for-profit commu-
nity  healthcare  system  that  includes  seven  hospitals  in  the  Baltimore-Washington 
corridor,  including  Georgetown  University  Hospital  and  the  Washington  Hospital 
Center. In addition, I represent the American College of Physicians within the Phy-
sicians’ EHR Coalition (PEHRC); a coalition of twenty-one medical professional and 
specialty societies, dedicated to furthering the adoption and optimal use of electronic 
health  records,  and  serve  as  the  PEHRC’s  Co-Chair.  Furthermore,  I  am  the  Co- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

Chair  of  the  eHealth  Initiative’s  Working  Group  for  HIT  in  Small  Practices.  While 
my  testimony  is  consistent  with  stated  positions  regarding  EHR  adoption  and  use 
of these organizations, I am here today testifying solely on my own behalf. 

By  all  accounts,  I  am  an  early  adopter  of  electronic  health  records;  having  em-
ployed  them  in  my  practice  since  the  mid-1990s.  Since  that  time,  the  capabilities 
of  EHR  have  advanced  dramatically,  as  has  our  understanding  of  their  value  in 
medical  practice.  The  initial  impetus  for  my  adoption  of  an  EHR  was  a  response  to 
the  pressures  of  managed  care,  which  required  primary  care  doctors  like  me  to  see 
more  patients  in  less  time,  as  well  as  produce  and  manage  increasing  amounts  of 
paperwork.  At  that  time,  I  saw  the  potential  of  EHR  quite  narrowly—as  an  elec-
tronic  filing  cabinet—an  administrative  tool  that  would  help  relieve  me  of  some  of 
the paperwork burden and also allow for added productivity; something to automate 
care. 

Today,  after  years  of  using  an  electronic  health  record  in  my  own  practice,  and 
years  of  working  more  broadly  in  the  health  information  technology  field,  I  believe 
the  analogy  of  an  EHR  as  electronic  filing  cabinet  is  not  only  inapt,  but  wrong-
headed  as  well.  Advanced  EHRs  are  not  and  should  not  simply  be  about  digitizing 
the  information  associated  with  existing  care  processes.  In  my  view,  that  would  do 
little more than digitize dysfunction. The real power of an EHR optimally integrated 
into  practice  is  far  greater.  Properly  implemented,  an  EHR  can  be  a  tool  for  better 
informing multiple care processes, and even lead to healthcare transformation, lead-
ing to further enhancements in quality, safety and efficiency, and efficacy. 

Having said that, it is important to put EHRs in perspective. They are a powerful 
healthcare technology, not a cure-all for the many challenges facing medicine today. 
Unless  the  adoption  of  an  EHR  is  coupled  to  both  significant  process  change  (prac-
tice redesign) and payment reform that creates a sustainable business case for qual-
ity and care management, EHRs will not meet their promise. 

Properly  implemented,  EHRs  can  be  the  cornerstone  of  a  redesigned  twenty-first 
century healthcare system that harnesses information to empower patients and care 
providers  and  improve  quality.  The  integration  of  EHRs  into  practice  exponentially 
raises the value of information in the clinical process, enabling a fundamental trans-
formation  for  doctor  and  patient.  For  physicians,  EHRs  bring  advanced  and  action-
able knowledge to the point-of-care, putting excellence in healthcare delivery within 
the reach of all doctors. For patients, EHRs enables true partnerships and collabora-
tions  with  their  healthcare  team.  The  vision  of  a  patient-centric  healthcare  system 
where quality, safety and efficiency are enabled by cutting-edge technology is a com-
pelling one: 

• Patients  will  be  empowered  and  actively  involved  in  their  care.  They  will  col-
laborate  with  providers  in  decisionmaking  around  care  and  have  ready  access 
to accurate and trusted healthcare information, including their own medical his-
tories, disease-specific information and decision support tools for self-care; 
• Reliability  and  safety  will  increase  because  physicians  will  practice  evidence- 
based medicine, have access to knowledge and information at the point of care, 
be  guided  by  active  decision  support  tools  and  routinely  communicate  and  co-
operate with other care providers; 
• Care will move from episodic encounters to a continuous care model where pro-
viders  have  access  to  patient  data  in  context;  care  is  delivered  proactively, 
chronic illnesses are monitored by caregivers, patients are able to engage in in-
formed self-care and duplication and waste are minimized; and 
• Accountability for quality will increase. Quality will be measured and the infor-

mation shared with all stakeholders; and quality care will be rewarded. 

While we are still a long way from realizing this vision (only about 10–15 percent 
of physicians are using EHRs in their office practices), the future is now in my own 
practice,  and  within  18–24  months  will  also  be  in  the  practices  of  all  of  the  clini-
cians  at  MedStar  Physician  Partners,  a  group  of  outpatient  practices  owned  by 
MedStar  Health.  My  colleagues  and  I  use  an  advanced  EHR  that  provides  access 
to  the  full  patient  record—including  all  relevant  clinical  information  such  as  diag-
noses,  immunizations,  medications  and  test  results,  which  is  always  available  in  a 
highly  organized  and  contextually-appropriate  format,  improving  the  quality  of  our 
decisionmaking  at  the  point  of  care.  Computers  are  located  in  each  of  the  exam 
rooms,  making  it  easy  to  share  information  with  patients  and  better  include  them 
in their own care decisions. 

For  example,  at  the  start  of  each  visit,  the  patient  is  encouraged  to  look  at  his 
or  her  medication  and  allergy  list  and  confirm  its  accuracy  (see  Figure  1).  Patient 
educational materials are integrated into the system, and soon the EHR will provide 
clinical decision support for patients, which will allow them to make better decisions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

about self-care for chronic illnesses (see Figure 2). The EHR is also designed to link 
to  new  medical  information,  practice  guidelines  and  even  recent  reference  articles, 
dramatically shortening the time from discovery of new knowledge to its application 
into clinical practice. Our EHR is also integrated with electronic prescribing, further 
increasing  safety  and  efficiency  of  prescribing  (see  Figures  3  and  4).  And  because 
the EHR is also available remotely, on-call physicians can view patient records and 
make care decisions based on the full context of a patient’s clinical information any-
time and anywhere. 

With our fully integrated EHRs, lab reports flow directly from reference and hos-
pital labs securely into the patient record, showing up on the physician’s PC for im-
mediate review. This not only makes report review quicker—it also makes it better; 
new results can easily be viewed or graphed and interpreted in the context of prior 
results  and  the  patient’s  full  history.  Even  digital  EKGs  can  be  reviewed  and  com-
pared with earlier tests. 

EHRs  become  more  powerful  when  they  use  decision  support  tools  that  not  only 
provide  timely  information,  but  also  help  clinicians  turn  that  information  into  ac-
tionable knowledge. Active decision support tools are designed to connect key infor-
mation such as a diagnosis with links, pop-ups, prompts and reminders that encour-
age  discrete  changes  in  patient  management.  While  passive  decision  support  puts 
key  information  in  front  of  the  clinician,  active  support  links  patient  information, 
guidelines and best practices, and provides an immediate opportunity to take action. 
For  example,  in  the  case  of  a  diabetic  patient,  an  active  decision  support  tool  will 
trigger  reminders  about  clinical  management  of  diabetes  such  as  an  overdue  test, 
even  if  the  patient  has  made  an  appointment  about  a  sinus  infection  (see  Figure 
5).  Robust  uses  of  decision  support  tools  thus  have  the  power  to  inform  an  episode 
of  care  (the  visit  for  a  sinus  infection)  into  an  opportunity  to  also  include  and  opti-
mize chronic care management (see Figures 6 and 7). 

But  by  far  the  greatest  potential  for  an  EHR  to  improve  quality,  efficiency,  and 
efficacy  comes  from  its  use  to  transform  care.  The  transformative  uses  of  an  EHR 
include integration of a registry for proactive care and population management (see 
Figure  8);  integration  with  a  secure  patient  portal  or  personal  health  record  (see 
Figure  9)  for  appropriate  use  of  non-face-to-face  care  or  eCare;  and  use  of  the  EHR 
to optimize team-based care or care coordination. 

EHR  integration  with  a  population  or  disease  registry  allows  clinicians  to 
proactively  review  subsets  of  patients  and  take  affirmative  steps  to  ensure  adher-
ence  to  nationally  accepted  best  practices.  For  example,  Washington  Primary  Care 
Physicians was recently recognized by the Delmarva Foundation, our regional Qual-
ity  Improvement  Organization,  for  its  high  rate  of  pneumonia  vaccination  in  Medi-
care  patients—a  process  made  possible  by  our  use  of  an  EHR  with  patient  registry 
functions. And when the arthritis medication Vioxx was recently recalled, all of our 
patients on the medication, among the 25,000 in the practice, were identified within 
minutes and then contacted. 

What  is  critical  to  understand  is  that  in  order  to  fully  harness  the  power  of  an 
EHR for transformation, the role of the physician and other caregivers in a medical 
practice  must  also  change,  from  providers  of  discrete  episodes  of  medical  care,  only 
when  patients  sense  that  they  are  sick  or  due  for  a  particular  service,  to  a  more 
proactive  model  of  chronic  and  ongoing  care  management.  The  care  manager  or  co-
ordinator,  utilizing  a  patient-centric  and  physician-guided  approach,  would  use  an 
EHR and other health information technologies to create a medical home for all nec-
essary  information  about  his/her  patients,  focusing  particularly  on  those  with  com-
plex  and  chronic  illnesses,  and  coordinating  care  between  multiple  specialists  in 
order  to  optimize  care,  and  to  avoid  conflicting  treatment  plans  and  duplicative 
tests. 

Why  isn’t  this  vision  now  a  reality  in  every  doctor’s  office?  Much  progress  has 
been  made  in  recent  years  in  making  EHRs  better  and  more  affordable.  And  I  be-
lieve  that  we  are  on  target  to  meeting  the  President’s  goal  of  universal  EHR  adop-
tion by 2014. However, I also believe that this universal adoption and use of EHRs 
per se, will do little to making care better, safer, and more efficacious. To accomplish 
those  goals  will  take  more  than  placing  a  computer  on  a  desktop;  as  discussed 
above, it will require using the EHR as a tool to inform and transform care and care 
processes. And EHRs that can inform and transform care are even more expensive; 
and  more  importantly,  the  more  EHRs  are  used  for  informational  and  trans-
formational purposes, the more negative the business case for the physician. 

Right now, the healthcare reimbursement system is designed to pay clinicians for 
procedures  and  episodic  clinical  care.  Proactive  care,  care  coordination,  information 
management  and  eCare  that  lead  to  overall  quality  improvements  and  cost  savings 
are  generally  not  reimbursed.  If  as  a  matter  of  national  policy,  we  want  physicians 
not  only  to  invest  in  EHRs,  but  also  to  use  them  in  an  optimal  manner  that  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

improve  quality  and  safety,  (that  is  as  a  care  management  tool,  not  just  an  elec-
tronic  filing  cabinet),  we  have  to  do  more  than  mandate  EHRs,  and  address  what 
the Institute of Medicine has called our ‘‘toxic payment system.’’ 

What does this look like to the average physician? Moving beyond the basic EHR 
to one that informs care, as mentioned above, adds thousands of dollars of cost, and 
by  adding  necessary  time  and  complexity  to  each  office  visit  (for  chronically  ill  pa-
tients),  reduces  the  number  of  patients  that  a  physician  can  see  each  day.  Adding 
an  integrated  registry  implies  that  the  clinician  will  intentionally  take  time  out  of 
the practice day to use the registry to manage patients who are not coming in when 
they  should,  or  who  are  not  at  target  treatment  goals.  And  adding  in  eCare  means 
that  reimbursed  office  visits  are  substituted  for  free  virtual  care.  While  the  use  of 
a registry and eCare for some specialties would have little impact on daily practice; 
their  optimal  use  by  family  physicians  and  internists  could  reduce  their  income  to 
zero. 

Fortunately,  pay-for-performance  and  pay-for  quality  initiatives  recognize  this 
problem, and seek to address it with a mix of financial incentives including support 
for the initial EHR investment as well as increased pay for adherence to quality per-
formance  measures,  as  well  as  reimbursement  reform  that  pays  for  care  coordina-
tion  and  eCare.  My  practice,  for  example,  has  recently  been  selected  by  CareFirst 
to  serve  as  its  first  pilot  site  for  the  pay-for-performance  Bridges  to  Excellence  pro-
gram,  which  will  provide  us  with  additional  financial  incentives  for  optimal  use  of 
our EHRs for care coordination and quality improvements—which by the way, is the 
only  reason  that  we  were  able  to  afford  the  EHR  enhancements  I  have  been  dis-
cussing.  However,  if  we  want  EHRs  to  enable  excellence  globally,  we  have  to  move 
from pilots to policy reform. 

In conclusion, enormous progress has been made within the last few years in ad-
vancing the vision and reality of EHR use and interconnected electronic healthcare. 
The  credit  for  this  remarkable  work  belongs  to  many—within  government  and  the 
private  sector;  and  on  both  sides  of  the  political  aisle.  As  a  practicing  physician,  I 
can  personally  attest  to  its  value  in  my  everyday  practice.  But  as  we  get  closer  to 
realizing  this  vision  of  technology  implementation  for  all  clinicians,  there  remains 
a  substantial  risk  that  defining  success  as  universal  EHR  adoption  will  actually  do 
very  little  good  for  the  American  people.  For  success  to  be  seen  more  broadly  than 
IT  adoption,  and  more  appropriately  as  EHRs  integrated  into  practice  to  both  in-
form and transform care—fundamental changes must occur within payment and re-
imbursement  policies.  As  advanced  EHRs,  combined  with  these  enlightened  incen-
tives, will make care better, safer, and more effective, efficient, and equitable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
s
a
b

.

s
p
e
1
s
a
b

68 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
s
a
b

.

s
p
e
3
s
a
b

69 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
6
s
a
b

.

s
p
e
5
s
a
b

70 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
8
s
a
b

.

s
p
e
7
s
a
b

71 

The  MedStar  eHealth  Initiative  report  entitled,  At  A  Tipping  Point:  Trans-
forming Medicine with Health Information Technology—A Guide for Consumers, 
has been retained in Committee files. 

Senator ENSIGN. Ms. Pure. 

STATEMENT  OF  PAMELA  PURE,  PRESIDENT,  MCKESSON 
PROVIDER  TECHNOLOGIES;  EXECUTIVE  VICE  PRESIDENT, 
MCKESSON CORPORATION 
Ms.  PURE.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Allen,  I’m  Pam  Pure.  I’m  the 
Executive  Vice  President  of  McKesson  Corporation.  And  I’m  Presi-
dent  of  McKesson  Provider  Technologies,  our  healthcare  informa-
tion business. 

For  over  170  years  McKesson,  a  Fortune  15  Company,  has  led 
the  industry  in  the  delivery  of  medications  and  healthcare  prod-
ucts. In addition, McKesson is the largest provider of healthcare IT. 
Our  only  business  is  healthcare.  I  have  personally  spent  the  last 
20 years witnessing first hand the benefits of healthcare IT and the 
challenges associated with its adoption. 

For  me  this  is  not  just  a  job,  it’s  really  a  personal  passion.  Con-
gress  is  considering  numerous  bills  to  promote  healthcare  IT  and 
the  President  has  outlined  a  bold  vision  to  ensure  every  American 
has  an  electronic  medical  record.  McKesson  applauds  these  initia-
tives,  but,  to  spur  the  adoption  of  healthcare  technology,  we  really 
must  start  now,  and  we  must  start  with  proven  technologies  that 
can be deployed immediately. 

Technologies  that  will  save  lives,  reduce  errors,  improve  quality, 
and lower costs. And we can do this while we begin to develop the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
9
s
a
b

72 

standards.  Once  the  information  is  collected,  we  can  share  it  in  a 
safe and secure environment. What I would like to do is spend just 
a  minute  to  describe  three  high  impact  technologies  that  can  de-
liver  great  value  to  the  American  public,  while  providing  a  strong 
foundation for safe care. 

First, Bedside Bar-Code Scanning. All medications should be bar- 
coded  and  scanned  at  the  bedside.  When  you  think  about  it,  it’s 
really  intolerable  that  people  die  every  single  day  from  medication 
errors  that  could  easily  be  prevented  with  bar-code  technology. 
Technology that exists at our grocery stores. Today, on average, 30 
people  touch  a  medication  before  it’s  actually  administered,  pro-
viding  tremendous  opportunity  for  missed  hand-offs,  and  errors. 
Imagine the complexity for the nurse who typically administers 10 
meds  per  patient,  per  day.  Or  the  safety  risk  for  a  transplant  pa-
tient  who  might  receive  36  different  medications  in  a  single  shift. 
Imagine how quickly we could eliminate medication errors if a med 
was bar-coded and scanned. 

As  a  country,  wouldn’t  it  be  great  to  have  confidence  that  the 
right  meds  were  being  delivered  to  the  right  patient  every  single 
time? You know it’s actually very simple. You can deliver meds like 
this,  and,  when  it’s  candy,  it  doesn’t  matter  if  you  pick  a  yellow 
M&M  or  a  yellow  Skittle,  but,  when  it’s  medication,  picking  the 
wrong  one  can  cost  you  your  life.  That’s  why  we  have  to  work  like 
this: we have to use hand-held scanning, we have to insist on indi-
vidual unit dose, bar code-labeled meds that can be scanned at the 
bedside.  Then  it  doesn’t  matter  if  the  meds  look  alike,  or  if  they 
sound  alike.  It’s  simple,  if  their  scan  doesn’t  match,  the  nurse 
doesn’t administer the meds. 

You know, we looked at 75 hospitals that use McKesson bar-code 
scanning  technology  everyday,  and  these  numbers  are  actually 
quite staggering. These hospitals generate 400,000 alerts weekly to 
warn  nurses  or  other  healthcare  professionals  that  the  wrong  med 
or  the  incorrect  dose  is  about  to  be  administered.  Each  week,  in 
these 75 hospitals, these systems prevent 56,000 medication errors. 
With the ability to reduce errors by up to 90 percent, imagine how 
many  lives  we  could  save  if  every  hospital  in  the  country  simply 
started with bar-code scanning? We have to get moving. 

The  second  high  impact  technology  available  today  is  electronic 
prescribing.  It’s  simple;  we  have  to  eliminate  the  paper  prescrip-
tion. Each year, there are more than three million avoidable medi-
cation  errors,  in  doctor’s  offices,  or  outpatient  settings.  Eighty  per-
cent  of  prescriptions  are  scribbled  on  paper  today.  Systems  like 
McKesson’s  e-prescribing  solutions  check  for  drug  allergies,  they 
check for conflicts and they help to ensure that safe scripts are leg-
ible. There’s no excuse; prescriptions must be electronic. 

Finally, we must provide physicians with secure access to patient 
information.  We’re  talking  about  the  basics.  Today  we  provide 
healthcare in a paper world. In a world of blind encounters, where 
doctors  give  patients  advice,  place  orders  in  the  emergency  room, 
and  recommend  treatment  changes  without  any  access  to  the  pa-
tient’s chart. 

Kind of crazy, at a time when you bank online, book your travel 
online,  purchase  gifts  on  the  computer,  but  your  healthcare  record 
is  still  on  paper.  McKesson  gives  doctors  and  nurses  immediate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

electronic access to essential patient information securely with just 
one  click  of  a  mouse.  Each  month,  we  have  users  logging  onto  our 
physician  portal  1.8  million  times,  so  clearly  the  technology  is 
ready.  Our  challenge  is  accelerating  adoption.  You  know  there  are 
innovative  health  institutions  across  the  country  using  technology 
to provide safer care. They are saving lives, and saving money. But, 
you  know,  it’s  just  not  happening  fast  enough.  We  must  accelerate 
the adoption of these basic technologies. I would ask the two of you, 
would  you  choose  a  bank  that  didn’t  offer  an  ATM?  Should  you 
choose a hospital that doesn’t provide bar-code scanning of medica-
tions?  You  know,  the  biggest  obstacle  to  rapid  adoption  is  the  lack 
of  funding.  The  Federal  Government  can  play  a  key  role  by  pro-
viding  financial  incentives.  One  creative  option  would  be  govern-
ment-sponsored  entities  that  would  provide  government-backed 
loans  for  healthcare  providers  so  they  could  get  started  and  buy 
these solutions. 

If you combine financial and pay-for-performance incentives, I be-
lieve you will spur rapid adoption. Ten people die from medical er-
rors every hour in the United States. As a Nation, we have a moral 
responsibility  to  do  better.  We  have  a  moral  responsibility  to  save 
these  lives,  and  as  a  country  we  must  adopt  and  use  these  proven 
technologies today. 

Let me reiterate the critical steps toward automation. One, medi-
cations must be bar-coded and scanned at the bedside. Two, all pre-
scriptions  must  be  electronic;  no  more  illegible  paper.  And,  three, 
doctors  and  nurses  must  have  access  to  patient  information  before 
critical  decisions  are  made.  As  a  Nation  we  now  have  the  will  and 
the  means  to  make  healthcare  safer.  We  can  leave  a  remarkable 
legacy. Thank you. I would be happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Pure follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PAMELA PURE, PRESIDENT, MCKESSON PROVIDER 

TECHNOLOGIES, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, MCKESSON CORPORATION 

My  name  is  Pamela  Pure,  and  I  am  the  Executive  Vice  President  of  McKesson 
Corporation and President of McKesson Provider Technologies, the company’s health 
information  technology  business.  I  thank  Chairman  Ensign,  Ranking  Member 
Kerry,  and  the  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  for  the  opportunity  to  submit  testi-
mony  on  behalf  of  McKesson.  McKesson  strongly  supports  the  goal  of  improving 
healthcare  quality  by  using  healthcare  information  technology  (IT)  to  reduce  med-
ical errors and lower costs. 

For more than 170 years, McKesson has led the industry in the wholesale delivery 
of  medicines  and  healthcare  products.  Today  a  Fortune  15  corporation,  McKesson 
delivers  vital  pharmaceuticals,  medical  supplies,  and  healthcare  IT  solutions  that 
touch  the  lives  of  more  than  100  million  patients  each  day  in  every  healthcare  set-
ting.  As  the  world’s  largest  healthcare  services  company  with  a  customer  base  that 
includes  more  than  200,000  physicians,  25,000  retail  pharmacies,  5,000  hospitals 
and  600  payers,  McKesson  is  well  positioned  to  help  transform  the  healthcare  sys-
tem. 

As  the  largest  provider  of  automation  and  information  technology  in  the 
healthcare  industry,  we  deliver  innovative  technologies  at  each  point  in  the 
healthcare system to reduce medication errors, lower costs, and improve the quality 
and  efficiency  of  healthcare.  We  are  dedicated  to  making  healthcare  safer,  a  goal 
that  requires  a  deep  understanding  of  healthcare  delivery  processes  and  a  clear 
focus  on  what  is  required  by  key  stakeholders  such  as  physicians,  nurses,  phar-
macists,  and  patients.  My  colleagues  and  peers  know  that  for  me  this  is  not  a  job; 
it  is  a  passion.  After  20  years  of  advocating  the  use  of  technology  and  witnessing 
first-hand  the  benefits  and  challenges  associated  with  its  implementation,  I  am  de-
lighted to have this opportunity to share my insights with the Congress. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

McKesson fully supports the President’s goal that every American should have an 
electronic  health  record  (EHR)  in  10  years.  To  meet  this  bold  vision,  McKesson  be-
lieves  that  the  Federal  Government  should  pursue  a  two-pronged  strategy  to  spur 
the  adoption  of  automation  and  healthcare  IT.  First,  we  need  broad  deployment 
today of high-impact technologies that provide unquestionable benefits in the deliv-
ery of healthcare. Second, on a parallel track, we need to develop the standards and 
promote  the  interoperability  of  systems  that  are  essential  for  medical  information 
to  be  shared  among  healthcare  providers,  patients,  and  public  health  agencies  in  a 
safe, secure manner. 

At McKesson, we know that technology itself is not the inhibitor of change in the 
healthcare  system.  The  technology  is  available  and  working.  It  is  intolerable  that 
people  die  every  day  from  medication  errors  that  could  be  prevented  with  bar-code 
technology,  the  same  technology  that  is  used  in  every  major  retail  outlet  in  this 
country.  We  conduct  sophisticated  banking  and  other  business  transactions  elec-
tronically  across  continents;  yet  most  physicians  in  the  United  States  still  rely  on 
their  memories  for  complex  medical  information,  and  write  orders  using  pen  and 
paper. 

While  deployment  of  healthcare  IT  is  growing,  less  than  20  percent  of  hospitals 
in  the  United  States  today  use  bar-codes  to  verify  the  administration  of  patient 
medications, and fewer than 10 percent of physicians in hospitals enter patient pre-
scriptions  and  medical  orders  electronically.  The  numbers  are  only  slightly  better 
outside the hospital: only about 25 percent of large physician offices enter their pre-
scriptions  electronically.  The  number  drops  considerably  for  small  physician  prac-
tices. 
Three  Areas  Where  High-Value,  High-Impact  Technologies  Already  Make  a 

Difference 

We  can  and  must  make  the  healthcare  system  safer  and  more  efficient  by  accel-
erating  the  use  of  technology  in  all  hospitals  and  physicians’  offices  in  the  United 
States.  There  are  three  areas  where  high-value,  high-impact  technologies  already 
make a significant difference: 

1.  Bar-code  technology.  Medications  should  be  packaged  in  unit-doses  labeled 
with  bar  codes  and  scanned  at  the  bedside  before  they  are  given  to  patients. 
Today, on average, there are 27 steps in the medication use process that involve 
many decisions, multiple hand-offs and various people, ranging from the physi-
cian who prescribes the order to the pharmacy staff to the nurse who ultimately 
administers  the  medication  to  the  patient.  Healthcare  IT  and  automation  can 
reduce  the  hand-offs  and  eliminate,  on  average,  40  percent  of  the  steps  with 
dramatically improved accuracy, efficiency and safety. In a group of 75 hospitals 
that  use  McKesson’s  bedside  bar-coding  technology,  400,000  ‘‘alerts’’  are  trig-
gered weekly to nurses or other healthcare professionals to advise them that the 
wrong  medication  or  incorrect  dosage  is  about  to  be  administered.  As  a  result 
of  these  on-line  warnings,  we  estimate  that  these  hospitals  prevent  56,000  er-
rors  each  week;  a  staggering  statistic!  Hospitals  that  deploy  bar-code  scanning 
technology  report  dramatic  error  reduction  in  medication  administration,  as 
high as 90 percent. 
2.  Electronic  prescriptions.  We  must  eliminate  paper  prescriptions.  Each  year 
more  than  three  million  preventable  adverse  drug  events  occur  in  physicians’ 
offices or other out-patient care settings. Imagine a world where a patient’s list 
of current medications is available to the physician and the physician can order 
initial  scripts  or  refill  them  online.  All  the  medication  names  would  be  legible, 
and  all  orders  checked  for  drug-drug  interactions  and  allergies.  Today, 
McKesson’s  systems  help  to  ensure  safe  prescriptions  are  written  and  filled 
100,000 times each month, but, nationwide, 80 percent of prescriptions are still 
on paper, and many are illegible. 
3.  Secure  web-based  access  to  patient  information.  We  must  equip  physicians 
and  clinicians  with  the  information  needed  to  make  informed  decisions  about 
patient  care.  Today,  most  healthcare  is  delivered  in  a  paper-based  world.  It  is 
not uncommon for physicians to provide patients with advice, give directions to 
other staff and recommend treatment changes without any access to a patient’s 
chart.  These  blind  encounters  happen  every  day.  Secure  web-based  access  to 
clinical  patient  information,  such  as  laboratory  results,  the  patient’s  medical 
record and diagnostic images, enables physicians to find, within seconds, the in-
formation  they  need  to  make  more  informed  decisions  and  initiate  or  adjust 
treatment. McKesson currently records 1.8 million logins each month to its web- 
based  physician  portal,  almost  double  compared  to  a  year  ago.  Remote  access 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

via  web-portal  technology  is  in  common  use  across  many  industries;  yet,  in 
healthcare, its deployment is only in the 50–60 percent range. 

Funding  to  support  these  focused  initiatives  can  lead  to  dramatic  progress  very 
quickly. McKesson applauds the leadership shown and initiatives undertaken by the 
Congress  and  this  Administration.  Implementing  these  three  forms  of  technology 
will  build  the  required  momentum  and  provider  support  for  adoption  of  healthcare 
IT. 
Technology Is Improving Healthcare Quality Today 

Healthcare technologies today save lives, reduce medical errors, improve the qual-
ity  of  care,  and  reduce  overall  health  costs.  The  following  healthcare  organizations 
are  just  a  few  of  our  customers  that  have  taken  these  important  first  steps  to  im-
prove care for their patients: 

Concord  Hospital,  an  affiliate  of  Capital  Region  Health  Care  (CRHC),  Concord, 
NH: Concord was one of the first hospitals in the United States to introduce bedside 
bar-code scanning of medications in 1994, which reduced its already low medication 
error rate by 80 percent. This reduced error rate, which has been sustained for more 
than  10  years,  has  improved  productivity  and  efficiency  as  well  as  increased  clini-
cian satisfaction and retention. 

Medical Associates Clinic, Dubuque, IA: Medical Associates is deploying an ambu-
latory  electronic  health  record  and  e-prescribing  system  for  more  than  100  physi-
cians and medical providers, which represent 30 specialties dispersed across 16 loca-
tions  in  three  states.  With  the  implementation  still  underway,  physicians  are  al-
ready entering 26,000 e-prescriptions each month, and patient information is avail-
able  electronically  regardless  of  location.  Nurses  spend  far  less  time  on  medication 
management;  they  have  reduced  the  time  spent  on  paper  charting  activities  by  24 
percent,  and  they  spend  16  percent  more  time  with  patients  and  their  families.  In 
addition  to  improved  quality  and  better  decisionmaking,  this  clinic  projects  an 
annualized net gain of $1.7 million with full system deployment. 

Regional West Medical Center, Scottsbluff, NE: A regional referral center covering 
more than 12,000 square miles in rural Nebraska, Regional West has used informa-
tion technology to streamline the delivery of healthcare. Through secure Internet ac-
cess,  physicians  and  other  clinicians  can  view  a  single  electronic  medical  record  for 
each patient, which includes diagnostic medical images, pharmacy data and labora-
tory results. A McKesson pharmacy robot dispenses bar-coded, unit-dose medication 
packets  virtually  error-free.  Electronic  patient  charting  at  the  bedside  has  cut 
nurses’ daily paperwork by nearly 1.5 hours, enabling them to spend more time car-
ing  for  patients.  The  hospital  has  reduced  its  medication  error  rate  by  30  percent 
to less than 1 percent. Before giving a medication, the nurse must capture a three- 
way  bar-code  match  between  his/her  badge,  the  medication  and  the  patient’s  wrist-
band  to  check  the  five  ‘‘rights’’:  the  right  patient  is  receiving  the  right  dose  of  the 
right medication at the right time via the right route. 

Mary  Lanning  Memorial  Hospital,  Hastings,  NE:  The  largest  employer  in  Has-
tings, Nebraska, Mary Lanning Memorial Hospital has served the healthcare needs 
of the surrounding community for the past 83 years. Although the hospital’s medica-
tion  error  rate  was  low,  a  single  tragic  event  highlighted  the  need  for  standardized 
medication  administration.  Bedside  bar-code  scanning  technology  was  implemented 
along  with  a  pharmacy  information  system  to  reduce  the  risk  of  medication  errors. 
Additionally,  medications  scanned  at  the  bedside  are  compared  to  orders  reviewed 
by pharmacists and screened for allergies, interactions and therapeutic duplications. 
Preliminary  data  has  shown  a  35  percent  increase  in  the  reporting  of  near-miss 
events related to wrong drug and wrong patient. 

Presbyterian Healthcare Services in Albuquerque, NM: Using McKesson’s bar-code 
technology  solutions,  Presbyterian  reduced  medication  administration  errors  by  80 
percent.  Technology  has  also  allowed  pharmacists  to  be  redeployed  to  critical  care 
units to work directly with patients and physicians and enhance the quality of care. 
These  innovative  health  systems  and  others  across  the  country  are  saving  lives 
and saving money. Physicians, nurses, and pharmacists now spend more time inter-
acting with patients and less time performing administrative functions. More impor-
tantly,  these  organizations  are  creating  a  new  baseline  for  patient  care  in  the 
United States. While making healthcare safer through seamless, rapid and accurate 
information flow, they are also addressing one-third of healthcare’s overall costs: ad-
ministrative paperwork, clinical errors, manual hand-offs and re-work. 
Developing Standards and Promoting Interoperability 

McKesson  fully  supports  efforts  of  Congress  and  the  Administration  to  facilitate 
standards harmonization, encourage the formation of regional health information or-
ganizations  and  establish  a  National  Health  Information  Network.  Development  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

the  requisite  technology  standards  will  allow  the  computer  systems  of  doctors,  hos-
pitals, laboratories, pharmacists and payers to efficiently communicate and share in-
formation. We are honored to work with Dr. David Brailer and the Office of the Na-
tional Coordinator for Health Information Technology as he moves to create a foun-
dation  for  the  transformation  of  our  healthcare  system.  We  are  also  pleased  to  be 
a member of the Commission for the Certification of Health Information Technology, 
a collaborative public-private partnership to develop standards and certify health in-
formation technology systems. 

We  all  remember  the  incremental  steps  that  were  taken  by  other  industries  as 
they moved toward connectivity and interoperability. First, they automated individ-
ually  and  then,  collectively,  they  collaborated  to  connect  the  information.  Consider 
the banking industry. A full decade elapsed between the early proliferation of bank- 
specific  automatic  teller  machines  (ATM)  and  the  formation  of  ‘‘shared  ATM  net-
works’’ in the 1980s. Once the automation was complete, connectivity and interoper-
ability occurred very quickly. In the interim, banks were able to realize the cost and 
efficiency  savings  of  ATMs,  and  consumers,  appreciating  the  convenience  of  ATMs, 
quickly  adapted  to  this  new  banking  system.  Connectivity  is  a  natural  evolution  of 
automation.  We  are  confident  the  same  evolution  will  happen  in  healthcare.  Once 
our Nation’s healthcare providers are fully automated, it will be possible to connect 
previously isolated healthcare systems. 
Understanding  and  Overcoming  Barriers  to  Rapid  Adoption  of  Health 

Technology 

The biggest obstacle to healthcare information technology adoption is securing the 
needed funding and resources. Today, physician practices and hospitals do not have 
access  to  the  capital  necessary  to  invest  in  their  own  technology  or,  on  a  larger 
scale, to fund connectivity. 

The  Federal  Government  can  play  a  key  role  in  financing  this  healthcare  trans-
formation  through  creative  funding  arrangements.  One  option  is  through  the  cre-
ation  of  government  sponsored  entities,  which  would  provide  indirect  Federal  sup-
port through guaranteed loans for healthcare providers to purchase, adopt, and im-
plement  proven  health  technology  solutions  that  are  focused  on  error  elimination 
and  safety.  Coupled  with  the  pay-for-performance  initiatives  that  reward  providers 
for the quality of healthcare delivered rather than for services rendered, guaranteed 
loans or other financial incentives will spur technology adoption. 

A  combination  of  financial  and  performance  incentives  would  help  mitigate  the 
initial  expense  of  technology  implementation.  The  reduction  in  medication  errors 
and  improved  efficiencies  in  delivering  improved  healthcare  will  also  provide  a  re-
turn on investment for healthcare organizations, thereby enabling them to repay the 
loans. 
Conclusion 

McKesson  believes  our  healthcare  system  must  adopt  and  deploy  proven  tech-
nologies today that reduce medical errors in order to save lives, improve the quality 
of care, and reduce costs. These initial steps should include: 

1.  Implementation  of  bedside  bar-coded  medication  administration  systems 
across the United States. 
2. Elimination of paper prescriptions through use of e-prescribing in physicians’ 
offices. 
3.  Secure,  online,  ‘‘anytime,  anywhere’’  access  for  physicians  to  critical  patient 
information. 

Automated  information  will  enable  our  healthcare  organizations  to  store  and  col-
lect  patient  data,  which  will  ultimately  lead  to  a  comprehensive  electronic  health 
record. Concurrently, we need to adopt the standards necessary to ensure interoper-
ability  among  systems  that  will  facilitate  communication  within  our  health  system. 
If we execute these initiatives simultaneously, McKesson strongly believes that this 
Congress and this Administration will be able to deliver visible and measurable re-
sults with a lasting impact on the quality of healthcare for the American public. 

As  a  Nation,  we  have  both  the  will  and  the  means  to  transform  healthcare  for 

the better. This will be a remarkable legacy, and one we should act on today. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  your  interest  in 

this important subject. I will be happy to answer any questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

STATEMENT OF KAREN IGNAGNI, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

AMERICA’S HEALTH INSURANCE PLANS 

Ms.  IGNAGNI.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  our  testimony  this 
morning  is  focused  on  four  areas.  First,  the  opportunity  to  deploy 
health  information  technology,  and  the  role  that  our  members  are 
playing in this regard. Second, the importance of making a system 
consumer centric and we haven’t talked about that very much this 
morning,  we’ve  talked  more  about  the  provider  aspects  of  it.  I 
would  like  to  speak  to  the  consumer  centric  aspects.  And  then  fi-
nally  key  policy  issues.  And  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  make 
some recommendations. 

First  on  the  opportunity,  there  has  been  much  discussion  about 
the  fragmentation  in  our  system.  And  what  a  deleterious  effect  it 
has had. But I think there has been little focus on a very important 
piece of information. That is that the Rand Corporation in 2003 de-
termined that only 55 percent of what is done in healthcare is best 
practice. We wouldn’t tolerate that standard in any kind of a man-
ufacturing situation, whether it be auto, computers, or anything of 
that sort in our society, so it is a matter of prioritizing productivity 
increases  in  healthcare  technology.  And  we’re  glad  to  be  able  to 
provide some recommendations on how to do that this morning. 

It  is  not  simply  the  technology  itself,  it  is  the  application  of  the 
technology.  So  you  are  on  the  precipice  of  an  important  decision, 
an  important  issue.  Are  we  talking  about  adopting  technology  for 
the  sake  of  adopting  technology?  Or  are  we  going  to  marry  that 
with  quality  performance  and  improvement?  We  think  that  it 
should  be  the  latter  not  the  former.  We’re  pleased  to  provide  a 
great deal of evidence about the role that our members are playing, 
we’ve  appended  it  to  our  testimony,  and  I  would  be  delighted  to 
talk about that specifically. 

There are five areas that we pointed out. First, our members are 
in the front lines of rewarding quality, beginning to align payment 
with  performance,  and  working  collaboratively  with  physicians  to 
do  that,  and  hospitals  as  well.  We’ve  talked  about  measuring  per-
formance.  We’re  proud  to  be  part  of  the  AQA,  the  Ambulatory 
Quality  Alliance,  which  is  a  ground-breaking  initiative  that 
leverages technology to develop a uniform, coordinated strategy for 
measuring,  aggregating  and  reporting  clinical  performance.  We 
think  this  type  of  collaborative  offers  a  road  map  for  the  kind  of 
collaboration  necessary  to  develop  uniform  standards  we’ve  been 
talking  about,  and  indeed  we’re  going  to  be  offering  some  specific 
recommendations in that regard. 

Electronic prescribing, we’ve been on the front lines of this issue 
and we’ve offered very specific evidence of that. Homeland Security, 
we’ve been working closely with the Centers for Disease Control be-
cause our members have developed the capability to identify illness 
patterns that might represent the initial warning signs of a bio-ter-
rorism event. Oftentimes, individuals call nurse advice lines in the 
health  plan  before  they  actually  begin  to  show  up  in  the  hospital 
emergency rings. 

And  finally  we’ve  provided  evidence  of  various  collaborations 
among  our  members  including  the  CORE  project  which  is  a  group 
of  our  health  plans  under  the  Council  for  Affordable  Quality 
Healthcare,  working  on  standards  such  as  the  banking  industry 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

has  done  to  create  operating  rules  that  facilitate  real  transfer— 
real-time transfer of information. 

Despite  all  this  progress  we  know  that  more  needs  to  be  done, 
so  that’s  why  our  board  of  directors  is  embarking  on  an  initiative 
aimed  to  develop  uniform  approaches  to  personal  healthcare 
records.  We’re  delighted  that  this  conversation  about  health  infor-
mation technology is beginning to evolve. Earlier on, the focus had 
been  on  regional  health  organizations,  on  only  electronic  health 
records, or EMRs. Now it’s important, we believe, to look at the full 
continuum,  to  look  at  the  national  standards,  to  look  at  personal 
health records, how they are married with the EMR, the EHR, and 
begin  to  talk  about  what  is  the  appropriate  thing  from  the  patient 
perspective. 

We  provided  a  little  chart  which  compares  a  personal  health 
record  to  an  electronic  health  record  system  to  easily  distinguish 
one  from  the  other.  The  goal  here  is  to  create,  in  our  view,  a  per-
sonal health record that can be complimented and fully compatible 
with  the  electronic  health  record,  so  it’s  not  either/or,  and  we’re 
pleased  that  the  conversation  is  being  enlarged  so  we  can  provide 
an opportunity to move the advancement of the technology, as well 
as  the  opportunity  for  consumers  to  receive  the  best  care  in  every 
setting they’re involved in. 

If  we  only  focus  on  the  electronic  health  record,  electronic  med-
ical  record  and  often  the  two  are  used  interchangeably,  then  we’re 
likely  to  miss  the  opportunity  for  an  individual  who  may  get  some 
services, at Georgetown Hospital, or GW, or Hopkins, while getting 
other services at Holy Cross, Reston Hospital. So if we continue to 
look  in  a  silo  only  from  an  institutional  perspective,  we  miss  the 
opportunity  to  leverage  what  physicians  can  do  when  they’re  con-
fronting patients who are ill. They need to have the full picture. 

In  terms  of  the  policy  issues  we  think  that  they’re  five  that  we 
hope  that  the  Committee  takes  up,  and  we’re  happy  and  encour-
aged at this bipartisan examination of these matters. First the uni-
form  standards.  Everyone  has  talked  about  the  importance  of  uni-
form  standards.  We  agree  with  that,  we’ve  been  concerned  in  the 
past that the discussion was overly reliant on regional health infor-
mation  organizations,  in  the  absence  of  uniform  standards  ap-
proach.  And  we  were  concerned  that  it  would  result  in  an  isolated 
island of information systems. 

Privacy  and  security  in  terms  of  what  you  can  do,  we  would 
strongly urge you to consider preemption so that we can have a na-
tional  standard  with  respect  to  privacy  and  security  and  not  have 
barriers  for  the  exchange  of  information.  Financing,  we  think  pub-
lic and private efforts are warranted. And the Federal Government 
can compliment private sector investment. But on this question we 
believe  it  would  be  a  mistake  to  relax  Federal  fraud  and  abuse 
laws for the purpose of allowing hospitals to support physician use 
of health information technology. 

We’re  concerned  about  unintended  consequences  in  light  of  a  re-
cent Federal Trade Commission report, talking about the impact of 
consolidation  in  healthcare,  and  how  it  has  related  to  rising 
healthcare  costs.  So  we  would  hope  that  the  Congress  would  ask 
for  the  opinion  of  the  FTC,  or  to  consider  moving  forward  in  this 
direction.  We  talked  about  AHRQ  funding  as  my  colleagues  have, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

and we haven’t talked about this morning about liability of reform. 
When  we’re  talking  about  large  ticket  items  in  terms  of  improving 
healthcare  when  we’re  going  to  a  situation  where  $100  billion  is 
being added to the system every year for defensive medicine. Sure-
ly that should be an important part of the considerations. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  thank  you  for  the  opportunity,  and  we  look 

forward to engaging in the question and answer period. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Ignagni follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KAREN IGNAGNI, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

AMERICA’S HEALTH INSURANCE PLANS 

I. Introduction 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  Karen 
Ignagni,  President  and  CEO  of  America’s  Health  Insurance  Plans  (AHIP),  which  is 
the national trade association representing nearly 1,300 health insurance plans pro-
viding  coverage  to  more  than  200  million  Americans.  Our  members  offer  a  broad 
range of products in the marketplace and also have demonstrated a strong commit-
ment to participation in public programs. 

We  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  testify  about  the  role  health  information  tech-
nology  can  play  in  improving  the  delivery  and  quality  of  health  care.  We  applaud 
Congress and the Administration for prioritizing this issue. It is encouraging to see 
Members  of  Congress  addressing  this  priority  on  a  bipartisan  basis,  and  we  thank 
you for the opportunity to discuss the positive contributions our members are mak-
ing in this area. 

Our members are strongly committed to advancing an interconnected health care 
system in which health information can be exchanged electronically to empower in-
dividual  consumers  and  clinicians  to  make  better  health  care  decisions  and,  at  the 
same time, to improve quality, value, and efficiency throughout the U.S. health care 
system. 

technology; 

and efficiency for health care consumers; 

Our testimony today will focus on six areas: 
• Opportunities to deploy health information technology to improve quality, value 
• The  role  health  insurance  plans  are  playing  in  advancing  health  information 
• Specific  health  information  technology  initiatives  implemented  by  AHIP  mem-
• The  importance  of  personal  health  records  (PHRs)  in  an  interconnected  health 
• Keys to the successful implementation of health information technology; and 
• Our concerns about certain policy issues imbedded in pending legislation to ex-

ber companies; 

care system; 

pand health information technology. 

II. Opportunities To Improve Quality, Value, and Efficiency 

In the U.S. health care system, the organization and management of personalized 
health  information  have  not  always  kept  pace  with  the  advancement  of  modern 
medicine. Personal health information is often fragmented and incomplete, and can 
result in unnecessary and preventable medical errors, inappropriate care, and dupli-
cation of services—all contributing to rising health care costs and missed opportuni-
ties to improve patient care. 

At  the  same  time,  variation  in  medical  decision-making  has  led  to  disparities  in 
the  quality  and  safety  of  care  delivered  to  Americans.  A  1999  report 1 by  the  Insti-
tute of Medicine (IOM), found that medical errors could result in as many as 98,000 
deaths annually, and a 2003 RAND study 2 found that patients received only 55 per-
cent  of  recommended  care  for  their  medical  conditions.  A  wide  range  of  additional 
studies  indicate  that  Americans  frequently  receive  inappropriate  care  in  a  variety 
of  settings  and  for  many  different  medical  procedures,  tests,  and  treatments.  Such 
inappropriate  care  includes  the  overuse,  underuse  or  misuse  of  medical  services. 
Studies also show that patterns of medical care vary widely from one location to an-

1 ‘‘To Err is Human,’’ Institute of Medicine, 1999. 
2 ‘‘The  Quality  of  Health  Care  Delivered  to  Adults  in  the  United  States,’’  Elizabeth  A. 

McGlynn, RAND, June 25, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

other, even among contiguous areas and within a single metropolitan area—with no 
association between higher intensity care and better outcomes. 

The widespread practice of defensive medicine to minimize the threat of litigation 
is  another  factor  contributing  to  inappropriate  care  and  higher  costs.  According  to 
a study recently published in the Journal of the American Medical Association, 3 93 
percent  of  specialty  physicians  reported  that  they  engage  in  defensive  medicine. 
When  asked  about  their  most  recent  act  of  defensive  medicine,  43  percent  reported 
using imaging technology in clinically unnecessary circumstances. 

To meet these challenges, it is critically important for the public and private sec-
tors to work together to develop an interconnected health care system that provides 
consumers  and  clinicians  with  access,  through  PHRs,  to  a  history  of  each  individ-
ual’s  health  information  wherever  and  whenever  it  is  needed.  Doing  so  will  yield 
benefits for consumers and other stakeholders on several levels: 

• Meaningful  information  will  be  available  to  patients  and  providers  in  a  usable 
form  and  in  a  timely  fashion  to  improve  the  overall  safety,  effectiveness,  and 
efficiency of an individual’s care; 
• Wasteful  and  duplicative  care  will  be  reduced.  A  well-coordinated  health  care 
system  will  remove  the  need  or  justification  for  repeating  or  performing 
unmerited interventions; 
• Increased  transparency  in  the  health  care  system  will  allow  for  a  meaningful 
• The  latest  advances  in  evidence-based  medical  practices  will  be  disseminated 
• Consumers  and  purchasers  will  benefit  from  a  system  that  deploys  resources 
• Clinicians  will  be  able  to  increase  their  productivity  when  they  have  the  com-
plete  picture  of  a  patient’s  health  care,  including  services  received  from  other 
caregivers; and 

comparison of health outcomes and resources expended; 

more efficiently and effectively; 

broadly and rapidly; 

• Quality performance will be rewarded. 

Cost Savings 

While  it  is  difficult  to  predict  the  cost  savings  that  will  be  achieved  through 
health information technology, a number of studies suggest that the savings will be 
significant.  In  a  January  2005  study  published  by  Health  Affairs, 4 the  Center  for 
Information  Technology  Leadership  (CITL)  estimated  that  implementation  of  an 
interconnected  and  fully  standardized  health  care  system  would  yield  $77.8  billion 
in  annual  savings.  This  study  focused  specifically  on  the  benefits  of  a  system  in 
which  hospitals  and  medical  groups  can  exchange  information  electronically,  using 
uniform  standards  on  a  nationwide  basis,  with  five  key  stakeholders:  payers;  phar-
macies; public health departments; radiology centers; and independent laboratories. 
Separately, the Government Accountability Office (GAO) issued a report 5 in Octo-
ber  2003  on  the  cost  savings  achieved  through  health  information  technology.  The 
GAO found that one health insurance plan, Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Alabama, 
reduced its data entry costs by $20 million annually by applying health information 
technology  to  its  claims  processing  functions.  The  GAO  reported  that  health  insur-
ance  plans  also  achieved  other  benefits  including  ‘‘increased  staff  productivity,  im-
proved  timeliness  in  processing  claims,  improved  customer  satisfaction,  and  im-
proved clinical care to members.’’ 
III. Role of Health Insurance Plans 
Quality-Based Programs 

AHIP’s  member  companies  are  on  the  front  lines  of  developing  information  tech-

nology systems to improve health care quality and administrative efficiencies. 

Health  insurance  plans  have  a  strong  track  record  of  using  health  information 
technology  to  implement  programs  that  reward  providers  for  quality  performance. 
Health  insurance  plans  have  instituted  a  range  of  provider  payment  arrange-
ments—often referred to as pay-for-performance programs—that are promoting high 
quality and efficiency throughout the U.S. health care system. Our members’ experi-
ences  clearly  indicate  that  paying  for  quality  is  a  promising  strategy  for  improving 

3 ‘‘Defensive  Medicine  Among  High-Risk  Specialist  Physicians  in  a  Volatile  Malpractice  Envi-

ronment,’’ Journal of the American Medical Association, June 1, 2005. 

4 ‘‘The Value of Health Care Information Exchange and Interoperability,’’ Health Affairs, Jan-

5 ‘‘Information Technology Benefits Realized for Selected Health Care Functions,’’ Government 

uary 19, 2005. 

Accountability Office, October 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

overall  wellness  and  advancing  evidence-based  medicine,  which  translates  into  bet-
ter health outcomes and greater value for employers and consumers. 

Some  quality-based  payment  programs  provide  financial  awards  to  physicians  in 
the form of increased payments, while others offer non-financial rewards in the form 
of  public  recognition,  preferential  marketing  or  streamlined  administrative  proce-
dures.  Additionally,  some  plans  are  offering  consumers  reduced  co-payments, 
deductibles, and/or premiums in exchange for using providers deemed to be of high-
er quality, based on specific performance measures. In all of these programs, health 
information  technology  plays  a  role  in  collecting  data  to  evaluate  the  performance 
of health care providers and determining the extent to which they are achieving de-
sired goals. 
Collaboration Through the AQA 

A  critically  important  step  in  moving  forward  with  programs  that  reward  quality 
performance  is  the  development  of  a  uniform,  coordinated  strategy  for  measuring, 
aggregating and reporting clinical performance. To address this challenge, AHIP has 
been working with the American Academy of Family Physicians (AAFP), the Amer-
ican  College  of  Physicians  (ACP),  other  medical  specialty  organizations,  the  Agency 
for Healthcare Research and Quality (AHRQ), consumers, and employers. 

This collaborative effort—called the Ambulatory Care Quality Alliance (AQA)—re-
cently  reached  a  consensus  on  a  common  set  of  26  ambulatory  care  performance 
measures  that  are  intended  to  serve  as  a  ‘‘starter  set’’  that  will  provide  clinicians, 
consumers,  and  purchasers  with  a  set  of  quality  indicators  that  can  be  used  for 
quality  improvement,  public  reporting,  and  pay-for-performance  programs.  This 
starter  set  will  be  expanded  in  a  multi-phase  process,  resulting  in  a  more  complete 
set  of  measures  to  address  a  wide  range  of  additional  quality  indicators  addressing 
efficiency, patient experience, sub-specialties and other key areas. 

In  addition,  the  AQA  is  developing  strategies  for  uniform  data  aggregation  and 
for  reporting  reliable  and  useful  quality  information  to  consumers,  providers  and 
other  stakeholders.  The  AQA  recently  developed  two  sets  of  fundamental  principles 
for reporting. The first set of principles, which addresses reporting to consumers and 
purchasers,  aims  to  facilitate  more  informed  decision-making  about  health  care 
treatments and investment. The second set of principles, which addresses reporting 
to physicians and hospitals, is designed to facilitate quality improvement and to in-
form providers of their performance. 

The AQA will continue to move forward in the areas of measurement, data aggre-
gation  and  reporting,  and  encouraging  additional  key  stakeholders  to  become  in-
volved  in  this  important  effort  to  improve  health  care  quality  and  patient  safety. 
The  dissemination  of  information  derived  from  aggregated  performance  data  ulti-
mately  will  yield  benefits  on  several  levels.  Consumers  will  be  able  to  make  more 
informed  decisions  about  their  health  care  treatments.  Physicians,  hospitals  and 
other health care professionals will be better able to improve the quality of care they 
provide.  Purchasers  will  receive  greater  value  for  their  investment  in  health  care 
benefits.  Health  insurance  plans  will  continue  to  develop  innovative  products  that 
meet consumer and purchaser needs. 
Electronic Prescribing 

Electronic  prescribing—a  key  element  of  the  overall  strategy  for  interconnec-
tivity—is  another  area  where  health  insurance  plans  are  making  significant  con-
tributions. 

Many  of  AHIP’s  members  use  web  portals  to  give  individual  members  access  to 
their  pharmacy-related  personal  information,  including  pharmacy  claims,  benefits 
information,  up-to-date  formulary  listings,  and  online  search  tools  to  find  partici-
pating pharmacies. Some health insurance plans also allow members to fill or refill 
prescriptions online, send questions electronically to a pharmacist about their medi-
cations, and purchase over-the-counter medications online at discounted prices. Oth-
ers  are  working  with  health  care  providers  to  incorporate  health  information  tech-
nology  into  practice  settings—in  some  cases  through  personal  computers  and 
handheld devices for patient order entry and electronic prescribing. 

These  programs  demonstrate  our  members’  strong  commitment  to  the  develop-

ment of electronic prescribing technologies at the point-of-patient-care. 
Public Health Surveillance 

The  unique  capabilities  of  health  insurance  plans  also  are  evidenced  by  their  ac-
tive  involvement  in  the  development  of  early  warning  health  surveillance  systems. 
Following the events of September 11, 2001, a number of AHIP member companies 
collaborated  with  the  Centers  for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention  (CDC)  to  develop 
a demonstration program to identify illness patterns that might represent the initial 
warnings of a bio-terrorism event. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

This  demonstration  program  includes  a  rapid  response  capability  to  identify  un-
usual  clusters  of  symptoms  or  illness  from  daily  encounters,  to  alert  public  health 
officials  about  these  clusters,  and  to  facilitate  the  ability  of  public  health  officials 
to  obtain  detailed  clinical  information  about  specific  cases  when  needed.  Health  in-
surance  plans  report  only  aggregate  de-identified  data  to  the  surveillance  system, 
thus  providing  maximum  protection  of  patient  confidentiality.  In  cases  where  un-
usual  clusters  are  identified,  the  state  or  local  public  health  team  will  work  with 
clinicians to decide if additional information is needed. 

By  arming  public  health  officials  with  real-time  data  on  clusters  of  emerging 
symptoms  and  illnesses,  health  insurance  plans  have  established  themselves  as  an 
important  part  of  an  advanced  disease  surveillance  system  to  help  protect  our  Na-
tion  from  emerging  infectious  diseases  and  potential  bio-terrorism  agents.  This  is 
possible  because  our  members  have  a  unique  set  of  skills  and  competencies  based 
on  their  integrated  care  coordination  systems,  large  defined  populations,  and  com-
prehensive  data  sets.  These  same  assets  will  enable  health  insurance  plans  to  play 
a central role in helping the Nation transition to an interconnected health care sys-
tem. 
Initiatives By AHIP Member Companies 

To provide a better understanding of health information technology initiatives de-
veloped by our members, we are attaching an appendix that provides brief examples 
of  some  of  the  programs  being  implemented  across  the  country.  We  are  providing 
these  summaries  to  give  the  Committee  a  better  understanding  of  the  depth  and 
breadth of initiatives that are being adopted. 
IV.  Personal  Health  Records 

the  Cornerstone  of  an 

(PHRs)  as 

Interconnected Health Care System 

Our  members’  vision  for  an  interconnected  health  care  system  involves  the  cre-
ation  of  a  PHR  that  contains  information  key  to  the  safety,  effectiveness,  and  effi-
ciency  of  an  individual’s  care,  and  will  be  linked  to  and  fully  compatible  with  elec-
tronic health records (EHRs) initiated by health care institutions or clinicians. 

The  delivery  of  health  care  requires  three  basic  inputs  as  illustrated  by  the  dia-

gram below: 

• the individual, with his or her personal history, needs, and preferences; 
• the  clinician  with  the  knowledge,  skills,  and  experience  necessary  for  the  eval-

• facilities and other resources necessary for care to be conducted, such as a radi-

uation and treatment; and 

ology department or an ER. 

As  the  Committee  is  aware,  an  individual’s  encounters  with  the  health  care  sys-
tem  may  consist  of  a  family  practitioner,  a  specialist  who  deals  with  heart  disease, 
a physiotherapy service at a local clinic, and a local pharmacist. Some relationships 
between  an  individual  and  the  health  care  system  may  be  episodic,  such  as  a  visit 
to the emergency room; others may endure for many years. A healthy individual will 
have only infrequent health encounters. By contrast, a person with multiple chronic 
diseases  will  have  numerous  complex  relationships  and  encounters  with  the  health 
care system that span multiple institutions and physicians. Some relationships will 
arise  as  part  of  a  prescribed  treatment,  while  others  will  be  ad  hoc  or  consumer- 
initiated. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
g

i

83 

What  is  certain  is  that  individual  relationships  and  encounters  with  the  health 
care  system  are  becoming  more  complex  and  diverse  with  growing  rates  of  chronic 
disease,  an  aging  population,  and  greater  consumer  choice.  Each  health  care  event 
may  result  in  a  diagnosis  or  treatment  that  has  widespread  and  enduring  signifi-
cance for an individual’s future care and overall health. The information that popu-
lates a personal health record (PHR) comes from these events. AHIP’s Board of Di-
rectors  has  launched  an  effort  that  is  designed  to  result  in  each  consumer  having 
a PHR containing information about their health and their care, based on key infor-
mation  from  health  plan-based  claims  management  systems,  other  health  plan  ad-
ministrative data, and in some cases data from health care provider-based EHR sys-
tems. The goal is to integrate information from all sources to create a coherent and 
useful  understanding  of  the  individual’s  overall  care.  The  information  in  a  PHR 
should  be  owned  by  the  individual  and  maintained  securely  and  confidentially  on 
their behalf. 

The  PHR  will  be  complemented  by  EHRs,  which  are  more  than  a  record  of  care. 
An EHR focuses on the details of care ‘‘processes’’ within a hospital, a doctor’s office, 
or  other  care  setting.  It  is  required  to  manage  information  that  is  as  much  about 
the professionals, the organization, and medicine in general, as it is about the indi-
vidual  patient.  These  two  characteristics—the  comprehensive  support  for  tasks  and 
the  recording  of  information  about  the  provision  of  care—mean  that  an  EHR  is  a 
strong  reflection  of  the  particular  institutional  context  and  the  clinical  services  it 
supports.  The  EHR  represents  not  only  patient  information,  but  information  for 
medical  and/or  legal  uses  by  the  institution—the  EHR  is  designed  to  someday  be-
come  the  legal  and  permanent  institutional  health  record  regarding  the  care  of  a 
patient. 

It  is  vital  to  understand  that  PHR  and  EHR  systems  are  not  alternatives.  They 
are complementary, work together, and together achieve the goal of both managing 
the overall care of the individual and managing the delivery of health care services 
that  are  required  to  have  an  interconnected  and  electronic  health  care  system.  The 
diagram below illustrates the separate roles of PHRs and EHRs: 

The PHR has the potential to influence both the resourcing side of the health care 
system and the delivery of individual care. The prime purpose of the PHR is to en-
sure that the information most valuable for the overall quality and efficiency of the 
individual’s  care  is  available  wherever  and  whenever  it  is  needed.  The  PHR  links 
together and coordinates an individual’s many health encounters. 
V. Keys to Successful Implementation of Health Information Technology 

To  accomplish  the  successful  development  of  an  interconnected  health  care  sys-
tem,  it  is  important  for  the  public  and  private  sectors  to  work  together  to  address 
a  number  of  priority  issues.  These  include  creating  national,  uniform  interoper-
ability  standards;  assuring  the  privacy  and  security  of  health  information;  and  fi-
nancing the adoption of health information technology. 
Uniform Standards and a National Framework 

AHIP supports the creation of voluntary, national, uniform interoperability stand-
ards  that  facilitate  the  interconnectivity  of  health  information  systems.  It  is  widely 
recognized  that  the  development  of  an  interconnected  health  care  system  that  im-
proves health care quality and efficiency is dependent on the creation and adoption 
of  such  standards.  We  believe  that  the  Federal  Government  and  the  private  sector, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
g

i

84 

working together, can implement uniform standards and operating rules to facilitate 
the  exchange  of  information  and  make  the  process  transparent,  without  stifling  in-
novation. 

AHIP  and  our  members  are  looking  forward  to  being  active  participants  in  this 
process. We intend to launch an effort to involve a diverse group of key stakeholders 
in developing common standards and core content areas for PHRs that take into ac-
count  issues  of  importance  to  consumers,  providers,  and  purchasers.  At  the  same 
time, we encourage HHS to pursue a similar process for EHRs. 

Uniform, consensus-driven standards will bring together different health informa-
tion  technology  systems  into  a  National  Health  Information  Network  by  specifying 
common  data  formats,  communication  protocols,  and  operating  rules.  Government 
and private stakeholders need to work cooperatively through the existing standards 
development organization process to create and maintain standards and push them 
into  the  marketplace.  Such  standards  should  be  designed  through  an  open  model 
that  allows  sufficient  flexibility  to  be  adopted  by  various  organizations  in  diverse 
and  changing  environments.  The  AQA’s  work  on  a  strategy  for  measuring  and  re-
porting clinical performance, which we discussed earlier, could serve as a model for 
stakeholders to move forward in developing interoperability standards. 

Another  promising  example  is  the  Council  for  Affordable  Quality  Healthcare’s 
CORE  program.  CAQH  is  an  alliance  of  health  plans—which  includes  AHIP  and 
many  of  our  member  organizations—that  promotes  collaborative  efforts  to  stream-
line  health  care  administration.  Its  CORE  program  has  brought  together  multiple 
industry stakeholders to create and, ultimately, disseminate and maintain operating 
rules to facilitate real-time, comprehensive, secure transfer of patient eligibility and 
benefits information. 

The initiative was launched because the private sector recognized the need for an 
interoperable  solution  for  communicating  member  data  to  physician  practices.  Cur-
rently, practices do not have easy access to consistent information on plan coverage, 
co-pays,  deductibles  and  other  benefits  information.  CORE  will  change  that  by  cre-
ating  a  variety  of  standards,  including  clear  definitions  and  interpretations  of  data 
elements,  technical  transmission  standards  and  formats,  and  standards  for  data 
transactions. 

The  CAQH  program  is  modeled  on  the  strict  information-exchange  rules  that 
make  possible  direct  deposits  and  ATMs  in  banking.  If  the  initiative’s  rules  can  be 
as successful in unifying the health care industry, the projected administrative sav-
ings for physician practices would be significant. 

Uniform standards will spur the development of a national framework that facili-
tates  the  creation,  maintenance,  and  sharing  of  electronic  health  information.  It  is 
critically  important  for  this  framework  to  be  national,  rather  than  regional,  to  en-
sure  that  health  information  can  be  exchanged  electronically  whenever  and  wher-
ever it is needed to improve patient care. 
Privacy and Security 

AHIP supports efforts to assure privacy and security for health information. Con-
sumers must have confidence that portable and Internet-enabled health information 
systems are maintained in a secure and confidential manner. 

We believe that significant protections for health information already are provided 
through  HIPAA  and  corresponding  regulations.  HIPAA  governs  the  use,  disclosure, 
and  security  of  health  information  by  health  care  providers,  health  care  clearing-
houses, and health plans. As a result, these HIPAA-covered entities should encoun-
ter few, if any, issues that would compromise privacy or security when participating 
in a National Health Information Network. 

Two  issues,  however,  merit  additional  consideration.  One  question  is  the  extent 
to  which  entities  that  may  use  or  disclose  electronic  health  information  should  be 
required to institute privacy and security safeguards if they do not meet the defini-
tion  of  a  ‘‘covered  entity’’  for  purposes  of  the  HIPAA  rules.  The  Department  of 
Health  and  Human  Services  should  develop  a  regulatory  strategy  to  ensure  that 
these  entities  (e.g.,  banks  and  financial  institutions  that  administer  credit  card 
transactions when patients pay co-payments in a doctor’s office) provide privacy and 
security protections as appropriate. 

Another issue involves the interaction of other Federal and state privacy laws and 
the  electronic  exchange  of  health  information.  Some  Federal  and  state  laws  may 
serve as a barrier to interconnectivity by unduly restricting the types of information 
that  can  be  shared  and  the  methods  used  to  exchange  information.  For  example, 
state  laws  that  restrict  the  disclosure  of  information  related  to  specific  diseases  or 
medical  conditions  may  limit  the  ability  of  clinicians  to  participate  in  a  National 
Health Information Network. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

State  laws  may  provide  other  barriers,  including  impediments  to  the  use  of  elec-
tronic  prescribing  devices.  Additionally,  inconsistent  state  laws  may  prevent  the 
electronic  exchange  of  certain  health  information  across  state  lines;  such  laws  may 
be  particularly  burdensome  for  providers  that  treat  consumers  who  reside  in  areas 
near  the  border  of  one  or  more  states.  HHS  should  work  with  Congress  and  other 
stakeholders  to  identify  potential  conflicts  and  consider  whether  such  laws  should 
be  preempted.  Policymakers  should  consider  the  importance  of  clear  rules  for  the 
exchange of health information, while at the same time recognizing the impact that 
privacy rules have on health care quality. 
Financing 

AHIP  supports  public  and  private  efforts  to  finance  the  adoption  of  health  infor-
mation  technology  with  the  goal  of  improving  the  quality  and  delivery  of  health 
care. 

The  health  care  community  is  investing  significant  resources  in  health  informa-
tion  technology.  For  example,  many  health  insurance  plans  and  health  care  pro-
viders  are  using  equity,  loans,  and  venture  capital  to  fund  the  adoption  of  health 
information  technology  and  electronic  record  systems.  This  trend  will  continue  as 
more  members  of  the  health  care  community  recognize  a  return  on  these  invest-
ments  through  improved  health  care  and  greater  administrative  and  business  effi-
ciencies.  In  addition,  health  insurance  plans  and  the  Medicare  program  are  devel-
oping  incentives  to  compensate  providers  for  using  health  information  technology 
and evidence-based outcomes measures to promote better quality care. 

The Federal Government can also play an important role by assisting solo practice 
physicians  and  others  who  may  not  have  the  financial  resources  to  develop  and 
adopt the necessary infrastructure to participate in the national health information 
network.  This  assistance  can  be  provided  in  the  form  of  incentives,  low-interest 
loans, grants, and tax credits that reward quality through the adoption and integra-
tion  of  technology  solutions.  Tax  credits  would  be  a  particularly  effective  approach 
to  stimulating  improvements  in  productivity  through  the  use  of  information  tech-
nology.  This  assistance  should  be  directed  toward  achieving  the  overall  objective  of 
improving the quality and delivery of health care. 
VI. Concerns About Pending Legislation 

AHIP and our members appreciate the strong Congressional interest in health in-
formation  technology.  We  believe  it  is  particularly  helpful  that  this  issue  is  being 
addressed  on  a  bipartisan  basis  in  both  the  Senate  and  the  House.  At  the  same 
time,  we  do  respectfully  suggest  that  legislative  efforts  in  Congress  should  avoid 
prescriptive  rules  (e.g.,  regulating  the  design  and  operation  of  PHRs)  that  could 
hinder  ongoing  collaborative  efforts.  Instead,  we  hope  that  any  legislation  consid-
ered by Congress will allow a public-private process to move forward to develop and 
implement uniform standards and operating rules for interconnectivity. 

Additionally, we would like to highlight our concerns about two specific issues ad-

dressed by pending legislation. 
Regional Health Information Organizations (RHIOs) 

AHIP supports efforts to define an appropriate role for community-based efforts— 
such as Regional Health Information Organizations (RHIOs)—within the overall de-
velopment  of  a  national  health  information  system.  First,  however,  a  national 
framework  needs  to  be  developed  to  pave  the  way  for  regional  initiatives.  This 
framework is essential to ensure interoperability across the health care system, not 
only in local regions, but across state lines and nationally. 

We recognize that RHIOs can play a constructive role in fulfilling health informa-
tion  needs  at  the  regional  level,  yet  we  also  believe  that  an  overreliance  on 
RHIOS—in  the  absence  of  Federal  standards—would  complicate  efforts  to  achieve 
compatibility across the country. A key factor for a successful national health infor-
mation  network  is  the  ability  to  move  information  whenever  and  wherever  it  is 
needed.  This  goal  cannot  be  achieved  by  regional  systems  that  are  unable  to  ex-
change  information  outside  their  geographic  area.  Therefore,  it  is  important  for  re-
gional  projects  to  comply  with  national  interoperability  rules.  Otherwise,  stand- 
alone  regional  networks  will  be  unable  to  facilitate  national  information  exchange. 
We  look  forward  to  working  with  Congress  to  discuss  how  RHIOs  can  operate 
within  a  national  framework  to  ensure  that  practice  patterns  can  be  compared 
across regions, quality monitored, and efficiency improved. 
Safe Harbors 

We  also  believe  it  would  be  a  mistake  to  relax  Federal  fraud  and  abuse  laws  for 
the  purpose  of  allowing  hospitals  to  support  physician  use  of  health  information 
technology.  We  are  concerned  about  the  unintended  consequences  of  tying  physi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

cians to hospitals financially through equipment subsidies or electronic record shar-
ing.  Moreover,  the  ability  of  physicians  to  cooperate  with  other  providers—and  de-
liver  services  in  a  range  of  hospitals—may  be  hindered  if  they  become  dependent 
on a hospital-based information sharing network. 

Another  serious  concern  is  that  the  proposed  safe  harbors  could  unintentionally 
lead to information sharing programs that are isolated, and would therefore impede 
the  development  of  the  interconnected  system  that  is  needed  to  exchange  informa-
tion  on  a  national  basis.  Instead  of  encouraging  isolated  pockets  of  record  sharing, 
we should focus on promoting open and interconnected systems that assure the free 
flow of information. 

We  believe  that  creating  new  exceptions  to  current  fraud  and  abuse  laws  is  not 
only unnecessary, but will undermine the integrity of the existing regulatory frame-
work. 
VII. Other Elements of a Broad-Based Strategy 

While  health  information  technology  can  go  a  long  way  toward  addressing  cost 
and quality challenges, this is only one component of the broad-based strategy that 
is needed for transforming the health care system. Policymakers should at the same 
time  encourage  and  pursue  a  variety  of  other  programs  and  initiatives  to  further 
advance quality and efficiency. 
Invest in Cost Effectiveness and Translational Research 

While  the  Federal  Government  invests  heavily  in  clinical  research,  it  makes  only 
modest  investments  in  research  that  compares  the  relative  effectiveness  of  existing 
versus  new  therapies  that  are  designed  to  treat  the  same  condition.  The  Federal 
Government  should  assign  a  high  priority  to  this  kind  of  research  and  also  direct 
more  funding  to  promote  the  widespread  adoption  of  best  practices  and  reduce  the 
overuse and misuse of health care. 

A National Center for Effective Practices should be created to ensure that the re-
sults  of  cost  effectiveness  research  are  translated  into  usable  information  for  pro-
viders  and  consumers.  This  new  entity  could  identify  and  make  publicly  available 
the latest advances in evidence-based medical practices, and also shed light on pro-
cedures determined to be less effective. 
Develop a Framework for Evaluating Technologies for Effectiveness and Efficiency 

To  address  the  rapid  development  of  new  procedures,  devices  and  other  tech-
nologies, a public-private framework should be established to evaluate and compare 
the effectiveness and efficiency of these technologies. Moreover, new post-marketing 
surveillance models should be developed to assess the appropriate use and long-term 
value of certain breakthrough drugs, devices and biologicals. 
Overhaul  the  Medical  Liability  System  to  Ensure  Effective  Dispute  Resolution  and 

Promote Safety and Value 

The  flaws  in  the  current  medical  liability  system  should  be  addressed  with  re-
forms  that  place  reasonable  limits  on  health  care  litigation.  Additionally,  patient 
safety  legislation  is  needed  to  establish  legal  protections  for  medical  error  informa-
tion  reported  by  health  care  providers,  and  to  permit  the  aggregation  of  data  that 
can be used to determine the causes of medical errors and develop strategies for im-
proving patient safety. Also needed is a uniform, national administrative process to 
resolve  malpractice  disputes  between  patients  and  health  care  providers  in  a  fair 
and efficient manner, thus avoiding the need for litigation as often as possible. 
Modernize and Maximize the Effectiveness of the Regulatory System 

• Encourage  choice  with  uniform  rules  in  the  small  group  market:  A  common  set 
of  rules  would  encourage  competition,  enhance  consumer  choice,  and  provide 
greater  predictability  for  employers.  The  solution  is  not  to  waive  all  require-
ments  for  particular  groups,  but  to  establish  an  appropriate  and  consistent 
framework  for  all  participants  to  ensure  that  small  employers  have  maximum 
options to meet their needs. This means that the Federal and state governments 
need to work together to encourage ‘‘best practice’’ regulation. This process has 
begun  with  the  development  of  draft  legislation—known  as  the  State  Mod-
ernization  and  Regulatory  Transparency  (SMART)  Act—that  would  promote 
uniformity  in  plan  processes,  particularly  internal  and  external  review  of  cov-
erage disputes, speed-to-market and market conduct standards. 
• Encourage  prompt  product  approval  and  consistency  in  regulatory  processes. 
Steps should be taken to ensure that states adopt a mechanism by which health 
insurance  plans  can  bring  innovative  products  to  the  market  in  a  timely  man-
ner. Ideally, the Federal Government should encourage states to be forthcoming 
regarding  their  standards  for  policy  rate  and  form  filing  requirements  and  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

abandon  unwritten  ‘‘desk-drawer  rules.’’  This  ultimately  will  create  oversight 
mechanisms that allow companies to provide consumers with the products they 
need in a timely manner. 
• Establish  an  independent  advisory  commission  to  evaluate  the  impact  of  man-
dates  on  health  care  costs  and  quality.  Such  a  commission  could  advise  policy-
makers  on  the  safety  and  effectiveness  of  proposed  and  existing  mandated 
health benefits, and assess whether proposed mandates result in improved care 
and value. The commission’s findings also could inform public program coverage 
and  decision-making  to  ensure  that  evidence-based  standards  are  applied  con-
sistently in Medicare, Medicaid, and other public programs. 

Provide Funding for High-Risk Pools 

AHIP’s Board of Directors approved a statement in June 2004, indicating support 
for Federal funding for state high-risk pools to cover individuals who have unusually 
high health care costs. This legislation fits within the parameters of what Congress 
is able to accomplish from a budgetary standpoint at this time. This initiative is one 
of the next steps Congress should take as part of a long-term strategy for strength-
ening our Nation’s health care safety net. 
Expand Tax Credits to Encourage the Purchase of Health Care Coverage 

To  address  the  needs  of  working  Americans  who  are  uninsured  and  ineligible  for 
public  programs,  Congress  can  help  make  health  coverage  more  affordable  by  ex-
panding tax credits for low-income persons. This approach will be particularly help-
ful  to  Americans  who  do  not  have  access  to  employer-sponsored  coverage  and  to 
those  who  decline  such  coverage  because  of  the  high  cost.  Moreover,  tax  credits 
could  prompt  more  small  businesses  to  offer  employee  health  benefits.  The  Em-
ployee  Benefits  Research  Institute  (EBRI) 6 has  reported  that  among  small  employ-
ers  that  do  not  offer  employee  health  benefits,  71  percent  would  be  more  likely  to 
seriously  consider  offering  health  benefits  if  the  government  provided  assistance 
with premiums. 
Provide Adequate Funding for Public Programs 

More  than  75  million  Americans  rely  on  government  health  programs—including 
Medicare, Medicaid and SCHIP—to meet their health care needs. It is important for 
policymakers to recognize that funding shortfalls in these programs can lead to cost 
shifting,  which  translates  into  higher  costs  for  employers,  individuals,  and  other 
purchasers of private sector health coverage. This underscores the importance of en-
suring that Medicaid and other government health programs are adequately funded. 
VIII. Conclusion 

We  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  testify  on  this  crucial  priority.  AHIP  and  our 
members are committed to playing a leadership role in developing an interconnected 
health care system—based on national, uniform standards—in which consumers and 
providers  have  access  to  patient-owned  PHRs  that  provide  integrated  health  infor-
mation, from all clinicians and all settings of care, in a usable form and in a timely 
manner. 

As  Congress  addresses  issues  surrounding  health  information  technology  and 
quality,  we  are  eager  to  continue  working  with  you  to  support  the  transition  to  a 
modernized  health  care  system  that  is  effective  for  patients  and  valuable  for  all 
stakeholders. 

APPENDIX: HEALTH INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INITIATIVES 

BY HEALTH INSURANCE PLANS 

Aetna  is  applying  innovative  health  information  technology  to  provide  its  mem-
bers  and  providers  evidence-based  decision  support  tools  to  improve  quality  of  care 
and patient safety. Aetna’s MedQuery program applies evidence-based clinical rules 
to  data  derived  from  members’  medical  claims  and  pharmacy  and  laboratory  data 
to  uncover  opportunities  to  improve  care  and  avoid  potential  medical  errors.  The 
MedQuery  program  generates  patient-specific  diagnostic  or  therapeutic  suggestions 
called Care Considerations that are communicated to the treating physician. 

In  addition,  Aetna  Navigator TM,  a  member  self-service  website,  is  a  web-based 
portal  that  allows  members  to  access  a  wide  range  of  tools  and  information.  These 
resources  are  focused  on  giving  members  the  information  and  guidance  they  need 

6 ‘‘Small Employers and Health Benefits: Findings from the 2002 Small Employer Health Ben-

efits Survey,’’ Employee Benefits Research Institute, January 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

license, 

to navigate the health care system and to make the most informed decisions. Aetna 
Navigator TM is secure, private, and accessible anywhere a member has an Internet 
connection. 

Blue  Cross  Blue  Shield  of  Massachusetts,  Neighborhood  Health  Plan,  and  Tufts 
Health  Plan  are  working  with  providers  and  employers  to  provide  access  to  afford-
able,  quality  health  care  for  all  Massachusetts  citizens  through  their  e-prescribing 
initiative.  The  e-prescribing  initiative  was  established  in  October  2003,  and  rep-
resents  a  collaboration  among  the  health  plans,  DrFirst,  and  Zix  Corporation.  The 
program subsidizes handheld devices for providers, a one-year e-prescribing applica-
tion 
installation,  training  and  support,  and  6  months  of  Internet 
connectivity where applicable. 

At  the  end  of  the  first  quarter  of  2005,  over  2,600  providers  had  joined  the  pro-
gram;  over  2,000  prescribers  had  the  technology  incorporated  into  their  offices;  and 
over  40,000  electronic  prescriptions  were  sent  during  the  final  reporting  period  in 
March  2005—a  41  percent  increase  from  the  highest  weekly  prescription  count  of 
the previous quarter. 

BlueCross  BlueShield  of  Tennessee  formed  a  new  company,  Shared  Health,  with 
the goal of improving the delivery of health care for patients, doctors, hospitals and 
health care payers. Shared Health has developed Community Connection, a patient- 
centered  community  health  record  (CHR)  that  securely  connects  medical  profes-
sionals to a database that merges individual patient health care information, includ-
ing  claims  data,  lab  results,  prescription  drug  information,  and  immunization  his-
tory.  Shared  Health  Community  Connection  effectively  removes  a  key  obstacle  in 
the health care delivery system—a lack of information that impedes health care de-
cisions and drives up costs. 

Shared Health’s CHR is currently serving Tennessee’s TennCare population. Next 
year,  BlueCross  BlueShield  of  Tennessee  will  make  Community  Connection  avail-
able to its commercial and private health plan clients. Other private health insurers 
will then be invited to participate. Ultimately, Shared Health’s Community Connec-
tion will be accessible to consumers to review their own personal community health 
record. Based on an extensive cost-benefit analysis, Shared Health Community Con-
nection  will  ultimately  provide  an  estimated  return  on  investment  to  the  State  of 
Tennessee of more than $4 saved for every $1 spent, within 4 years of implementa-
tion. 

CIGNA HealthCare, in 2004, launched myCIGNAplans.com, a national award-win-
ning website for consumers who are considering a CIGNA consumer-directed health 
plan.  The  site  offers  an  unbiased,  side-by-side  comparison  of  the  medical  and  phar-
macy  costs  of  CIGNA  health  plans  and  helps  consumers  choose  the  one  best  suited 
for their needs. The website is customized to include information specific to the indi-
vidual’s plan options and is highly interactive, allowing consumers to model various 
health  scenarios  to  determine  how  health  events  may  impact  their  benefits  and 
costs.  The  site  was  introduced  with  the  launch  of  CIGNA’s  new  suite  of  consumer- 
directed health plans; in a three-month period, 100,000 consumers enrolled for these 
new health plans. 

In  addition,  in  April,  CIGNA  launched  an  integrated  online  Hospital  Value  Tool 
to  help  consumers  choose  a  hospital.  The  online  tool  provides  ‘‘star-based’’  health 
care  patient  outcome  and  cost  efficiency  ratings  for  hospital-based  treatments  of  19 
medical  conditions  using  both  CIGNA  and  third-party  hospital  data.  The  new  tool 
is  available  to  the  general  public  at  no  charge  and  rates  Patient  Outcomes  (a  com-
bination  of  quality  measures—risk-adjusted,  complication  and  mortality  rates,  and 
The  Leapfrog  Group  Patient  Safety  Index)  and  Cost  Efficiency  (based  on  the  hos-
pital’s  risk-adjusted  total  costs)  for  a  particular  medical  procedure  or  condition. 
CIGNA  HealthCare  members  may  also  access  more  extensive  and  detailed  quality 
information for more than 150 hospital-based procedures and conditions through the 
CIGNA member web portal, myCIGNA.com. 

Group  Health  Cooperative  in  Seattle,  Washington,  utilizes  a  clinical  information 
system  (CIS),  created  by  Epic  Systems  and  called  EpicCare,  that  facilitates  the 
rapid,  accurate,  and  secure  sharing  of  patient  medical  records  among  providers  in-
volved in a patient’s care. EpicCare continually stores and updates a patient’s entire 
medical  record,  providing  doctors  with  instant  access  to  a  far  more  encompassing 
knowledge base than was previously available. 

This system enables e-prescribing, provides information on recommended and ap-
propriate  drug  prescriptions,  generates  warnings  for  potential  safety  conflicts  be-
tween multiple drugs, and allows patients direct access to information including lab 
results and prescription refill reminders. Patients can access their own online med-
ical  records  through  secure  access  to  the  MyGroupHealth  website.  In  addition,  the 
MyGroupHealth website provides a host of online services for patients including se-
cure  messaging  between  patients  and  their  health  care  team,  online  appointment 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

scheduling,  online  access  to 
Knowledgebase, and condition centers and moderated discussion groups. 

immunization  records,  access  to  Healthwise* 

Harvard Pilgrim HealthCare, in 2003, launched an updated version of its member 
web  portal,  HPHConnect.  Through  this  web  portal,  Harvard  Pilgrim  members  can 
view  their  prescription  drug  history;  check  the  status  of  doctor  and  hospital  bills; 
check  the  status  of  referrals  and  authorizations  for  care;  compare  hospitals  using 
information  about  quality  and  patient  safety;  understand  and  compare  treatment 
options for health care they may need; and securely communicate with Harvard Pil-
grim. 

In addition, HPHConnect provides online transaction tools that are used by thou-
sands of employers, brokers and providers. By the end of 2004, providers and billing 
agents  were  conducting  a  million  electronic  transactions  a  month  using 
HPHConnect and other electronic channels. HPHConnect provides instant checks on 
patient  eligibility  and  claims  status,  and  ensures  that  referrals  arrive  before  pa-
tients do. This means less paperwork and more control over cash-flow for clinicians, 
and fewer administrative hassles for patients, before and after they receive care. Al-
most  99  percent  of  member  eligibility  checks  and  87  percent  of  claims  inquiries  by 
provider offices are completed electronically, rather than by phone or fax. 

Harvard Pilgrim is also participating in two Massachusetts regional health initia-
tives—Massachusetts-SHARE  (MA–SHARE)  and  the  Massachusetts  eHealth  Col-
laborative (MAeHC). MA–SHARE’s aim is to encourage the exchange of health care 
data  through  information  technology,  standards  and  administrative  simplification, 
to  ensure  that  clinical  health  information  is  available  wherever  needed  in  an  effi-
cient, cost-effective and safe manner. MAeHC is bringing together the state’s major 
health care stakeholders to establish an EHR system that would enhance the qual-
ity, efficiency and safety of care in Massachusetts. 

Health  Alliance  Plan  (HAP)  awarded  a  grant  to  the  Henry  Ford  Health  System 
for  its  Picture  Archiving  and  Communication  System  (PACS),  which  replaces  x-ray 
films  with  digital  images.  This  initiative  makes  care  more  seamless  for  patients  as 
they  do  not  have  to  repeat  tests,  provides  almost  immediate  access  to  results  for 
providers enabling the delivery of timely medical care, and greatly reduces adminis-
trative  costs.  Physicians  can  simultaneously  call  up  diagnostic  images  and  related 
information  online  allowing  for  multiple  consultations.  The  initiative  reduces  over-
use and misuse of services, and prevents medical errors as radiologists avoid unnec-
essary  retakes  of  tests  and  procedures.  In  2004,  PACS  produced  a  cost  savings  of 
$8.84 million. 

In  addition,  General  Motors,  Ford  Motor  Company,  DaimlerChrysler  Corp.,  and 
the  UAW  joined  together  to  launch  the  Southeast  Michigan  e-Prescribing  Initiative 
(SEMI)  in  partnership  with  HAP,  other  Michigan  health  plans,  electronic  pre-
scribing  technology  providers,  and  pharmacy  benefit  manager  Medco  Health  Solu-
tions,  Inc.  Eleven  medical  centers  now  use  e-prescribing  technology  as  a  result  of 
this  initiative  and  physicians  have  written  over  70,000  prescriptions.  The  Henry 
Ford Medical Group improved its generic use rate by 7.3 percent, which potentially 
will save $3.1 million in pharmacy costs over a one-year period. 

HAP also has implemented an online reminder tool to help physicians keep more 
patients  up-to-date  with  crucial  preventative  health  services.  The  Member  Health 
Manager (MHM) shows primary care physicians and OB/GYNs electronic, on-screen 
reminders for breast, cervical and colorectal cancer screenings, well-child visits, and 
flu  and  pneumonia  immunizations.  During  a  six-month  pilot  for  MHM,  more  than 
3,000  HAP  members  received  preventative  services  after  physicians  viewed  online 
reminders.  The  guidelines  are  evidence-based,  offering  recommendations  that  are 
well-supported in medical literature. 

Lastly,  HAP  has  implemented  an  automated  process  to  identify  and  stratify 
chronically  ill  members  according  to  the  severity  of  their  illness  so  that  HAP  pro-
viders can deliver the most appropriate and personalized interventions. This process 
gathers  medical  claims,  ER  visits,  inpatient  hospitalizations,  pharmacy  claims  and 
lab data. An algorithm then uses this data and ICD–9 codes to assign a Health Risk 
Indicator  score  to  each  member  and  ensure  that  they  receive  the  proper  case  man-
agement.  The  ultimate  impact  on  clinical  and  financial  outcomes  is  currently  being 
monitored. 

Kaiser  Permanente  is  currently  in  the  process  of  rolling  out  Kaiser  Permanente 
HealthConnect—a $3 billion, 10-year initiative focused on deploying electronic med-
ical  record  systems  to  ensure  the  best  care  for  their  members  and  provide  doctors, 
nurses and others caregivers with real-time information. In addition to an electronic 
medical  record,  Kaiser  Permanente  HealthConnect  involves  the  development  and 
deployment of a highly sophisticated nationwide information management and deliv-
ery  system  that  integrates  the  clinical  record  with  appointments,  registration,  and 
billing.  The  Kaiser  Permanente  HealthConnect  program  is  expected  to  deliver  im-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

provements  in  care  delivery  and  promote  cost  savings  across  the  entire  Kaiser 
Permanente  organization.  Through  advanced  technology  and  an  integrated  care  de-
livery  system,  Kaiser  Permanente  will  eliminate  the  inefficiencies  and  error  prone-
ness of paper-based systems. 

Patients,  physicians  and  other  authorized  health  care  staff  will  have  access  to 
complete,  up-to-the-minute  medical  records,  including  test  and  lab  results.  Imme-
diate  access  to  the  best-practice  medical  science  will  help  physicians  and  other 
health care professionals streamline patient care processes and improve health out-
comes.  Referrals  to  specialists  can  be  made  on  the  spot;  prescriptions  are  sent  to 
pharmacies  electronically;  and  two  doctors  treating  the  same  patient  from  different 
locations can share information in real-time. Through the new system, patients will 
also be able to schedule appointments, request medication refills, and ask for refer-
rals. Full deployment of Kaiser Permanente HealthConnect across all of Kaiser’s re-
gions will be completed by 2007. 

Southwest  Medical  Associates  (SMA),  the  largest  multi-specialty  physician  group 
practice  in  Nevada  and  a  subsidiary  of  Sierra  Health  Services,  began  investing  in 
information  technology  in  2002  to  transform  the  way  health  care  is  delivered  and 
managed  in  Nevada.  The  first  step  was  the  implementation  of  an  electronic  pre-
scribing  tool  from  Allscripts  Healthcare  Solutions.  E-prescribing  has  increased  the 
appropriate  use  of  generic  drugs  from  59  percent  to  65  percent,  saving  millions  of 
dollars in drug costs for patients and their health plan sponsors. 

SMA  also  migrated  all  patient  paper  medical  records  to  an  electronic  environ-
ment. The medical record data for all patients is now documented electronically and 
is  accessible  immediately  to  all  SMA  providers  from  any  location  within  SMA  and 
remotely  through  a  secure  web-based  interface.  The  end  result  is  that  administra-
tive costs for maintaining paper records have declined while the quality and timeli-
ness  of  the  information  available  to  providers  at  the  point  of  care  is  dramatically 
improved.  In  addition,  SMA  has  implemented  a  digital  radiology  environment  that 
allows  images  to  be  made  available  immediately  for  review  and  evaluation  at  any 
site.  The  reduction  in  x-ray  film  lowered  the  average  cost  of  a  study  from  $2.67  to 
$1.58. 

In  the  near  future,  SMA  plans  to  expand  use  and  access  to  their  TouchWorks 
EMR  beyond  health  care  professionals  at  SMA  to  other  providers  within  the  Las 
Vegas  Valley  as  well  as  to  patients  themselves.  By  expanding  access  of  summary 
medical  information  to  patients,  SMA  will  be  contributing  to  the  development  of  a 
PHR. In addition, in partnership with Health Plan of Nevada (HPN), SMA will pro-
vide  a  secure  web-based  link  to  summary  EMR  information.  This  initiative  will  en-
able all providers within the HPN network to view critical medical information and 
allow patients to view and print their medical record information to share with pro-
viders  wherever  they  seek  care.  The  rollout  of  the  PHR  for  HPN  members  is  ex-
pected to begin in the third quarter of 2005. 

WellPoint  Health  Networks  launched  an  extensive  private  health  initiative  to 
equip  physicians  with  health  information  technology  tools  in  2004.  Approximately 
19,500  technology  packages  were  distributed—17,000  of  which  were  desktop  com-
puters  designed  to  help  physicians  use  the  Internet  for  administrative  transactions 
and enhance general medical knowledge. E-prescribing solutions were given to 2,700 
providers. 

This initiative has resulted in over 60,000 electronic prescriptions to date and the 
number  continues  to  grow.  In  addition,  WellPoint  currently  has  its  own  electronic 
medical  record  using  claims-based  data  deployed  at  Blue  Cross  Blue  Shield  of  Mis-
souri (owned by WellPoint), and will soon launch a plan to make this data available 
to emergency rooms throughout Missouri. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of  you  once  again,  for 
your excellent testimony. I understand, Ms. Bostrom, that you have 
to testify on the House side, so I will start with you. Exciting com-
panies  are  investing  in  a  lot  of  health  information  technology.  I 
know  there  are  a  lot  of  companies.  I  visited  Cisco  and  McKesson 
when  I  was  in  California.  Health  information  technology  was  part 
of my own personal experience and practice. And, I enjoyed visiting 
some  of  the  information  technology  companies  and  seeing  some  of 
the  products  that  are  being  offered.  I  think  health  information 
technology is very exciting. 

I want to ask one question, and maybe even one comment before 
you  leave.  Many  physicians  service  several  hospitals.  They  drive 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

from  place,  to  place,  to  place.  This  can  be  frustrating  for  the  pa-
tient  and  family  members.  Before  my  grandmother  passed  away, 
she  was  in  a  hospital  for  a  few  weeks.  As  a  family  member,  I  was 
waiting,  and  waiting,  and  waiting,  and  waiting,  for  the  physician 
to  show  up  to  the  hospital  for  an  update.  It  seems  to  me  that  if 
a physician had the ability to access electronic health records from 
home,  the  physician  could  see  what  went  on  at  night.  Dr.  Glaser, 
it  would  seem  to  me  that  the  number  you  mentioned,  which  indi-
cates that only 11 percent of savings are accruing back to the phy-
sician  might  be  a  little  more  than  11  percent.  Physicians  are  still 
going to have to make hospital visits, but electronic health records 
would  seem  to  make  their  time  a  lot  more  efficient.  Electronic 
health  records  assist  in  improving  the  quality  of  care  and  reduce 
physician  driving  time.  If  the  physician  accesses  health  records 
from multiple points, including the records that are at the hospital, 
and  several  other  health  care  facilities,  it  seems  to  me  that  elec-
tronic  health  records  can  facilitate  more  efficiency.  And,  for  the 
physician who is treating a patient from back east, or out west, or 
wherever  the  other  person  is,  they  could  have  access  to  all  of  the 
necessary electronic health records. 

Obviously,  there  are  significant  benefits,  but  are  products  being 

developed, to allow physicians to do this? 

Ms.  BOSTROM.  The  points  you’ve  raised  about  the  healthcare  in-
dustry  are  interesting,  because  if  you  look  at  our  high  tech  indus-
try,  the  employees  are  people  that  work  for  our  company.  What  is 
different  of  course  in  healthcare  is  the  doctors,  as  you  mentioned 
they work for and with a number of providers and the independent. 
And so the question is how do you provide them with access to this 
information. How do you motivate the hospital or the clinic to help 
the doctor get access to this technology or these applications? 

So I think number one, on the application side there are a num-
ber  of  applications  being  developed,  many  of  them  have  been  de-
ployed. 

The  question  is,  are  there  financial  incentives  for  the  providers, 
or  the  doctors  as  was  mentioned  earlier  to  adopt  there.  If  they  ac-
crue  the  savings,  where  does  that  savings  go?  Does  it  go  to  them, 
so  they  can  reinvest,  or  does  it  go  somewhere  else?  And  will  they 
be  assured  that  they’re  going  to  get  that  reimbursement?  I  mean 
right now, if you want to do an e-mail exchange with a doctor, that 
doctor  may  or  may  not  get  reimbursed  for  that.  He  is  not  highly 
incented to do it. So I think that’s where the government can help 
motivate this. 

I  would  say  the  second  factor  is  an  area  I  know  you’re  familiar 
with,  which  is  the  idea  of  broadband,  and  broadband  access.  Be-
cause many of these doctors, and many of these smaller clinics are 
located  in  pockets  of  the  country  where  they’re  not  located  near  a 
major  medical  facility.  So  the  idea  of  can  they  get  easy  access  to 
X-rays,  or  other  types  of  diagnostic  equipment,  is  the  connectivity 
in place for them to do that? So I think the combination of financial 
incentives,  and  universal  broadband  are  going  to  be  two  factors 
where  the  government  can  help.  I  think  if  you  talk  to  most  of  the 
technology  providers,  we’re  ready  with  the  applications,  and  the 
technology.  We  need  to  make  sure  the  motivation  is  out  there  and 
the encouragement to move forward rapidly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

Senator ENSIGN. Dr. Glaser, I would like to hear more about the 
comments  you  made  concerning  the  physician,  versus  hospital  set-
tings,  and  your  references  to  small  hospitals.  A  lot  of  people  have 
talked today about financial incentives for health information tech-
nology,  including  initiatives  through  the  tax  code,  and  through 
other  direct  means.  These  types  of  initiatives  are  always  very  dif-
ficult.  We’re  hearing  about  huge  savings,  and  in  this  case,  to  the 
hospitals,  to  the  insurance  companies,  and  some  to  the  physician. 
However,  it  sounds  like  the  majority  of  the  savings  would  be  real-
ized  by  others—not  just  by  the  practitioner.  We  have  to  be  careful 
when  it  comes  to  an  investment  in  health  information  technology. 
We don’t want to establish a program that then creates a life of its 
own.  If  there  is  an  initial  investment,  we  have  to  be  very  careful. 
I believe we have to be careful in how we structure any type of in-
centive. My question for you Dr. Glaser is with regard to the small 
hospital. You said that a lot of small hospitals can’t afford to adopt 
and  implement  health  information  technology.  Well  if  those  hos-
pitals put pen to paper, or if these hospitals have a lot of Medicaid 
patients,  it  would  seem  to  me,  that  if  they  put  health  information 
technology  in  place,  there  would  be  a  huge  return  on  the  invest-
ment.  So  have  studies  been  conducted  on  this  matter?  For  every 
dollar  spent  on  health  information  technology,  how  much  of  a  re-
turn  is  obtained,  and  why  wouldn’t  a  small  hospital  obtain  the 
same kind of return? I understand the physician’s point of view on 
this  topic,  but  I  don’t  understand  the  hospital  situation  you  men-
tioned. 

Dr.  GLASER.  I  think  what  we  find  even  in  our  studies,  for  Part-
ners,  it’s  a  net  economic  loss.  While  we’re  better  at  treating  dia-
betic  patients,  and  we  paid  the  expense  of  doing  that,  there’s  no 
revenue  upside  for  doing  that.  So  whether  you’re  big  or  you’re 
small,  it’s  a  loss.  We  happen  to  be  large  enough  and  have  vision, 
and  that’s  not  to  demean  the  visions  of  others,  that  we’re  going  to 
go off and do this. Because of this, we have begun to work with our 
local payers to increase the incentive if we do better diabetes care, 
or  we  reduce  errors,  then  there  are  additional  funds.  And  people 
are  learning  about  what’s  the  right  mix  of  dollars,  and  the  right 
format of all of those things. 

So  the  economic—and  that’s  not  to  say  that  there’s  no  economic 
gain at all; because there is a reduced paperwork, and a variety of 
other  things.  But  net—it’s  pretty  much  an  economical  loss  regard-
less  of  size,  small  doctors,  50-person  group,  physicians,  small  hos-
pital, big hospital. 

Senator ENSIGN. It’s an economic loss, even to a hospital, is what 

you’re saying? 

Dr. GLASER. If we reduce medication errors, in the study that Dr. 
Carolyn  Clancy  cited  of  several  thousand  dollars  associated  with 
the  medication  errors.  That  is  expense  to  someone  who  is  under-
writing  the  care.  And  in  a  very  perverse  way,  if  we  have  to  keep 
you another day because we hurt you, we make money on that. It’s 
kind  of  this  odd  thing  that  we  actually  net  up  on  an  error  rather 
than net down. Because if we send you home early, we’ve got a va-
cant bed that we now have to fill. 

Senator ENSIGN. Well, that brings us to Ms. Ignagni. You’ve been 
around Washington long enough to know that every time we try to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

come  up  with  a  payment  system  for  the  Medicaid  and  Medicare 
programs,  we  go  through  all  of  the  machinations  of  how  to  perfect 
a payment system, and none of them seem to work very well. There 
are  perverse  incentives,  some  of  which  you  have  mentioned.  We 
don’t  pay  for  performance  right  now.  We  put  artificial  numbers  on 
things  and  we  don’t  pay  for  best  practices.  But  it  would  seem  to 
me, Ms. Ignagni, that your industry needs to help us come up with 
a way to incentivize providers based on performance. Does that re-
quire  changes  in  Stark  laws?  What  is  required  for  you  to  be  able 
to give us a model that can be used? Hopefully we can change our 
Medicare reimbursements and our Medicaid reimbursements to re-
flect some of the changes you are asking for. 

Ms. IGNAGNI. Thank you Mr. Chairman, as you know, we’re way 
ahead  of  the  public  sector  programs  in  terms  of  pay-for-perform-
ance,  quality  measurement  and  prioritizing,  this  value  question 
that  you’re  inviting.  We  believe  that  we  are  an  important  focal 
point,  where  all  of  this  information  comes  together.  In  fact  we’ve 
provided  evidence  where  a  physician  group  affiliated  with  the  Si-
erra  health  plan  in  your  area  is  actually  working  on  a  personal 
health  record  with  the  health  plan,  and  this  I  think  will  presage 
what  will  happen  throughout  the  healthcare  system.  So  we’re 
launching now. 

Is  a  consolidated,  organized  effort  going  to  be  doing  it  hand-in- 
hand, with physician groups, with consumer groups to begin to de-
velop the rules of the road for personal health records so that plans 
will not compete on the way that personal health records are orga-
nized, what is in them and so on? We can make it Internet-capable. 
We can make it patient-owned. We could make it portable. That is 
what  patients  want.  That  is  consumer-centric  and  we’re  excited 
about  that,  and  we  can  work  with  a  broad  collaborative  to  get  the 
rules of the road established. At the same time, the goal is to synch 
this  up  with  what  is  going  on  in  the  area  of  electronic  health 
records, and electronic medical records so that they can all be com-
patible. So that’s what we’re about to launch, we’re on the precipice 
of that, we’re very excited about it. Because this is the area of our 
core  competency,  that  we  can  bring  to  the  delivery  system,  to  help 
patients,  to  help  providers,  to  align  the  quality  and  the  incentives 
through the payment system in a way that I think the public sector 
will ultimately adopt as well. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  I  would  like  to  follow  up  quickly,  and  then  I’ll 
turn it over to Senator Allen. The savings that everybody seems to 
be  talking  about,  appears  to  accrue  more  to  health  plan  members 
than  they  do  to  others  in  the  healthcare  system.  And  so  are  you 
reflecting your payment incentives. You said that you’re paying for 
performance.  I  imagine  that  if  you  have  electronic  health  records, 
you  have  better  performance.  But,  are  there  direct  incentives  for 
those who adopt certain electronic health records? 

Ms. IGNAGNI. I think what you see all over the country is indeed 
that  there  are,  and  there  will  be  more  as  we  go  through  this  year 
and  next  year.  But  the  incentives  are  not  disembodied  from  the 
quality  of  performance,  and  so  it  is  the  point  about  do  you  incent 
the adoption of technology, or do you incent the quality goal which 
will require the adoption of technology. We’re focusing on the latter 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

not  the  former,  because  that  will  achieve  the  kinds  of  efficiencies 
and effectiveness that we need. 

In  terms  of  the  results  accruing  to  the  health  plan,  the  dollars 
that  go  to  the  health  plan  then  get  passed-back  in  terms  of  more 
affordable  rates,  for  public  and  private  sector  purchasers  and  in-
creasingly  consumers  that  are  buying  on  their  own,  and  so  that’s 
the  pass-back  in  terms  of  the  folks  who  are  using  the  healthcare 
system. And so that is what happens to that. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Dr.  Basch,  would  you  like  to  comment  on  that? 
Dr.  BASCH.  I  would  agree  completely.  And  thank  you  Mr.  Chair-
man for the opportunity to add a comment. I was surprised I didn’t 
get  a  question  from  you  about  this—why  did  I  adopt  these  ad-
vanced tools that not only cost me more money, but take more un-
compensated time. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Actually,  as  a  veterinarian,  I  adopted  some  of 
the  same  kinds  of  systems  that  you  did.  I  understand  why  health 
information technology cost you a significant amount of money, es-
pecially in a small practice. But I recognize that you want to prac-
tice better. 

Dr.  BASCH.  Right.  But  I  also  responded  to  an  opportunity  af-
forded me by a private payer, and to be the first, ‘‘Bridges to Excel-
lence’’  practice  in  the  District  of  Columbia.  This  is  a  pay-for-per-
formance  program  through  a  private  payer  which  rewards  us  for 
achieving  certain  processes.  They’re  made  easier  with  information 
technology,  but  the  technology  is  not  required.  And  what  I  like 
about that program, and programs that look at quality and process 
improvement,  is  they’re  focused  on  what  we  achieved,  not  nec-
essarily focused on the IT tools purchased. 

So in this case my practice was given the opportunity to achieve 
a bonus for 3 years if we made certain process improvements. This 
made the purchase of information technology and practice redesign 
for  my  small  practice,  a  smart  business  choice,  rather  an  onerous 
mandate. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Did  the  program  help  you  see  how  process  and 

quality of care would improve? 

Dr.  BASCH.  They  would  have.  However,  I  was  aware  of  this  pro-
gram  long  before  it  was  offered  to  me,  and  I  was  waiting  for  it  to 
come  to  this  region.  But  certainly  as  part  of  the  program,  yes  sir, 
they do make you aware of what it can do and what kinds of tech-
nology are necessary to best reach those goals. 
Senator ENSIGN. Thank you. Senator Allen. 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you all for 
your  testimony.  I’m  just  trying  to  get  a  theme  through  all  of  this 
from  the  different  perspectives,  and  this  is  an  outstanding  panel. 
Both panels were. But this is just from the delivery system. Listen-
ing  to  first  Ms.  Bostrom,  who  did  have  to  leave.  She  was  talking 
about  how  much  less  $8,000  versus  $1,000  per  worker  invested,  in 
non-medical versus medical, so you wonder why that’s the case and 
that  fits  in  very  closely  with  Dr.  Glaser’s  testimony.  And  then  Dr. 
Basch  was  saying,  well  what  in  the  heck  does  it  matter,  because 
of reimbursement. 

So  as  we’re  trying  to  figure  out  incentives,  we  need  to  under-
stand what will incent someone to make—what will motivate some-
one  to  do  as  Dr.  Basch  has  done,  or  we  would  like  others  to  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

similar  to  McKesson.  When  you  hear  and  read  testimony  of  the 
400,000  alerts  triggered  weekly  to  nurses  to  advise  them  of  wrong 
medication.  In  all  the  stats,  the  numbers  of  incorrect  diagnoses, 
wrong medications, and so on, and the loss of life, or added injuries 
that  are  caused  by  that.  That’s  a  great  concern.  Just  for  the  deliv-
ery  of  health,  much  less  the  question  of  ethical,  or  proper  profes-
sional services. So going through all of this, you get the reimburse-
ment  situation,  which  is  probably  not  clearly  going  to  be  the  pur-
view  of  any  of  this  legislation,  but  something  that  ought  to  be  ad-
dressed. You would think that in Susan Bostrom’s testimony, she’s 
talking about Virginia where Cisco has provided a system that en-
ables radiology reports to be delivered to doctors in minutes, rather 
than days. 

You would think that as healthcare professionals you would want 
to  do  that.  It’s  just  faster,  quicker  and  obviously,  get  on  to  what-
ever  treatment  is  necessary.  Then  we  hear  from  the  insurance 
folks. And I was glad your last question got into it, because one of 
the  things  I  hear  a  lot  from  physicians  about,  is  medical  liability 
cost  and  how  it  is  skyrocketing.  And  it’s  one  of  the  reasons  there 
are  no  physicians  in  rural  areas  or  small  towns,  regardless  of 
whether  they  have  access  to  broadband  or  not.  They  want  to  be— 
which  I’m  very  much  in  favor  of.  But  they’re  going  to  need  to  be 
with  a  hospital,  because  they  just  cannot  afford  all  the  costs  of 
medical  liability  insurance.  So  when  you  look  at  the  adverse  out-
comes,  due  to  incorrect  medications.  And  that’s  usually,  or  maybe 
not  knowing  what  someone’s  allergy  is,  and  therefore  prescribing 
the  wrong  medicine,  or  somebody  reads  it  wrong  because  doctors 
are  famous  for  their  handwriting.  Or  infamous  I  should  say.  If 
what  this—the  use  of  these  tools,  and  these  safeguards,  and  these 
double-checkings, you ended up with fewer lawsuits. I’m not saying 
everyone  of  these  ends  up  in  a  lawsuit,  not  every  adverse  medical 
outcome  ends  up  in  a  lawsuit.  However  some  do  and  that  drives 
up the cost of insurance to settle those claims, whether they’re liti-
gated the whole way through or not. If you could end up with fewer 
medical  liability  or  medical  malpractice  suits  then  could  insurance 
companies, and this is an incentive, this is from the private sector, 
discount  for  such  safeguards,  or  for  assisted  living  facilities,  which 
have  really  high  liability  costs.  Obviously  it’s  24-hour  service  that 
may  have  these  bar  codes  and  so  forth  on  them,  or  anything  like 
that. Could there be a discount, for each professional, or each facil-
ity that adopts these sort of practices? Because that is an economic 
matter which I think would relate also to lessened liability, because 
of  the  more  careful  practice  of  medicine.  It  seemed  like  Dr.  Basch 
said that he was doing it anyway. 

But  I  would  ask  Ms.  Ignagni,  if  any  sort,  and  I  know  you  don’t 
speak for all insurance companies, but could something like that be 
put  forward  to  incent,  and  I  think  reduce  the  liability  risk  from 
outcomes that are due to negligence? 

Ms.  IGNAGNI.  I  think  you’re  appropriately  pointing  out,  we  have 
two  issues  of  medical  liability.  One  is  the  direct  cost  of  the  law-
suits.  The  other  is  far  greater:  the  defensive  medicine  that  goes 
along with that. It’s a $100 billion premium for defensive medicine, 
so you’re quite right to probe. Just as we’ve seen from an insurance 
perspective  we’re  incenting  providers  to  reach  goals  and  objectives 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

in the area of quality and reimbursing more when they reach those 
goals.  One  could  imagine  my  members  write  health  insurance, 
we’re  health  insurance  plans.  We  don’t  do  liability  insurance  or 
malpractice  insurance,  but  one  could  reasonably  suspect  that  the 
same logic would apply and you could tie some of these things with 
the  presence  of  moving  in  this  direction,  having  these  tools  and 
techniques—because it would lessen the ability of lawsuits, or risk, 
or it would have use. So I think it’s a very reasonable idea. 

And  I  can  tell  you  in  the  policy  community,  more  and  more  peo-
ple are beginning to talk about it, so I think you’re onto something 
there. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Ms.  Pure,  have  you  found  any  benefit  from  the 
approaches  that  you  all  take  with  your  bar-coding  and  checking 
and so forth, insofar as any insurance, or liability insurance costs? 
Ms.  PURE.  A  number  of  our  customers  have  gone  to  their  mal-
practice  insurers  to  ask  for  some  compensation  relief  when  they 
have  basic  safety  standards  in  place.  But  it’s  really  state-to-state 
practice,  insurer-to-insurer.  There  is  nothing  across  the  board  that 
we  have  seen  happen.  You  know,  one  of  the  things  we  don’t  count 
into  the  cost  savings  is  nursing  turnover,  nursing  retention,  and 
nursing  satisfaction.  We  have  study  after  study  that  shows  that 
nurses  are  happier,  more  satisfied,  and  their  retention  rates  go  up 
dramatically if they feel like they’re practicing care in a safer envi-
ronment. So I think there are a lot of intangible costs that we need 
to look at as well. 

Senator  ALLEN.  That’s  a  very  good  point.  The  nurses,  they’re  in 
such  great  demand  and  they  are  there  all  the  time.  To  the  extent 
that you can maximize their assistance, and I will tell you they are 
the  key  people  in  every  hospital.  Nothing  against  the  physicians, 
but  the  nurses  are  the  ones  who  are  there,  giving  comfort,  assur-
ance,  and  monitoring.  And  if  they  can’t  handle  it,  obviously  they 
have  to  bring  in  a  physician.  Dr.  Basch  you  ended  up  getting  in  a 
roundabout  way,  you  ended  up  getting  some  sort  of  insurance 
break,  or  incentive.  I  was  listening  closely,  what  is  your  insurance 
company?  Do  you  think  others—if  I  discern  that  correctly,  do  you 
know if there are any other insurance companies that provide such 
incentives, or reduced premiums let’s say? 

Dr.  BASCH.  Senator,  actually  what  we  ended  up  getting  was  the 
opportunity  for  participation  in  a  program  from  a  payer,  a  private 
payer  to  increase  payments  to  us  for  quality  improvement.  Not  a 
reduction  in  malpractice.  And  if  I  may  expand  my  answer  a  little 
bit  about  the  issue  of  malpractice  in  the  outpatient  setting.  This 
has been looked at extensively, and most lawsuits in the outpatient 
or ambulatory setting are not that similar to ones that occur in the 
inpatient or hospital setting. 

In the hospital setting there is clear evidence that the use of ad-
vanced  systems  such  as  computerized  physician  order  entry  has 
been  demonstrated  to  reduce  medication  errors.  These  medication 
errors in the hospital setting have a higher potential to cause harm 
and  lead  to  lawsuits,  compared  to  the  outpatient  setting.  We  see 
the  advantage  of  the  advanced  EHR  not  just  in  reducing  mistakes 
but in helping to move mediocre care to excellent care. And I hope 
we  don’t  have  malpractice  lawyers  coming  up  with  a  new  business 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

97 

schema  here.  Patients  don’t  typically  sue  for  just  getting  mediocre 
care, if they did we would have a many more suits in this country. 
Senator ALLEN. Thank you. Dr. Glaser, did you have anything to 

add? 

Dr.  GLASER.  Senator,  I  think  it’s  interesting,  I  give  you  one  set 
of  points,  when  we  put  in  a  provider  order  entry.  Senator  Kerry 
mentioned earlier we did a pre/post examination of our malpractice 
experience. We self insure with all the other Harvard teaching hos-
pitals.  Our  malpractice  cost  dropped  3  percent,  which  we  attribute 
to  CPOE  even  though  there  are  a  small  number  of  cases,  and 
there’s  a  tail  on  these  things  you  can  take  years  between  suit  and 
settlement  for  example.  So  there  was  evidence  of  a  decrease.  And 
the  one  question  is  why  not  more?  Why  was  there  only  3  percent? 
It could have been whatever set of numbers you want. And it turns 
out the bulk of the malpractice experience is surgical mistakes and 
children  born  with  defects  or  problems  et  cetera.  And  those  form 
the  bulk  of  the  malpractice  experience.  Which  a  lot  of  these  tech-
nologies  won’t  do  much  for.  So  the  leverage  points  may  not  be 
largely in the malpractice arena. It may be much more significantly 
on whether we do routine care well, or whether we administer the 
right  drugs  and  a  variety  of  other  things  which  may  not  always, 
in fact rarely, wind up in the courts. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and 
thank  you  ladies  and  gentlemen  for  the  outstanding  perspectives. 
I appreciate it. 

Senator ENSIGN. Senator Kerry? 
Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  apologize  to  the 
panel  but  unfortunately  we  have  competing  hearings,  so  I  had  to 
go  over  quickly  to  another  one.  I  understand  from  the  Chairman 
however  that  the  testimony  has  been  just  terrific  and  we  certainly 
appreciate  that  very,  very  much.  Dr.  Glaser,  you  also  hold  a  posi-
tion  do  you  not  as  the  President  or  Chairman  of  the  National  e- 
initiative. eHealth Initiative? 

Dr.  GLASER.  Senator,  I’m  the  head  of  the  board  of  the  eHealth 
Initiative,  which  is  a  non-profit  coalition  of  multiple  stakeholders 
in the industry who come together to see how we can solve, resolve 
a variety of issues that go on. 

Senator KERRY. How long has that group been in existence now? 
Dr. GLASER. Senator, I’m going to hazard to guess about 5 years 

I believe. 

Senator KERRY. How many players are there in it? 
Dr.  GLASER.  There  are  approximately  120  to  140  members  who 

come from a wide range of stakeholders. 

Senator KERRY. They’re all focused on this one concept? 
Dr. GLASER. Correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  would  you  say  if  there  is  a  concensus? 
What  would  be  the  order  of  priority  of  concensus  about  what  is 
needed, and how we might be able to proceed? 

Dr. GLASER. Well I think, Senator, the concensus would be num-
ber one, we have to change the financial incentive system here. We 
suggest the doctor invest, but nonetheless the economic value is in-
sufficient, and they balk at that. So that’s number one. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

And  the  eHealth  initiative  has  drafted  a  framework  called  Par-
allel  Pathways *  which  you  all  may  want  to  include  in  the  record, 
there are copies of it at the table here, that outlines approaches to 
the financing. And I’m not sure how the mechanics work of adding 
it to the record on all of that. So that would be number one, looking 
at  the  incentive  structure  and  migrating  it  to  increase  the  sophis-
tication over time. 

Number two is helping the small physician practice. If you’re Dr. 
Peter Basch and you’re a solo practitioner who in the world do you 
turn  to?  There  are  300  EMR  vendors  out  there.  How  do  you  pick 
the right one, who’s going to help you? And so it would be the sec-
ond  area  that  we  focus  on,  and  the  third  is  the  standards  realm. 

Senator KERRY. Is that in order of priority? 
Dr. GLASER. Yes sir. 
Senator KERRY. So you believe we could proceed to get technology 
out  into  the  marketplace,  before  we  actually  had  this  broad  stand-
ard in place? 

Dr.  GLASER.  I  think  Senator,  we  ought  to  go  after  the  standards 
and  be  very  serious  about  that,  and  support  a  lot  of  the  Secretary 
of  Health  and  Human  Services,  and  Dr.  Brailer’s  activities  in  this 
regard. Nonetheless, I don’t think we can wait. We’ve talked about 
the number of people who will die today because of errors. The rail-
roads  couldn’t  wait,  the  electrical  power  people  didn’t  wait.  All 
kinds  of  people  didn’t  wait.  You  had  to  have  them  along  the  way, 
but they didn’t wait. 

Senator KERRY. Dr. Basch, what are the principal incentives that 
would  make  a  difference?  You’ve  spoken  about  the  view  from  the 
practitioner, what do you think would make the most difference to 
that practitioner? 

Dr. BASCH. Senator, I think—— 
Senator  KERRY.  If  you’ve  answered  any  of  this  incidentally,  just 
say it’s in the record and I’ll get it. I don’t want to have everybody 
repeat stuff. 

Dr. BASCH. I haven’t really addressed this in particular, and I’m 
happy  to  answer  your  question.  I  think  the  most  important  issue 
in terms of incentives is aligning them not just as has been stated 
by other panelists, with technology adoption; but aligning them for 
the  optimal  use  that  we  would  like  to  see  from  the  technology.  I 
want to reiterate that my testimony focused on those optimal uses, 
and  not  just  a  narrow  conformance  to  a  performance  measure,  or 
quality standard. But it is understanding that the way we’re really 
going  to  transform  the  healthcare  system  enabled  by  this  tech-
nology,  is  to  use  it  to  accomplish  other  goals  such  as  e-visits.  One 
thing  we  could  do  is  start  paying  for  e-visits.  This  would  help  doc-
tors and patients to not waste time by doing everything in the con-
text of an office visit. 

Second,  we  could  incentivize  care  coordination.  I  showed  a  slide 
during my presentation of a patient registry that is integrated with 
my  electronic  health  record,  and  while  the  slide  perhaps  didn’t 
show  as  well  as  it  does  on  my  screen  when  its  close  up,  what  it 
really  does  is  give  me  the  same  powerful  tools  in  my  EHR  to  use 
on  all  of  my  patients;  not  just  the  ones  who  remember  to  come  in, 

* The information referred to has been printed in the Appendix. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

99 

or  feel  sick  at  that  moment.  But  I  can  look  at  all  of  them,  and 
make  sure  based  on  whatever  my  practice,  my  health  system,  or 
national  goals  are,  are  acted  on.  So  if  diabetes  is  a  condition  that 
we’re  not  doing  a  good  job  on  I  can  focus  on  it.  But  for  me  to  use 
that  tool  in  my  practice  requires  that  I  take  time  away  from  the 
reimbursable activities of office visits, and require patients to come 
in for other visits or simply just ignore patients who don’t come in. 
Senator KERRY. What’s the most effective way to do that, because 
it  sounds  labor  intensive.  I  mean  it’s  now  somebody  has  got  to  in-
vest  time,  and  somebody  has  got  to  instruct.  Who’s  going  to  do 
that? 

Dr.  BASCH.  Sure.  I  think  there  are  actually  some  work-through 
mechanisms  that  have  been  sorted  out  that  work  quite  well  in  the 
office  setting,  and  it’s  a  combination  of  office  staff,  and  the  physi-
cian.  There  are  certain  things,  certainly  that  the  physician  doesn’t 
have  to  do,  for  example  using  the  registry  to  see  who  needs  to  get 
certain  tests.  That  can  be  done  by  staff,  that  can  be  automated, 
that  can  even  be  sent  in  terms  of  reminders  to  the  patient  by  se-
cure e-mail. In terms of managing the actual numbers and the fine 
points  of  care,  I  think  a  clinician  does  have  to  be  involved  in  look-
ing at who the patient is, their age, their concurrent conditions be-
cause one of the things we want to avoid as we try and move medi-
cine from mediocrity to best practices is to make sure that we don’t 
commit  other  errors.  For  example,  taking  a  patient  who  is  toward 
the end of life and looking inappropriately at their cholesterol, and 
saying  ‘‘well  the  number  says  I  should  put  you  on  a  cholesterol 
medication,’’ when obviously it’s inappropriate. 

So  I  think  we  need  to  always  remember  good  clinical  judgment. 
Senator KERRY. Interesting. Ms. Pure, I was looking at what you 
sent  up  here,  and  I  have  a  relative  who  was  recently  in  the  hos-
pital  who  was  given  one  of  these,  and  looked  in  it  and  it  was  the 
wrong  medicines.  Self-determined,  thank  heavens.  But  that  hap-
pens all the time and these I gather are sort of the antidote to that. 
What would it take to get the industry to do this? 

Ms. PURE. Well, it’s really interesting, Senator Kerry, if you look 
in  this  packet,  some  are  M&Ms  and  some  are  Skittles,  and  with 
candy it doesn’t really matter. But that happens everyday in a hos-
pital and people die when they take the wrong medication. So what 
we  see  is  a  major  trend  to  bar-code  meds,  and  actually  label  them 
on the back for the patient who is supposed to receive those meds. 
The patient wears a wrist band. The nurse wears a wrist band. The 
nurse  scans  herself,  scans  the  patient,  scans  the  med.  And  if  it’s 
not  the  right  time,  or  the  right  dose,  or  the  right  med,  it  prevents 
the nurse from administering the drug. So it’s a tremendous safety 
check. 

You  know,  the  frustrating  thing  is  we  talked  about  billions  and 
billions of dollars to change the whole healthcare system and that’s 
certainly  going  to  take  us  to  the  end  state  that  we  all  want  to  get 
to. But your average hospital could be scanning meds in 6 months, 
for somewhere between half a million, and a million dollars. 

Senator KERRY. For that hospital? 
Ms. PURE. For that hospital. 
Senator KERRY. So system-wide what are you talking about? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

100 

Ms.  PURE.  System-wide,  in  the  hospital,  at  every  nurse  station, 
every med could be scanned. Of course it costs more if it’s a really 
large hospital like John’s but for your average hospital around the 
country in 6 months you could be up and scanning meds and elimi-
nating errors. 

Senator  KERRY.  And  what  kind  of  incentive?  Is  there  one  that’s 
needed  to  get  people  to  do  that?  Have  you  got  a  cost  analysis  on 
what the savings are, in terms of the error? 

Ms.  PURE.  The  savings  unfortunately  for  medication  scanning, 
are  soft  savings,  in  terms  of  preventable  mistakes.  Nursing  satis-
faction.  The  only  real  dollar  savings  are  potentially  in  better  man-
agement of the medication inventory. But a lot of people don’t give 
the  technology  credit  for  just  a  reduction  in  inventory.  So  the  sav-
ings are soft. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well  the  savings  are  the  7,000  lives  lost  due  to 

inappropriate medications. 

in terms of not doing it. 

Ms. PURE. Exactly, in terms of dollars. But the loss is intolerable 

Senator  KERRY.  But  I  would  assume  that  there’s  a  medical  mal-

practice cost associated with that, which is calculatable. 

Ms.  PURE.  Right.  And  what  we  haven’t  seen  is  a  broad  scale 
change  in  malpractice  insurance.  Insurance  premiums  based  on 
hospital scanning. 

Senator KERRY. Well you have a great name for selling this. Ms. 
Ignagni,  just  quickly  from  the  health  insurance  plans’  point  of 
view,  what’s  the  most  important  incentive  here?  How  do  you  get 
the companies across the board to rapidly embrace this? Is it finan-
cial incentive of a significant amount, or is there some other trick? 
Ms. IGNAGNI. Actually Senator, this is a most important question 
and  I  appreciate  it.  We’re  doing  a  number  of  things  already  to 
incent quality performance, to align objectives and reimbursement. 
To  move  in  the  direction  of  computer  order  entry,  to  pay  more  for 
that.  For  example  to  pay  more  for  achieving  certain  goals  with  re-
spect  to  diabetes  management,  chronic  care  management  with  re-
spect  to  cardiac  disease,  et  cetera.  So  we’re  well  on  our  way  to 
doing  that.  But  what  we  realize  is  that  we’re  a  focal  point  for  all 
of  these  data  in  the  system  through  the  claims  picture.  So  what 
we’re doing now is we’re launching an effort with provider specialty 
societies,  consumer  groups,  similar  to  one  that  we  have  just  com-
pleted on ambulatory care in terms of quality measurement. We’re 
moving  now  to  this  area  where  we’re  launching  a  patient  record, 
and  have  an  opportunity  to  develop  rules  of  the  road  across  our 
health plan, so that they’re not competing on the standards. There-
fore  how  it  looks  and  what  goes  on,  it  can  be  portable,  it  can  be 
patient-owned,  and  we’re  working  hand-in-hand  with  speciality  so-
cieties and patients to move as quickly as we can. So when we talk 
about  uniform  standards,  the  reason  we  raised  it  today  is  that 
we’ve  come  a  long  way  in  about  6  months.  Six  months  ago  the  en-
tire  discussion  was  about  regional  healthcare  organizations.  And 
we  were  worried  about  regional  organizations  being  disembodied 
from  a  national  framework  and  that  is  why  we  raised  the  issue. 
Not that the government needs to do something. We’re well on the 
way  to  doing  something.  We  want  to  make  it  sync  up  with  elec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

101 

tronic  medical  records,  that  the  hospitals  are  developing  et  cetera, 
so it can all be part of a whole. 

What  we  see  as  the  number  one  thing  that  Congress  could  do, 
is  to  really  give  serious  thought  to  preemption  in  the  area  of  pri-
vacy  and  security.  Let  me  explain  that.  We  have  a  HIPAA  law,  as 
everyone  knows.  We  also  have  50  state  privacy  laws.  We  have 
states  acting  in  security  with  respect  to  data  security.  We’re  going 
to  get  a  national  health  information  system  with  respect  to 
healthcare,  and  one  needs  to  give  real  thought  to  the  preemption 
question.  We  also  need  to  consider  the  obligations  under  HIPAA, 
to  banks  and  financial  institutions  that  now  have  some  involve-
ment  in  this  arena,  Who  are  not  subject  to  HIPAA  guidelines  and 
restrictions. So we’re very, very focused on that. 

And  finally,  although  I  know  that  there’s  some  disagreement 
about this, we are concerned about proposals that have been made 
to  waive  the  Stark  fraud  and  abuse  laws.  We’re  very  concerned 
about that, because of what the FTC has already discussed with re-
spect  to  the  impact  of  consolidation  in  the  system  and  what  that 
could  do  to  healthcare  costs.  So  we  would  like  to  be  helpful  in 
terms  of  trying  to  solve  this  problem,  both  from  the  health  plan 
standpoint and assisting providers in making this conversion in the 
best  way  possible.  And  we  think  there’s  a  public  and  private  role. 
Senator ENSIGN. Senator Kerry, before you continue questioning, 

I need to excuse myself. 

Senator KERRY. I’m finished actually. 
Senator ENSIGN. I apologize, but I have a funeral to attend in Ar-

lington. That is why I need to leave. 

Senator KERRY. If I could just say, maybe we could join together, 
the  Administration  has  asked  for  the  $150  million,  the  House  has 
only  given  $125  million.  I’m  told  the  Senate  may  do  less.  So  per-
haps  you  and  I  could  join  together  to  try  to  write  a  letter  to  Sen-
ator  Specter  to  at  least  get  the  $125  million  if  not  better,  so  that 
we  could  guarantee  that  minimal  sort  of  effort.  And  I  would  love 
to try and do that with you. You raise some very interesting ques-
tions.  Those  are  big  issues,  we’re  going  to  have  to  deal  with  those. 
And  I  think  we  need  to  sit  down  and  figure  out  because  that’s  a 
big mouthful, all of that. But all of you, thank you, very very much. 
This  has  been  enormously  instructive,  and  I  appreciate  it.  Thank 
you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Kerry.  Without  objection 
the Senators’ written statements, and witnesses’ written testimony 
will  be  made  a  part  of  the  record.  The  record  will  remain  open  for 
7 days for Senators to submit questions or statements, without ob-
jection so ordered. This hearing is adjourned, and I thank all of the 
witnesses for their testimony. 

[Whereupon, at 12:15 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
I  join  my  colleagues  in  a  growing  bipartisan  effort  to  use  technology  to  address 

two critical problems we face in health care. 

The  first  of  these  is  a  serious  patient-safety  problem.  The  Institute  of  Medicine 
(IOM)  reports  that  medical  errors  claim  up  to  98,000  lives  every  year.  The  good 
news is that solutions exist: We can apply information technology (IT) in health care 
to dramatically reduce errors and save lives. Many of us have heard about how drug 
interactions  can  be  avoided  by  software  systems  which  check  a  patient’s  prescrip-
tions  for  hazards.  Yet  there  are  so  many  other  applications  which  can  improve 
health. For example, by reviewing and analyzing information, a health provider can 
help  a  patient  better  manage  chronic  diseases  such  as  diabetes  and  heart  disease, 
and avoid adverse outcomes. 

A  second  critical  problem  is  the  escalating  cost  of  health  care.  As  we  spend  more 
and  more  of  our  GNP  on  health  care,  we  become  less  competitive  internationally. 
At  the  same  time,  as  health  care  becomes  less  affordable,  more  Americans  join  the 
ranks  of  the  45  million  uninsured.  Health  care  simply  must  become  more  efficient. 
Costs can be reduced when tests don’t have to be repeated and data isn’t delayed. 
In fact, a patient may obtain faster, higher quality care when, for example, multiple 
practitioners  can  review  diagnostic  test  results  right  at  their  desktops.  In  an  age 
where millions of Americans share family pictures over the Internet in seconds, isn’t 
it long past time that a physician should be able to retrieve an X-ray just as easily? 
The  President  recognizes  the  disparity  in  technology  utilization  in  health  care 
versus  other  sectors  of  our  economy.  He  has  declared  a  goal  for  every  American  to 
have an electronic medical record within 10 years. I concur—we need this and more. 
In  fact,  once  that  record  is  in  place  we  can  do  so  many  things  better.  From  pre-
venting drug interactions, to managing chronic diseases, to simply helping providers 
operate  more  efficiently.  Most  of  us  have  been  told  at  one  time  or  another,  ‘‘we’re 
waiting to get the test results mailed,’’ or ‘‘we’re still waiting for your chart.’’ Health 
care is one of the last realms of such inefficiency. 

It will be essential to achieve common standards to ensure the investment which 
must  be  made  will  be  secure.  Health  care  providers  must  know  that  their  invest-
ment in systems will allow the exchange of data—for providing higher quality, more 
efficient care; for financial management, and for continued evaluation and improve-
ment. One must know that a system purchased will be compatible with others, and 
that—no  matter  what  may  happen  in  the  future  to  a  vendor—the  huge  investment 
one  makes  in  building  an  electronic  medical  record  won’t  be  lost.  In  other  words, 
your system must be able to communicate with other systems, and your investment 
in building electronic medical records must be preserved. So when a patient moves, 
their electronic ‘‘chart’’ should be able to move right along with them, and their con-
tinuity of care shouldn’t be interrupted. 

The efforts of Dr. David Brailer at HHS. and of a number of my colleagues in ad-
dressing the need for standards and interoperability are absolutely essential to mak-
ing health IT a reality. 

The  bad  news  is  that  even  with  standards  in  place  high  start-up  costs  could  pre-
vent  us  from  reaping  the  benefits  of  new  technologies.  Today  many  providers  are 
struggling  to  make  these  investments,  and  for  those  which  serve  beneficiaries  of 
Medicare,  Medicaid  and  SCHIP,  it  can  be  exceedingly  difficult.  That  is  why  I  have 
joined  with  Senator  Stabenow  to  also  address  the  means  of  implementing  tech-
nology. 

We  know  we  will  realize  significant  savings  through  information  technology.  On 
that  there  is  bipartisan  consensus.  Yet  as  providers  are  facing  ever  declining  pay-
ment  rates,  they  also  are  being  told  they  must  institute  changes  in  the  way  they 
practice, including implementing information technology. We know that much of the 
savings  in  health  care  IT  will  accrue  to  the  patient  and  payer—in  such  aspects  as 
fewer  duplicate  tests,  greater  efficiency,  and  better  health  management.  Thus  it  is 
appropriate  that,  as  we  establish  standards,  the  Federal  Government  also  assists 

(103) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

104 

providers in helping them adopt the technology. This is particularly critical for those 
providers  who  see  serve  our  Medicare,  Medicaid  and  SCHIP  beneficiaries.  That  is 
why Senator Stabenow and I have developed a means to see that standards are im-
plemented expeditiously. 

Today,  we  have  this  technology  at  our  disposal,  and  I  strongly  believe  that  we 
cannot  afford  to  delay  implementation.  Waiting  will  result  in  not  just  a  loss  in  dol-
lars which could be saved, but also in lives lost. 

I  am  optimistic  that  so  many  of  my  colleagues  are  engaged  in  developing  health 
IT  solutions.  Working  together  we  can  realize  the  promise  of  health  care  that  is 
safer and more accessible to all. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE EHEALTH INITIATIVE AND FOUNDATION 

PARALLEL PATHWAYS FOR QUALITY HEALTHCARE—A  FRAMEWORK FOR ALIGNING 
TECHNOLOGY— 

INCENTIVES WITH QUALITY
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE WORKING GROUP FOR FINANCING AND INCENTIVES * 

AND HEALTH

INFORMATION

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 

The  eHealth  Initiative  and  its  Foundation  launched  in  December  2004  a  diverse 
group  of  stakeholders  through  its  Working  Group  for  Financing  and  Incentives  to 
develop  a  set  of  principles  and  a  Framework  for  incrementally  aligning  incentives 
with  both  quality  and  efficiency  goals  and  the  health  information  technology  infra-
structure  required  to  achieve  such  goals.  The  Framework,  entitled  ‘‘Parallel  Path-
ways  for  Quality  Healthcare’’  describes  both  the  enabling  HIT  infrastructure  for 
physician  practices  as  well  as  the  standards-based  connectivity  required  within  re-
gions  and  communities.  The  Framework  provides  a  phased,  integrated  approach 
that  recognizes  the  varying  stages  of  evolution  with  regard  to  regional  multi-stake-
holder collaboration, focus on quality and performance, and health information tech-
nology penetration within markets across the United States. 

The following summarizes a set of ‘‘Principles for Financing and Incentives’’ devel-

oped by the Working Group: 

1.  Any  incentive  program  focused  on  quality  should  also  include  some  level  of 
incentive—either direct or indirect—for the health information technology (HIT) 
infrastructure required to support improvements in quality. 
2. Any financing or incentive program implemented by either the public or pri-
vate sector involving HIT should: 

healthcare. 

enable interoperability and connectivity. 

• Result  in  improvements  in  quality,  safety,  efficiency  or  effectiveness  in 
• Incentivize only those applications and systems that are standards-based to 
• Address  not  only  the  implementation  and  usage  of  HIT  applications  but 
also  the  transmission  of  data  to  the  point  of  care,  both  of  which  are  re-
quired to support high-quality care delivery. 
• Allow  for  internal  quality  improvement  or  external  performance  reporting 

as mutually agreed upon by purchasers/payers and providers. 

3.  Financing  and  incentive  programs  should  seek  to  align  both  the  costs  and 
benefits related to HIT and health information exchange. 

The  following  Framework  developed  by  the  Working  Group,  provides  guidance  to 
purchasers,  payers,  practicing  clinicians,  and  regional  or  community-based  collabo-
rations  focused  on  health  information  exchange  who  are  seeking  to  improve  the 
quality,  safety,  effectiveness  and  efficiency  of  healthcare  in  their  markets,  through 
HIT  and  exchange  of  healthcare  data.  The  Framework  provides  staged  guidance  in 
four focus areas related to aligning goals for quality healthcare: (1) quality capabili-
ties;  (2)  HIT  capabilities  within  the  physician  practice;  (3)  health  information  ex-
change capabilities; and (4) financial incentives. 

The following summarizes at a high-level the three phases of evolution. 
• In  Phase  I,  rewards  would  primarily  focus  both  on  reporting  of  measures  that 
rely on manual chart abstraction and claims data and physician usage of stand-
ards-based, interoperable HIT applications with certain basic functionalities. 

* Supported in Part by the Connecting Communities for Better Health Program Conducted in 

Cooperation with HRSA/OAT. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

105 

• In Phase II, rewards would focus on the reporting of measures that rely on clin-
ical  data  sources;  connectivity  of  standards-based,  interoperable  HIT  applica-
tions  to  clinical  data  sources  to  support  information  needs  at  the  point  of  care; 
and physician usage of HIT with more advanced functionalities. 
• In Phase III, rewards would focus on performance against process and outcomes 

measures, while phasing out rewards for HIT. 

It  is  expected  that  value  will  continue  to  increase  through  each  stage  to  pur-

chasers and payers who engage in the implementation of the Framework. 

We  are  at  a  unique  point  in  time,  where  public  and  private  sector  interests  are 
at an all-time high in two key areas: improving the quality and safety of healthcare 
and moving forward on a health information technology agenda. Approaching these 
two  key  issue  areas  in  a  siloed  manner—without  strong  integration  across  both 
areas—will  result  in  missed  opportunities,  unintended  consequences,  and  possibly 
reduced  impact  in  both  areas.  By  laying  out  an  integrated,  incremental  strategy, 
which  incorporates  goals  related  to  quality,  safety,  and  efficiency  as  well  as  health 
information  technology  and  the  mobilization  of  data  across  organizations,  the  prin-
ciples  and  Framework  included  in  this  document  offer  the  foundation  for  building 
a healthcare system that is safer, of higher quality, and more effective and efficient. 

Introduction and Background 

FULL REPORT 

The  eHealth  Initiative  and  its  Foundation  are  independent,  non-profit  affiliated 
organizations  whose  missions  are  the  same:  to  drive  improvement  in  the  quality, 
safety and efficiency of healthcare through information and information technology. 
The eHealth Initiative is a multi-stakeholder consortium representing a wide range 
of  stakeholders  who  share  this  common  goal,  including  clinicians,  health  plans, 
healthcare  IT  suppliers,  healthcare  purchasers  and  employers,  hospitals  and  other 
providers,  laboratories,  patient  and  consumer  groups,  pharmaceutical  and  medical 
device  manufacturers,  public  health  agencies,  and  representatives  of  state,  regional 
and community-based health information initiatives and organizations. 

Reports  from  a  wide  range  of  philanthropic  and  private  sector  organizations  in-
cluding  the  Commonwealth  Fund,  Institute  of  Medicine,  the  Markle  and  Robert 
Wood  Johnson  Foundations,  and  several  non-profit  organizations,  as  well  as  rep-
resentatives from the public sector such as the U.S. Government Accountability Of-
fice,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  the  U.S.  Department  of 
Veterans’ Affairs, the Department of Defense, the Medicare Payment Advisory Com-
mission,  and  several  Members  of  Congress,  recognize  the  value  of  health  informa-
tion  technology  (HIT)  in  addressing  quality,  safety  and  efficiency  challenges  in  the 
U.S. healthcare system. Interest has now turned to the development of policies and 
practices  for  accelerating  the  effective  implementation  and  use  of  such  systems  in 
a way that will assure that expected quality, safety and efficiency outcomes will be 
achieved. 

At  the  same  time,  the  development  and  implementation  of  incentives  or  pay-for- 
performance  programs  is  on  the  rise,  stimulated  by  reports  from  the  Institute  of 
Medicine  and  leadership  demonstrated  by  organizations  such  as  the  Leapfrog 
Group.  Pioneering  efforts  around  pay-for-performance  are  now  emerging  from 
Bridges to Excellence (BTE), the Integrated Healthcare Association (IHA), the Cen-
ters  for  Medicare  and  Medicaid  Services  (CMS),  as  well  as  several  other  programs 
initiated  by  both  payers  and  purchasers.  According  to  one  report,  almost  one-third 
of health plans say that they now have a pay-for-performance program in place, but 
most are in the earliest stages of development or implementation. 

Pay-for-performance systems provide higher reimbursement for those who perform 
well on a wide variety of quality, cost and efficiency measures (which are both proc-
ess and outcome-oriented). Many of these systems have been launched based on the 
recognition that current reimbursement methods are not effectively curbing both ris-
ing healthcare costs and addressing issues related to quality and safety. Many, but 
not  all,  of  the  emerging  programs  integrate  information  technology  expectations, 
recognizing that information technology can not only help with the reporting of the 
quality  data  typically  required  for  such  programs,  but  can  also  assist  with  the 
achievement of better outcomes—in both quality and efficiency. 

While  there  is  recognition  of  the  value  of  information  technology  usage  by  pro-
viders  and  the  exchange  of  information  across  institutions  to  support  a  comprehen-
sive  view  of  the  patient  at  the  point  of  care,  adoption  by  providers—in  particular 
practicing clinicians—continues to be low, due to a number of reasons, including the 
lack of standards and resulting perceived risk of purchase as well as the significant 
changes  in  work  flow  required  to  move  toward  implementation.  Many  believe  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

106 

the  largest  barrier  to  HIT  adoption  pertains  to  both  the  lack  of  capital  to  purchase 
such  systems,  and  even  more  so,  prevailing  reimbursement  methods  which  reward 
volume of services as opposed to outcomes or activities (such as usage of clinical ap-
plications)  that  would  result  in  higher  quality,  safer,  more  efficient  healthcare.  Re-
cent reports from the Markle Foundation’s Connecting for Health initiative with ad-
ditional support from the Robert Wood Johnson Foundation, the Center for Informa-
tion Technology Leadership, and MedStar Health, as well as ongoing work by orga-
nizations like Bridges to Excellence all highlight the issue of misalignment of incen-
tives; i.e., in other words, the economic imbalance that exist between those who pur-
chase  HIT  (e.g.,  practicing  clinicians,  hospitals  and  other  providers)  and  those  who 
also  benefit  from  its  use  (e.g.,  patients,  healthcare  purchasers,  and  health  plans). 
In  December  2004,  with  the  support  of  the  eHealth  Initiative  Foundation’s  Con-
necting  Communities  for  Better  Health  Program  conducted  in  cooperation  with  the 
Health  Resources  and  Services  Administration,  the  eHealth  Initiative  Foundation 
assembled  a  diverse  group  of  stakeholders  under  the  leadership  of  Co-Chairs 
Marianne  E.  DeFazio,  CEBS,  Director,  Global  Health  Benefits,  IBM  Corporation 
and  John  Glaser,  Ph.D.,  Vice  President  and  Chief  Information  Officer,  Partners 
HealthCare  System,  to  launch  the  Working  Group  for  Financing  and  Incentives 
(Working  Group).  The  Working  Group,  which  includes  practicing  clinicians, 
healthcare purchasers, health plans, healthcare IT suppliers, and hospitals, came to-
gether to define a set of principles and strategies for providing financing and incen-
tives to improve healthcare through HIT adoption within ambulatory care. 

The  purpose  of  this  paper  is  to  summarize  key  results  and  findings  of  the  first 
phase of the Working Group’s efforts, including the insights that were gained, a set 
of  principles  for  financing  and  incentives,  and  a  framework  for  designing  such  pro-
grams  to  align  incentives  with  both  quality  goals  and  the  HIT  infrastructure  re-
quired  by  both  practicing  clinician  offices  and  health  information  exchange  initia-
tives  within  markets  to  support  those  goals.  This  framework  is  currently  entitled 
the ‘‘Parallel Pathways for Quality Healthcare’’ (the Framework). 
Overview of the Goals and Objectives of the Working Group 

The purpose of the Working Group was to achieve multi-stakeholder consensus on 
a  set  of  policies  and  principles  for  improving  health  and  healthcare  by  leveraging 
HIT  through  financing  and  incentives,  targeting  both  physician  practices  and  re-
gional and community-based health information initiatives and organizations. 

The  Working  Group  and  eHealth  Initiative  Foundation  staff  conducted  a  wide 

range of activities to support this work, including the following: 

initiatives involving HIT that are operating today; 

• Reviewing  the  experiences  of  a  number  of  incentives  and  pay-for-performance 
• Reviewing the results of research and initiatives exploring the need for and re-
• Developing and vetting a set of principles and best practices for incentives with 

sults of incentives programs and pay-for-performance initiatives; and 

multiple stakeholders across the healthcare system. 

Results of Our Review 

The following summarizes the key findings that emerged from our work. 
• The  number  of  incentive  programs  for  quality  and  ‘‘pay-for-performance’’  is  on 
the rise. Over the last several months, the number of incentive and ‘‘pay-for-per-
formance’’  programs  has  significantly  increased,  fueled  by  the  recognition  that 
current reimbursement methods are not adequately addressing issues related to 
quality and safety and rising healthcare costs and signals that the U.S. Govern-
ment is experimenting with similar programs. 
• The value of information technology accrues to many stakeholders. The value of 
HIT  and  health  information  exchange  accrues  to  many  stakeholders  including 
clinicians, health plans, hospitals, purchasers, patients and public health. 
• Coordination and collaboration within the region or community is critical. Wide-
spread  adoption  of  HIT  across  physician  practices  may  not  be  possible  without 
broad-based community collaboration and coordination. Physician practices ordi-
narily  contract  with  a  large  number  of  purchasers  and  payers.  As  a  result,  in-
centives  offered  by  a  small  number  of  purchasers  or  payers  generally  are  not 
effective. In addition, most of the data required to deliver care within physician 
practices resides somewhere else (hospital, lab, pharmacy, health plan, etc.) and 
therefore  collaboration  and  coordination  are  necessary  to  facilitate  the  trans-
mission  of  data  to  the  point  of  care.  Coordination  and  collaboration  offer  many 
benefits,  including  providing  leverage  to  achieve  widespread  participation,  re-
ducing  the  potential  for  the  ‘‘free  rider’’  effect  (in  which  some  purchasers  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

107 

payers  reap  the  benefits  of  HIT  adoption  without  sharing  the  costs),  reducing 
the  burden  created  by  physician  practices  participating  in  multiple  reporting 
initiatives, and significantly reducing the per participant cost of both transmit-
ting  and  receiving  common  data  elements  for  various  healthcare  needs  (e.g., 
healthcare delivery, performance improvement, etc.). 
• Rewards should emphasize the use (not purchase) of HIT applications and even-
tually  focus  on  performance  or  outcomes.  Most  of  the  market  experiments  re-
viewed initially focused on rewarding the acquisition and use of HIT, sometimes 
in  combination  with  additional  incentives  for  performance.  In  some,  but  not  all 
cases, the reward for acquisition/use was designed to diminish or be eliminated 
over time, while incentives for performance (i.e., outcomes that are linked to in-
creased  HIT  use)  were  designed  to  ramp  up.  In  many  cases,  the  goal  appears 
to be to reward the innovators who adopt HIT fairly early, in hopes of creating 
a critical mass and reaching a ‘‘tipping point’’. 
• Incentive  amounts  offered  should  be  meaningful.  According  to  various  reports, 
incentives  offered  to  stimulate  adoption  and  use  among  practicing  clinicians 
should  be  meaningful.  Many  programs  have  lacked  widespread  participation 
due to the level of amounts offered. In one case (Integrated Healthcare Associa-
tion),  the  amount  of  incentive  funding  tied  to  HIT  was  doubled  (from  10  to  20 
percent  of  the  overall  package)  after  a  lukewarm  initial  response.  According  to 
the  recent  Connecting  for  Health  report  on  financing  and  sustainability,  such 
amounts should total anywhere from $10,000 to $24,000 per physician per year. 
• Purchaser  or  payer  sponsors  of  the  incentive  program  should  represent  a  mean-
ingful  proportion  of  the  clinician’s  patient  panel.  Because  practicing  clinicians 
often  work  with  a  large  number  of  health  plans  and  purchasers,  in  order  for 
incentives to be effective, they must be delivered by a meaningful proportion of 
the  clinician’s  patient  panel.  This  is  evidenced  in  a  number  of  current  market 
experiments.  To  address  this  issue,  a  significant  percentage  of  the  purchasers 
and  payers  in  a  market  should  be  recruited  to  the  incentive  program  to  have 
impact.  According  to  the  recommendations  of  the  National  Group  for  the  Ad-
vancement  of  Health  Information  Technology,  regional  and  community-based 
initiatives should use a combined 50 percent market share as a target. In addi-
tion,  the  National  Group  suggests  that  at  least  30  percent  (and  optimally  50 
percent)  of  a  clinician’s  patient  panel  should  be  covered  by  some  combination 
of participating patients and purchasers. 
• Giveaway  programs  have  had  little  impact.  Some  initiatives  reviewed  in  our 
work had experimented with giving away applications or hardware (e.g., PDAs, 
desktop computers) to physician practices, with little impact. Programs in which 
clinicians  have  had  to  invest  in  such  systems  have  demonstrated  greater  sus-
tainability. 
• Any  applications  covered  by  the  program  should  be  ‘‘interoperable’’  and  stand-
ards-based. In order to derive the full value of investments in HIT, payers and 
purchasers  should  only  reward  the  use  of  clinical  applications  that  are  inter-
operable,  using  agreed-upon  data  standards.  Over  time,  incentives  programs 
should  require  that  the  interoperability  of  such  applications  is  actually  lever-
aged—in other words, the transmission of certain data required for clinical care 
(e.g.,  lab,  pharmacy,  etc.)  to  the  HIT  application  to  support  the  use  of  such  in-
formation at the point of care should be required. 
• Certification  and  accreditation  can  offer  purchasers  and  payers  confidence.  As 
purchasers  and  payers  begin  to  adopt  incentive  and  pay-for-performance  pro-
grams,  they  will  likely  need  assurance  that  systems  adopted  by  physicians  are 
interoperable, functional, and utilized. Several groups have emerged to address 
these  various  certification  needs  including  the  National  Committee  for  Quality 
Assurance and the Certification Commission for HIT. 
• Policies  related  to  information  sharing  should  be  built  into  expectations.  As  in-
formation flow accelerates, it is necessary to establish ‘‘rules of the road’’ for in-
formation sharing. The adoption of agreed-upon principles related to the use, ac-
cess,  privacy  and  security  of  health  information  are  crucial  to  assuring  public 
trust  in  emerging  health  information  exchange  initiatives.  Connecting  for 
Health  is  spearheading  a  collaborative  approach  for  the  development  of  such 
principles with a delivery date of Fall 2005. 
• Emerging  health  information  exchange  initiatives,  networks  and  organizations 
should be leveraged to facilitate effective and efficient information sharing. Over 
the  last  year,  a  number  of  state,  regional  and  community-based  multi-stake-
holder  initiatives  have  emerged  to  begin  to  address  the  need  for  information 
mobility within markets across the country. These initiatives and the organiza-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

108 

tions  that  evolve  from  them  should  be  leveraged  to  facilitate  information  shar-
ing and the transmission of data to both physician practices and purchasers and 
payers  participating  in  incentive  programs  that  need  performance  data  to  sup-
port their requirements. The National Coordinator for HIT has referenced in its 
Strategic  Framework  for  Action  the  creation  of  organizations  that  would  con-
duct  such  activities,  calling  them  ‘‘Regional  Health  Information  Organizations’’ 
or ‘‘RHIOs’’. The eHealth Initiative Foundation is developing common principles 
(organizational,  legal,  financial  and  technical)  for  such  health  information  ex-
change  initiatives  and  organizations  through  its  Connecting  Communities  for 
Better  Health  Program,  to  provide  guidance  to  and  assure  public  trust  in  such 
organizations and initiatives as they develop across the United States. 

Bringing  it  All  Together:  A  Set  of  Principles  and  Framework  for 
Implementing Incentives for Higher Quality, More Efficient Healthcare 
Based  upon  the  work  conducted  to  date,  the  Working  Group  developed  a  set  of 
high-level principles for financing and incentives, and an incremental framework de-
signed to align incentives with purchaser and payer expectations around quality and 
efficiency as well as the HIT infrastructure—both within the physician practice and 
across  the  region  or  community  through  health  information  exchange—to  support 
those expectations. 
Principles for Implementing Incentives 

The  following  set  of  ‘‘Principles  for  Financing  and  Incentives’’  were  developed  by 

the Working Group: 

1.  Any  incentive  program  focused  on  quality  should  also  include  some  level  of 
incentive—either direct or indirect—for the health information technology (HIT) 
infrastructure required to support improvements in quality. 
2. Any financing or incentive program implemented by either the public or pri-
vate sector involving HIT should: 

healthcare. 

enable interoperability and connectivity. 

• Result  in  improvements  in  quality,  safety,  efficiency  or  effectiveness  in 
• Incentivize only those applications and systems that are standards-based to 
• Address  not  only  the  implementation  and  usage  of  HIT  applications  but 
also  the  transmission  of  data  to  the  point  of  care,  both  of  which  are  re-
quired to support high quality care delivery. 
• Allow  for  internal  quality  improvement  or  external  performance  reporting 

as mutually agreed upon by purchasers/payers and providers. 

3.  Financing  and  incentive  programs  should  seek  to  align  both  the  costs  and 
benefits related to HIT and health information exchange. 

An Incremental Framework for Aligning Incentives Around Quality and HIT 

Early  on  in  the  process,  participants  in  the  Working  Group  and  several  other 
stakeholders  involved  in  the  vetting  process,  recognized  the  importance  of  aligning 
incentives with not only quality and efficiency improvements in healthcare, but also 
the HIT infrastructure needed to support those improvements. 

Most incentive programs in place today use claims-based information and manual 
patient  record  abstraction  as  the  means  to  determine  the  quality  of  care  received 
by  patients.  There  are  well  researched  and  documented  shortcomings  to  the  use  of 
claims  data  to  determine  the  quality  of  care  delivered,  including  the  lack  of  timeli-
ness,  in  some  cases,  its  inaccuracy,  and  the  lack  of  its  ability  to  provide  important 
physiological data on patients that are the true markers of clinical outcomes. In ad-
dition, manual extraction of data from paper-based charts is time-consuming and ex-
pensive.  And,  according  to  some  reports,  charts  for  patients  cannot  always  be  lo-
cated. The use of clinical applications and health information exchange dramatically 
increase  the  accuracy,  timeliness,  and  availability  of  information  to  support  the  de-
termination of quality of care by purchasers and payers administering performance- 
based  incentive  programs.  The  development  of  this  infrastructure  also  builds  the 
foundation for an evolving set of expectations without building in additional report-
ing burden. 

Finally—and more importantly—the use of clinical applications and the mobiliza-
tion  of  patient  data  through  health  information  exchange  also  creates  the  founda-
tion and infrastructure for quality and safety improvement by supporting the provi-
sion  of  important  patient  information  at  the  point  of  care  and  enabling  clinicians 
to improve the quality and safety of care as it is being delivered to patients. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

109 

Markets across the country are in various stages of evolution in terms of perform-
ance expectations, HIT penetration, and cross-community collaboration. Recognizing 
these various stages of evolution, the Working Group developed a staged process de-
signed  to  support  a  wide  range  of  markets  as  they  transition  to  an  electronic  and 
more performance-based healthcare environment. 

The Framework that follows, entitled ‘‘Parallel Pathways for Quality Healthcare’’, 
provides  guidance  to  purchasers,  payers,  practicing  clinicians,  and  regional  or  com-
munity-based collaborations seeking to improve the quality, safety, effectiveness and 
efficiency of healthcare in their markets through the use of HIT and health informa-
tion exchange. 

The  Framework  provides  staged  guidance  in  four  focus  areas  related  to  aligning 
goals  for  quality  healthcare:  (1)  quality  capabilities;  (2)  HIT  capabilities  within  the 
physician practice; (3) health information exchange capabilities; and (4) financial in-
centives. 

The following summarizes at a high-level the three phases of evolution: 
• In  Phase  I,  rewards  would  primarily  focus  both  on  the  reporting  of  measures 
that  rely  on  manual  chart  abstraction  and  claims  data  and  physician  usage  of 
standards-based, 
basic 
functionalities. 

interoperable  HIT 

applications  with 

• In Phase II, rewards would focus on the reporting of measures that rely on clin-
ical  data  sources;  connectivity  of  standards-based,  interoperable  HIT  applica-
tions  to  clinical  data  sources  to  support  information  needs  at  the  point  of  care; 
and physician usage of HIT with more advanced functionalities. 

• In Phase III, rewards would focus on performance against process and outcomes 

certain 

measures, while phasing out rewards for HIT. 

Ongoing  (ex-post)  incentives  that  can  be  utilized  for  financial  incentives  include 

the following: 

• Bonus  or  ‘‘add-on’’  payments—an  addition  to  the  normal  payment—for  HIT  in 

accordance with the criteria included in the Framework. 

• A  portion  of  the  pay-for-performance  incentive  is  directed  to  HIT  adoption— 
higher in the early years, lower (and eventually phased out) in the later years. 

• Payment for structured e-mail consultations or other telehealth services. 
• Chronic care management fees. 
Upfront  (ex-ante)  incentives  that  can  be  utilized  to  defray  some  of  the  up-front 
infrastructure  costs  associated  with  the  initial  adoption  of  standards-based,  inter-
operable HIT, include the following: 

• Seed funding provided by governmental, philanthropic or private sector contrib-

utors. 

• Advance  payment  of  future  services  from  health  information  exchange  initia-

tives or clearly articulated expectations and commitments from clinicians. 

• Low cost or guaranteed loans. 
• Tax incentives. 
It  is  expected  that  value  will  continue  to  increase  through  each  stage  to  pur-

chasers and payers who engage in the implementation of the Framework. 

• In  the  first  phase,  the  staged  Framework  will  enable  purchasers  and  payers  to 
clearly  articulate  and  communicate  a  common  set  of  expectations  through  a 
staged process. The Framework provides clinicians with the tools needed to im-
prove performance in the early years and that ultimately results in payment for 
outcomes.  Immediate  gains  in  quality  and  safety  will  be  achieved,  as  docu-
mented by several market experiments. 
• In  the  second  phase,  the  efficiency,  timeliness,  and  accuracy  of  reporting  will 
significantly improve with the reduction in the use of manually extracted chart 
information and claims data in the calculation of measures and the increase in 
the  use  of  clinical  data  derived  from  electronic  sources.  The  type  and  number 
of measures required can be increased based on the more robust HIT infrastruc-
ture.  Increased  gains  in  quality,  safety  and  efficiency  should  be  achieved  given 
the information available to the clinician at the point of care. 
• In the third phase, purchasers and payers can phaseout HIT rewards and move 
to  payment  based  on  outcomes  and  performance.  A  robust  and  flexible  HIT  in-
frastructure  will  be  in  place  to  support  evolving  science  and  changing  expecta-
tions of purchasers, payers, providers, and consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

110 

A detailed overview of the Framework is outlined below. 

Area of Focus 

Phase I 

Phase II 

Phase III 

Quality 

Capabilities 

1. Create an environ-
ment that supports 
improvements quality 
and safety. 

2. Agree on and report 
common set of stand-
ardized measures to 
be reported over the 
three phases based on 
the National Quality 
Forum set. 

3. Leverage claims data 
and manual chart ab-
straction. 

Physician 

Practice HIT 
Capabilities 

1. Direct usage of HIT 

by physicians with 
certain basic 
functionalities. 

Health 

Information 
Exchange 
Capabilities 

1. Engage practicing cli-
nicians, hospitals and 
other providers, pur-
chasers, payers and 
consumers in health 
information exchange 
initiative. 

2. Launch health infor-
mation exchange ca-
pability using agreed 
upon technical and in-
formation sharing 
standards. 

3. Develop sustainable 

model based on 
agreed-upon services. 

Financial 

Incentives 

1. Reward use of stand-

ards-based HIT. 

2. Reward reporting of 

subset of measures 
based on data pri-
marily derived from 
manual chart abstrac-
tion and claims. 

1. Communicate com-
mon set of expecta-
tions and incremental 
roadmap for getting 
to outcomes. 

Value to 

Purchasers 
and Payers 

1. Expand capabilities 
to utilize clinical in-
formation. 

1. Report achievement 
of certain outcomes 
and processes. 

2. Report measures that 

leverage expanded 
clinical data capabili-
ties. 

1. Direct usage of HIT 

with expanded 
functionalities. 

2. Secure standards- 

based connectivity be-
tween HIT and clin-
ical data sources for 
lab, prescription and 
demographic data 
(health information 
exchange). 

1. Robust IT-supported 
clinical environment 
supporting chronic 
care management. 
2. Electronic health 

record with inte-
grated decision sup-
port and ability to ac-
cept and integrate 
structured, comput-
able data from other 
organizations. 

1. Expand services to 

provide value to users 
as appropriate. 

1. Operate secure 

health information 
exchange, making 
available to all au-
thorized healthcare 
organizations who 
agree to terms for in-
formation sharing. 
2. Send standardized 

data to physician 
practices. 

3. Send reports of qual-
ity measures to pur-
chasers and payers 
with provider consent. 

1. Reward use of inter-

1. Reward electronic 

operable HIT with 
connectivity with clin-
ical data sources. 

2. Reward reporting of 
expanded set of per-
formance measures 
that require clinical 
data sources. 

documentation of im-
proved clinical out-
comes. 

2. Phase out rewards 

for HIT. 

1. Enhanced efficiency, 
timeliness and accu-
racy of reporting. 

1. Full migration to 
payment based on 
outcomes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

111 

Area of Focus 

Phase I 

Phase II 

Phase III 

2. Achieve immediate 

gains in quality. 

2. Improved ability to 
target areas in need 
of focus. 

3. Significant improve-

ments in quality, 
safety and efficiency 

2. Flexible HIT infra-

structure to support 
changing expecta-
tions. 

Stepping Through the Process 

The  following  summarizes  in  detail,  the  staged  approach  for  aligning  incentives 
with  quality  and  efficiency  goals,  as  well  as  the  HIT  and  health  information  ex-
change capabilities needed to support these goals. As noted above, this incremental, 
staged  approach  recognizes  the  various  stages  of  evolution  within  each  market  in-
cluding  the  history  of  regional  collaboration,  focus  on  quality  and  performance  and 
HIT  penetration.  The  phased  approach  allows  for  multiple  natural  experiments  to 
occur throughout the country, to determine the best course of action, based on their 
current stage of evolution. 
Phase I of the Framework 
1. Quality Capabilities 

Phase I of the framework begins to create an environment that supports improve-
ments  in  quality  and  safety.  The  intent  of  the  Working  Group  is  not  to  create  new 
measures  of  quality  healthcare,  but  to  align  with  a  common  set  of  consensus-based 
standardized  measures  developed  by  others  (e.g.,  the  National  Quality  Forum).  The 
quality expectation in this phase is that providers will electronically report a subset 
of this adopted full set of quality and efficiency measures. The principle is that pro-
viders  are  not  being  paid  or  rewarded  for  implementing  HIT  systems  in  their  prac-
tices,  but  they  are  given  incentive  to  do  so  because  the  only  cost-effective  method 
to  electronically  produce  these  clinically-oriented  quality  data  in  the  long-run  is  to 
implement such systems. As providers become more capable of collecting and trans-
mitting  this  data  electronically,  the  expectation  is  that  they  will  report  the  full  set 
of quality measures adopted at this stage to receive the full range of incentives. 
2. Physician Practice HIT Capabilities 

In  the  first  phase,  physicians  are  expected  to  directly  interact  with  standards- 
based HIT systems. These may be self-contained EHR systems, prescription writers, 
and other forms of electronic recordkeeping and healthcare process support systems. 
At  this  stage,  the  ability  of  practices  to  purchase,  install,  train,  and  use  HIT  sys-
tems is very much dependent on a means of justifying a relative large outlay of time 
and  money.  Short  term  incentives  can  take  many  forms,  but  must  help  to  address 
the bolus of resources required to get set up and started. 
3. Health Information Exchange Capabilities 

In  the  first  phase,  diverse  stakeholders  within  the  region  or  community  will  be 
engaged  to  define  common  principles  and  priorities  for  working  together.  Organiza-
tional  and  legal  infrastructures  as  appropriate,  will  be  developed  and  information 
sharing  policies  will  be  determined,  based  on  emerging  national  standards.  Tech-
nical  models  for  health  information  exchange  will  also  be  launched  based  on  na-
tional standards. A sustainable model for the financial and functional health of the 
health  information  exchange  capabilities  will  be  developed  and  agreed  upon  by 
stakeholders. 
4. Financial Incentives 

In  the  first  phase,  providers  will  be  rewarded  for  the  use  of  HIT  to  electronically 
report  a  subset  of  quality  measures  (pay  for  quality  data).  Although  ‘‘start-up’’  in-
centives  can  take  many  forms,  it  is  appropriate,  whether  they  take  the  form  of  up- 
front  funding  or  back-end  payment,  to  base  the  reward  on  a  common  set  of  criteria 
that will focus the providers’ efforts in the direction of future stages of development. 
One  way  to  do  this  is  to  tie  the  rewards  to  the  electronic  reporting  of  a  subset  of 
predetermined  data  elements  which  are  thought  to  be  tied  to  the  quality  of  care. 
Although  at  this  stage  the  reward  is  not  dependent  on  the  data  showing  that  the 
quality of care has been improved, it sets the stage for later phases that do so. 
5. Value to Purchasers and Payers 

In  the  first  phase,  purchasers  and  payers  will  be  able  to  communicate  a  common 
set  of  expectations  that  build  over  time  and  establish  an  incremental  roadmap  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

112 

getting  to  payment  for  higher  quality  outcomes.  They  will  achieve  immediate  gains 
in  the  quality  of  healthcare  delivered  and  some  cost  savings,  depending  on  the  ex-
tent  to  which  HIT  resources  are  implemented  and  used  at  this  stage,  while  laying 
the  foundation  for  a  robust  infrastructure  to  support  higher  quality,  more  efficient 
healthcare. 
Phase II of the Framework 
1. Quality Capabilities 

In the second phase, providers are expected to report measures that leverage their 
expanded clinical data capabilities to document improved processes of care. Reports 
of clinical lab results that indicate that the percentage of diabetic patients in a prac-
tice  that  has  reached  a  predetermined  level  of  receiving  a  periodic  Hemoglobin  A1c 
test, is an example of the performance improvements that can be documented. 
2. Physician Practice HIT Capabilities 

Advancement  to  the  second  phase  of  HIT  capabilities  requires  secure  HIT 
connectivity  with  clinical  data  sources  such  as  those  associated  with  lab  and  pre-
scription data. Capabilities must include secure communications with more than one 
other  organization  using  national  standards  (labs,  pharmacies,  hospitals,  etc.). 
These capabilities not only support the needs of purchasers and payers that provide 
incentives, but also the information needs of clinicians at the point of care. 
3. Health Information Exchange Capabilities 

In the second phase, a fully operational, secure health information exchange capa-
bility  is  made  available  to  all  authorized  healthcare  organizations  who  agree  to 
terms of health information sharing. Sending standardized data to physicians (from 
data  sources  such  as  labs,  pharmacies,  and  hospitals)  becomes  much  easier  to  ac-
complish.  Sending  reports  of  quality  measures  electronically  to  purchasers  (with 
provider consent under contract) can be done routinely. 
4. Financial Incentives 

In  the  second  phase,  providers  who 

interoperable  HIT  with 
connectivity  and  electronic  reporting  of  a  full  set  of  measures,  including  those  that 
leverage clinical data source, are rewarded. 
5. Value to Purchasers and Payers 

implement 

In the second phase, reporting to purchasers and payers is more accurate, efficient 
and  timely.  The  ability  of  the  data  reporting  to  target  areas  in  need  of  focus  is  im-
proved. Increases in the types and level of data to support improvements should re-
sult in considerable improvements in quality, safety and efficiency. 
Phase III of the Framework 
1. Quality Capabilities 

In the third phase, providers are required to achieve certain process measures and 
outcomes  to  receive  rewards.  Having  built  the  health  information  infrastructure 
with  incentive  support  in  Phases  I  and  II,  the  provider  has  many  of  the  tools  nec-
essary to support a transformed care delivery process. 
2. Physician Practice HIT Capabilities 

Movement to the third phase requires a robust IT-supported clinical environment 
that supports clinical decision support and chronic care management. The provider’s 
electronic  health  record  must  integrate  decision  support  and  have  the  ability  to  ac-
cept  and  integrate  structured,  computable  data  from  other  organizations.  It  should 
be noted that Phase III provides the opportunity to remove the artificial barrier be-
tween clinical systems and administrative (billing) systems. 
3. Health Information Exchange Capabilities 

In the third phase, health information exchange initiatives and organizations can 
expand services to support physician adoption of HIT and quality improvement. Ex-
amples include the provision of electronic access to evidence-based, national clinical 
decision support rules (for integration with computer-aided decision support systems 
in EHRs). 
4. Financial Incentives 

In the third phase, providers are rewarded for the electronic documentation of im-
proved  clinical  outcomes  as  well  as  progress  against  process  measures.  Purchasers 
and  payers  begin  to  phase  out  rewards  for  HIT  given  that  most  of  the  HIT  infra-
structure  has  already  been  developed  and  that  getting  to  this  phase  requires  pro-
viders to effectively utilize interoperable, connected, clinical applications. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

113 

5. Value to Purchasers and Payers 

The third phase enables full migration to payment based on outcomes. It also en-
ables a flexible HIT infrastructure to support changing expectations (different or ex-
panded  measures).  It  should  be  noted  that  the  infrastructure  required  in  the  third 
phase  has  the  opportunity  of  enabling  payers  to  move  ‘‘coding’’  for  reimbursement 
into  their  adjudication  processes  through  automation  based  on  actual  clinical  docu-
mentation. Re-engineering of reimbursement systems could result. 
Summary 

Creating  pay-for-performance  and  other  incentive  programs  in  the  marketplace 
that are not consistent with the principles in this document can have negative con-
sequences. Without common, agreed upon pathways for moving forward, the transi-
tion of physician practices toward electronic systems along with increasing perform-
ance  expectations  will  be  confusing,  difficult  and  costly.  Providing  a  process  that 
clearly  communicates  purchaser  and  payer  expectations  over  time  using  a  staged 
approach  will  help  clinicians  anticipate,  prepare  and  build  the  infrastructure  re-
quired to achieve those expectations over time. 

Providing  incentives  for  quality  and  efficiency  without  at  the  same  time,  sup-
porting  the  development  of  the  HIT  within  physician  practices  and  health  informa-
tion  exchange  capabilities  within  regions  and  communities  to  support  improvement 
will  result  in  the  creation  of  siloed  systems  that  might  be  quite  effective  in  pro-
ducing performance reports, but are not conducive to providing information back to 
providers where it is needed most—at the point of care. In addition, providing incen-
tives  for  HIT  alone,  without  connectivity  expectations,  has  the  potential  of  simply 
automating the highly fragmented, paper-based, ineffective system that exists today, 
wasting limited resources. 

It should also be noted that the HIT and health information exchange capabilities 
described in the Framework are suitable for many needs, including those related to 
population and public health, provision of patient-centric health information to con-
sumers, clinical research, performance reporting, and most importantly—delivery of 
healthcare. All stakeholders within healthcare should strive to move toward a com-
mon  system—decentralized  but  based  on  national  standards  and  policies—to  sup-
port our Nation’s health and healthcare needs. 
Next Steps: Where Do We Go From Here? 

The  eHealth  Initiative  and  its  Foundation  intend  to  expand  upon  and  accelerate 
the  adoption  of  the  principles  and  Framework  developed  by  the  Working  Group 
through a wide range of activities in 2005 and 2006. 

1.  We  will  further  develop  the  principles  and  policies  contained  in  the  Frame-
work. This work will be conducted through eHealth Initiative Foundation’s var-
ious  stakeholder-focused  working  groups,  including  the  Working  Group  for 
Small  Practices,  the  Employer  Purchaser  Advisory  Board,  and  the  Working 
Group  for  Connecting  Communities  (which  is  made  up  of  state,  regional  and 
community-based health information exchange initiatives and organizations). In 
addition,  a  health  plan-focused  group  will  be  organized  to  facilitate  significant 
input  from  and  collaboration  with  payers  in  the  enhancement  of  the  Frame-
work. 
2. We will translate the principles and policies contained in the Framework into 
practical  ‘‘how  to’’  guides,  detailed  policies,  and  tools  that  will  support  under-
standing  and  implementation  by  healthcare  purchasers,  business  coalitions, 
health  plans,  practicing  clinicians,  and  health  information  initiatives/organiza-
tions  in  markets  across  the  United  States.  One  of  the  tools  that  will  emerge 
from this work will include detailed technical specifications (using nationally ac-
cepted data standards) for ambulatory performance measures that are emerging 
from the National Quality Forum’s consensus process. We will also develop var-
ious tool-kits and guides to support the implementation of those measures both 
within  physician  offices  and  by  health  information  exchange  initiatives.  The 
guides  and  tools  developed  will  leverage  the  work  of  Federal  agency-commis-
sioned  projects  related  to  standards,  the  work  of  Connecting  for  Health  and 
other  national  standard-setting  initiatives  both  within  the  public  and  private 
sectors  and  be  supported  by  eHealth  Initiative  Foundation’s  various  stake-
holder-focused  working  groups,  including  the  Working  Group  for  Small  Prac-
tices, the Employer Purchaser Advisory Board, and the Working Group for Con-
necting Communities. 
3.  We  will  support  implementation  through  both  funding  and  providing  tech-
nical assistance to a set of pilot projects or ‘‘market experiments’’ that test and 
evaluate  various  components  of  the  Framework.  These  same  pilot  projects  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

114 

also  implement  and  evaluate  the  technical  and  information  sharing  policy 
deliverables  that  emerge  from  Connecting  for  Health.  This  work  will  be  con-
ducted through the eHealth Initiative Foundation’s Connecting Communities for 
Better  Health  Program.  The  challenge  award  process  will  be  announced  this 
summer. 
4.  We  will  conduct  working  meetings  and  symposia  designed  to  facilitate  dia-
logue and learning among healthcare stakeholders that are experimenting with 
incentives  around  quality  and  HIT  in  their  markets  to  further  inform  and  en-
hance  the  Framework,  through  the  Working  Group  for  Financing  and  Incen-
tives. 
5.  We  will  utilize  the  policies  and  principles  contained  within  the  Framework 
to  inform  emerging  policy  vehicles  at  the  Federal  and  State  levels,  through 
eHealth  Initiative’s  Policy  Working  Group.  It  is  anticipated  that  a  number  of 
policy  vehicles  will  emerge  during  2005.  We  will  work  to  educate  policymakers 
on the principles and components of the Framework to assure that goals around 
HIT and quality/safety are integrated. 
6. We will utilize the insights gained from each of the above-identified activities 
to  enhance  the  Framework  through  the  Working  Group  for  Financing  and  In-
centives.  The  Working  Group  will  continue  to  serve  as  the  ‘‘hub’’  for  this  work, 
synthesizing  the  input  and  learning  derived  from  each  of  the  above-identified 
activities, to continually enhance the Framework and principles. 
7. We will widely disseminate the Framework, through a wide range of vehicles 
including  eHealth  Initiative’s  diverse  and  influential  membership,  AHRQ’s  Na-
tional Resource Center for Health Information Technology, targeted outreach to 
key  groups  and  associations,  eHealth  Initiative’s  Connecting  Communities  for 
Better Health Program conducted in cooperation with DHHS; our State and Re-
gional  HIT  Policy  Summit  Initiative;  targeted  outreach  to  policymakers  at  the 
Federal and state levels, and general public relations activities. 

Conclusion 

We  are  at  a  unique  point  in  time,  where  public  and  private  sector  interests  are 
at an all-time high in two key areas: improving the quality and safety of healthcare 
and moving forward on a health information technology agenda. Approaching these 
two  key  issue  areas  in  a  siloed  manner—without  strong  integration  across  both 
areas—will  result  in  missed  opportunities,  unintended  consequences,  and  possibly 
reduced  impact  in  both  areas.  By  laying  out  an  integrated,  incremental  strategy, 
which  incorporates  goals  related  to  quality,  safety,  and  efficiency  as  well  as  health 
information  technology  and  the  mobilization  of  data  across  organizations,  the  prin-
ciples  and  Framework  included  in  this  document  offer  the  foundation  for  building 
a healthcare system that is safer, of higher quality, and more effective and efficient. 
In addition to offering guidance to stakeholders involved in these two areas of inter-
est, it also develops a framework for dialogue regarding how incentive programs can 
be designed for integration. 

Over  the  coming  months,  the  eHealth  Initiative  and  its  Foundation  will  work 
closely with all key stakeholders—including practicing clinicians, purchasers, health 
plans,  hospitals,  healthcare  IT  suppliers,  consumer  groups,  policymakers  at  the  na-
tional  and  state  level,  and  other  key  constituencies,  as  well  as  other  non-profit  and 
government  groups  focusing  in  this  area—to  further  develop  the  Framework  and 
principles,  test  their  effectiveness  in  markets  across  the  United  States,  and  widely 
disseminate their results to build awareness and support implementation. 

AMERICAN OSTEOPATHIC ASSOCIATION 

Washington, DC, June 27, 2005 

Hon. JOHN ENSIGN, 
Chairman, 
Senate Subcommittee on Technology, Innovation, and Competitiveness, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Ensign: 

As President of the American Osteopathic Association (AOA), I want to thank you 
for conducting a hearing to explore the value of health information technology (HIT) 
in  improving  the  safety,  quality,  and  efficiency  of  the  health  care  delivery  system. 
The AOA, which represents the Nation’s 54,000 osteopathic physicians practicing in 
23  specialties  and  subspecialties,  extends  its  sincere  gratitude  to  you  for  your  lead-
ership on this important issue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

115 

Osteopathic physicians provide care to millions of patients each year. Care ranges 
from  basic  office  visits  to  complex  procedures.  As  an  organization  and  individual 
physicians,  we  continually  strive  to  improve  the  safety,  quality,  and  efficiency  of 
care  provided.  HIT  has  the  potential,  if  developed  and  implemented  with  the  pa-
tient-physician relationship as a core component, to be an invaluable tool in a physi-
cian’s  arsenal  of  care.  The  AOA  remains  committed  to  advancing  the  development 
of HIT. 

In  December  2003,  President  Bush  signed  the  ‘‘Medicare  Prescription  Drug,  Im-
provement, and Modernization Act of 2003’’ (MMA) (Pub. L. 108–173) into law. The 
Act, which contained electronic prescribing (e-Rx) provisions, served as a catalyst for 
efforts  to  develop  and  utilize  technologies  to  improve  the  delivery  of  health  care. 
Since  enactment  of  Pub.  L.  108–173,  rapid  development  and  adoption  of  HIT  has 
been  advanced  through  Congressional  activities  such  as  hearings  and  the  introduc-
tion  of  legislation,  the  creation  of  the  Office  of  the  National  Coordinator  for  Health 
Information Technology (ONCHIT), and other regulatory activities. Additionally, the 
private  sector  and  physician  organizations  have  undertaken  activities  aimed  at  fos-
tering the development and implementation of HIT. It is paramount that all stake-
holders remain involved in the dialogue. 

There are numerous parties driving the development of HIT. Overall success will 
be  contingent  upon  the  interoperability  and  functionality  of  systems  put  in  place. 
Efforts  must  be  advanced  to  ensure  that  software  and  hardware  used  throughout 
the healthcare system are interoperable. There is no benefit to be found in the utili-
zation of systems unable to communicate with others. Systems developed and imple-
mented  must  not  compromise  the  essential  patient-physician  relationship.  Medical 
decisions must remain in the hands of physicians and their patients. 

The  AOA  appreciates  the  potential  benefits  provided  by  the  adoption  of  HIT.  We 
remain committed to advancing the utilization of technology in the practice of medi-
cine. However, we urge a moderated approach to ensure measures do not create un-
intended  consequences.  There  are  various  issues  that  must  be  addressed  to  allow 
for  the  successful  adoption  of  HIT.  To  this  end,  existing  Federal  regulations  and 
laws should be reviewed to ensure they do not serve as impediments to the adoption 
and  utilization  of  technology  in  the  healthcare  delivery  system.  In  addition,  atten-
tion  must  be  paid  to  costs  associated  with  acquiring  and  maintaining  HIT.  These 
concerns are compounded in small practices and rural and underserved areas where 
physicians  are  unable  to  benefit  from  economies  of  scale  and  infrastructure  may 
present  additional  hurdles.  Furthermore,  patient  confidentiality  must  be  protected 
at  all  levels.  If  done  with  careful  deliberation  and  consideration  for  the  various 
issues that arise with creation of standards and implementation, HIT has the poten-
tial  to  be  a  driving  force  in  enhancing  the  safety,  quality,  and  efficiency  of  the 
healthcare delivery system. 

The AOA will continue to work with Congress, regulatory bodies, and other inter-
ested parties to ensure patients continue to benefit from the development and imple-
mentation of HIT systems. On behalf of my fellow osteopathic physicians, thank you 
for  conducting  this  important  hearing.  The  AOA  applauds  your  commitment  to  ad-
vancing  the  utilization  of  health  information  technology.  Please  do  not  hesitate  to 
call  upon  the  AOA  or  our  members  for  assistance  on  this  and  other  health  care 
issues. 

Sincerely, 

GEORGE THOMAS, D.O., 

President. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE INSTITUTE OF ELECTRICAL AND ELECTRONICS 

ENGINEERS—UNITED STATES OF AMERICA (IEEE–USA) 

IEEE–USA  and  its  Medical  Technology  Policy  Committee  commends  the  Sub-
committee on Technology, Innovation, and Competitiveness for examining how infor-
mation  technology  can  be  applied  in  the  medical  industry  to  reduce  medical  errors, 
lower  healthcare  costs  and  improve  the  quality  of  patient  care.  We  are  pleased  to 
offer the following statement for the June 30 hearing record. 

IEEE–USA  supports  the  advancement  of  eHealth  and  its  potential  of  providing 
improved information flows. We believe that promoting the common use of informa-
tion  technologies  across  the  Nation  to  reduce  medical  errors  and  delineate  quality 
metrics  of  health  information,  combined  with  interoperability  and  standards  adop-
tion,  can  lower  costs  and  improve  outcomes.  In  addition,  national  health  threats— 
such  as  biological,  chemical  and  nuclear  terrorist  attacks—require  uses  of  these 
technologies for purposes of detection planning, preparedness and response. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

116 

eHealth  needs  to  be  approached  recognizing  the  needs  of  patients  and  imple-
mented with consumer approaches that have been successful in other economic sec-
tors. These approaches range from language usability to rating systems that will aid 
purchasers  in  the  determination  of  quality.  We  support  implementation  of  tech-
nology  to  promote  patient  health,  but  understand  that  without  clear  guidelines, 
standards  and  the  removal  of  barriers  such  as  syntactic  and  semantic  interoper-
ability  and  privacy,  security  and  confidentiality  concerns,  the  goal  will  remain  elu-
sive. 

Major  goals  for  improving  the  health  care  system  in  the  U.S.  are  improving  pa-
tient safety including reducing errors; improving the interoperability of health infor-
mation  systems;  and  improving  the  capability  for  exchanging  patient  information 
while increasing the effectiveness and containing costs. Federal reimbursement poli-
cies  need  to  reflect  the  contributions  of  information  technologies  for  improving  the 
quality of the healthcare system. 

The  balance  of  this  statement  offers  our  recommendations  on  three  related  sub-
jects:  how  to  build  the  National  Health  Information  Network  with  an  appropriate 
emphasis  on  security  and  privacy,  the  use  of  voluntary  health  care  identifiers,  and 
appropriate roles for government in promoting the development of home healthcare 
technologies. 
Building the National Health Information Network 

IEEE–USA  advocates  transitioning  from  our  current  state  of  disconnected  health 
information  systems  to  a  National  Health  Information  Network  (NHIN)  that  would 
make  use  of  leading-edge  networking  technologies,  such  as  web  services,  mobile 
communications,  and  multimedia  communications  to  provide  secure  and  reliable 
transport  of  healthcare  information.  To  that  end,  IEEE–USA  makes  the  following 
recommendations  to  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  the  Office  of 
the  National  Coordinator  for  Health  Information  Technology,  legislators,  adminis-
trators and healthcare regulators: 

1. Transition to the desired National Health Information Network should be ac-
complished  by  building  upon  existing  systems  by  increasing  the  reliability, 
availability  and  security  of  these  networks.  To  the  extent  feasible,  the  NHIN 
should support appropriate authorization for access to the distributed nature of 
health  information  where  it  currently  resides.  It  should  not  rely  upon  devel-
oping  and  maintaining  new,  government-controlled,  centralized  databases  or 
personal health information repositories. 
2.  Economic  policies  covering  provider  expense  for  transition  to  the  National 
Health Information Network and adopting an electronic health record should be 
favorably designed to facilitate provider conversion. 
3.  Development  of  the  National  Health  Information  Network  should  not  com-
promise  the  security  and  privacy  of  personally-identifiable  health  information, 
as currently defined in the HIPAA Privacy and Security Final Rules. 
4. Use of the National Health Information Network should adhere to the guide-
lines  on  use  of  genetic  information  cited  in  IEEE–USA’s  position  statement  on 
‘‘Non-discrimination  in  Employment  Based  on  Genetic  and  Other  Health  Infor-
mation,’’ August 2002. 
5.  The  National  Health  Information  Network  should  implement  the  capability 
to provide public warnings about bio-terrorism, epidemic disease, safety and ef-
ficacy of vaccines, etc. 
6.  The  National  Health  Information  Network  should  encourage  patient  access 
to  medical  records  and  establish  ‘‘cradle  to  grave’’  longitudinal  medical  records. 
7.  The  standard  of  such  ‘‘cradle  to  grave’’  records  should  not  be  restricted  to 
data  pertinent  to  acute  care  settings,  and  should  include  key  data  fields  from 
long-term care’s minimum data set to make such records useful throughout the 
different care settings, including long-term care. 
8.  The  National  Health  Information  Network  should  develop  and  implement 
metrics  to  document  the  costs,  benefits  and  unintended  favorable  and  adverse 
impacts of sharing healthcare information and electronic health records. 
9.  The  NHIN  should  support  Federal  and  state  government  public  health  sur-
veillance  activities—relative  to  reportable  diseases,  health  conditions,  injuries 
and  risk  factors.  It  should  enable  these  respective  public  health  authorities  to 
secure  necessary  statistical  data  by  providing  a  direct  means  by  which  they 
could  trace  the  reports  back  to  individual  health  providers,  and  an  indirect 
means by which individual patients could be contacted, if needed, for epidemio-
logic investigation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

117 

10.  The  National  Health  Information  Network  should  be  supportive  of  quality 
control  efforts  at  institutional,  state  and  national  levels  by  having  a  means  by 
which  quality  control  staff  at  all  three  levels  can  obtain  appropriate  authoriza-
tion  to  access  current  statistical  data  for  comparison  with  like  facilities,  base-
lines and benchmarks. 
11. The NHIN should have a provision so that appropriately authorized persons 
in  academic  and  governmental  settings  can  access  detailed  statistical  data  for 
research purposes. 
12. The NHIN should support individually-specifiable privacy preferences for all 
healthcare  consumers.  It  should  include  provisions  so  that  patients  could  indi-
cate  their  willingness  or  unwillingness  to  be  solicited  as  subjects  of  medical  re-
search  by  authorized  investigators  from  academic  and  governmental  agencies. 
Development  of  a  National  Health  Information  Network  would  require  a  joint  ef-
fort by Federal, state and local governments and the private sector. Working jointly 
would  increase  interoperability,  reduce  risk,  and  ensure  that  a  competitive  market 
existed for products intended for producing healthcare services in a networked envi-
ronment.  However,  creating  a  NHIN  also  creates  new  requirements  for  reliability, 
availability and maintaining healthcare information privacy and security. 

For  additional  information,  see  IEEE–USA’s  position  statement  on  the  National 
Health  Information  Network,  with  emphasis  on  Security  and  Privacy  Issues  at: 
http://www.ieeeusa.org/policy/positions/NHIN.asp. 
Use of Voluntary Healthcare Identifiers 

IEEE–USA  believes  that  the  use  of  voluntary  healthcare  identifiers  can  signifi-
cantly  enhance  healthcare  efficiency  and  patient  safety.  Consistent  with  the  frame-
work  of  the  HIPAA  legislation,  IEEE–USA  recommends  that  legislators  and  regu-
lators  develop  and  implement  policies  to  create  a  Voluntary  Healthcare  Identifier 
Program and establish demonstration projects to document these benefits. 

Policies needed to facilitate adoption include: 
• Congressional  authority  and  resources  for  the  Department  of  Health  and 
Human  Services  and  the  National  Committee  on  Health  and  Vital  Statistics  to 
develop and maintain a Voluntary Healthcare Identifier System; 

• Strong penalties, including monetary, civil and criminal for privacy and security 

abuses; 

• Safeguards against current or future unintended use of the information; and 
• Incentives  for  healthcare  stakeholders  to  encourage  adoption  of  Voluntary 

Healthcare Identifiers. 

For  additional  information,  see  IEEE-USA’s  position  statement  on  the  Voluntary 
http://www.ieeeusa.org/policy/positions/healthcare 

Healthcare 
identifier.html. 
Promoting Development of Home Healthcare Technologies 

Identifier 

at: 

IEEE–USA  urges  Congress  and  policymakers,  in  both  the  public  and  the  private 
sector, to take the actions needed to expand uses for electronic devices, assistive and 
monitoring software, and home health communication technologies to provide home 
health  care  to  those  in  need.  Further,  we  support  developing  guidelines  for  reim-
bursement of these technologies—both for developers and users. 

IEEE–USA believes that using electronic technologies to assist and monitor elder-
ly,  disabled,  and  chronically  ill  individuals  in  the  home  can  improve  quality  of  life, 
improve health outcomes, and help control health care costs. 

Accordingly, IEEE–USA supports: 
• Public  and  private  sector  research  on  the  effectiveness,  cost-efficiency,  and  po-
tential  return  on  investment  for  each  class  of  home  care  technology;  and  re-
search on how such technological innovations can best be integrated into a com-
prehensive package for home health care. 

• Tax incentives to stimulate research, development and deployment of home care 

technologies. 

• U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services’  Centers  for  Medicare  and 
Medicaid  Services  action  to  streamline  and  expedite  exemption,  clearance  and 
approval  processes  for  home  care  technologies.  Reimbursement  should  not  be 
limited to U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved devices. 

• Medicare  and  other  health  insurance  carrier  action  to  provide  reimbursement 
for  home  care  technologies  that  meet  specified  qualifications  (see  Background). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

118 

information,  see  IEEE–USA’s  position  statement  on  home 
http://www.ieeeusa.org/policy/positions/health 

technologies 

at: 

For  additional 

healthcare 
technologies.asp. 
Conclusion 

IEEE–USA strongly believes that implementation of information technologies into 
the national healthcare infrastructure will advance clinical care, drive economic effi-
ciencies,  facilitate  the  linkage  of  fragmented  systems  and  provide  consumers  access 
to  information  by  which  they  can  better  understand  and  address  their  own 
healthcare needs. 

Policy barriers, implementation impediments and funding limitations have slowed 
or  limited  adoption  by  healthcare  stakeholders  of  complex  information  databases, 
electronic  medical  records  and  advanced  communication  technologies.  At  times  the 
barriers have seemed impenetrable, but with the current attention of Congress, the 
White  House,  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  regulators  and  pri-
vate industry, we are hopeful progress can be made. 

IEEE–USA  is  an  organizational  unit  of  the  IEEE.  It  was  created  in  1973  to  ad-
vance  the  public  good  and  promote  the  careers  and  public  policy  interests  of  the 
more than 220,000 technology professionals who are U.S. members of the IEEE. The 
IEEE  is  the  world’s  largest  technical  professional  society.  For  more  information,  go 
to http://www.ieeeusa.org. 

Waltham, MA, July 7, 2005 

CRF, INC. 

Hon. JOHN ENSIGN, 
Chairman, 
Senate Subcommittee on Technology, Innovation, and Competitiveness, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC. 
Senator Ensign, 

I  am  writing  regarding  the  Commerce  Committee’s  Subcommittee  on  Technology, 
Innovation,  and  Competitiveness  recent  hearing  on  ‘‘eHealth  Initiatives.’’  We  at 
CRF,  Inc.  are  pleased  that  your  Subcommittee  has  devoted  the  time  and  attention 
to this important topic. Upgrading America’s healthcare system will require a thor-
ough  understanding  of  the  technologies  that  exist  to  improve  patient  health  and 
safety.  The  distinguished  panel  of  witnesses  addressed  many  of  these  issues.  How-
ever,  as  often  happens,  the  discussion  focused  almost  exclusively  on  electronic 
health records. While electronic health records are an important part of a 21st cen-
tury  healthcare  system,  there  are  other  important  technologies  to  consider  as  well, 
such as electronic patient diaries. 

Electronic  patient  diaries  (eDiaries)  are  handheld  devices  used  primarily  in  clin-
ical  trials  to  exchange  information  between  patients  and  clinical  teams.  These  de-
vices  make  it  easier  for  patients  to  report  on  their  health  over  the  course  of  a  clin-
ical  trial  and  play  a  critical  role  in  increasing  the  reliability  and  safety  of  clinical 
drug trials, assuring that high-quality drugs make it on the market in timely man-
ner. . 

Currently, many clinical studies are conducted with paper diaries, where patients 
record  their  experiences  with  a  medication  by  hand  each  day.  There  are  numerous 
problems  involved  with  using  paper  diaries  in  drug  trials  including  a  low  rate  of 
patient  compliance,  which  has  serious  implications  on  the  reliability  and  accuracy 
of  clinical  trial  data.  Traditional  paper  diaries  have  compliance  rates  of  11  percent 
to  60  percent  as  measured  by  when  the  patient  entered  the  data  versus  when  they 
should  have  entered  the  data.  In  contrast,  eDiaries  have  very  high  rates  of  compli-
ance—over  90  percent  in  most  cases.  Furthermore,  the  comfort  level  patients  have 
with  eDiaries  leads  to  regular  data  entry,  resulting  in  a  strong  level  of  consistency 
in electronic information and more valid trial results. 

Recent drug recalls have illustrated all too well the risks involved with unreliable 
or  inaccurate  trial  data.  In  addition  to  offering  far  superior  compliance  rates, 
eDiaries  provide  real-time  patient  monitoring,  which  allows  the  immediate  identi-
fication  of  dangerous  side  effects.  eDiaries  directly  benefit  patients  and  the  Amer-
ican public by ensuring safe and efficient clinical trials. 

eDiaries have been proven to make a tremendous difference in data accuracy, trial 
safety  and  efficiency,  which  clearly  impacts  the  findings  of  clinical  trials  as  well  as 
has  positive  implications  for  the  final  drug  product.  eDiaries  also  are  providing  an 
easy-to-use,  cost-effective  means  to  capture  important  patient  health  information 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

119 

and  enable  timely  sharing  and  communication  between  patients  and  their  physi-
cians. 

CRF,  Inc.  is  the  market  leader  in  eDiaries,  providing  diaries  to  13  of  the  top  20 
pharmaceutical  companies  and  connecting  more  than  100,000  patients  across  58 
countries and in 48 languages. In any future eHealth endeavors, we would welcome 
the  opportunity  to  be  a  resource  for  your  office.  If  you  have  questions  about  elec-
tronic patient diaries or CRF’s work, please do not hesitate to contact us. 

Sincerely, 

PAM MCNAMARA, 

Chief Executive Officer. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  ROSE MARIE ROBERTSON,  CHIEF SCIENCE OFFICER, 
THE AMERICAN HEART ASSOCIATION;  PROFESSOR OF MEDICINE,  VANDERBILT 
UNIVERSITY MEDICAL CENTER 
My  name  is  Rose  Marie  Robertson,  and  I  am  a  cardiologist,  a  Professor  of  Medi-
cine, and the Chief Science Officer of the American Heart Association. On behalf of 
the  American  Heart  Association  and  its  more  than  22  million  volunteers  and  sup-
porters,  I  am  pleased  to  submit  this  statement  for  the  hearing  record.  We  wish  to 
thank  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Sub-
committee  on  Technology,  Innovation,  and  Competitiveness  for  the  opportunity  to 
submit written testimony regarding the importance of health information technology 
and  Congress’  potential  role  in  promoting  and  supporting  health  information  tech-
nology initiatives. 
Overview 

Since  1924,  the  American  Heart  Association  has  dedicated  itself  to  reducing  dis-
ability  and  death  from  cardiovascular  diseases,  including  stroke,  through  research, 
education  and  advocacy.  Providing  widespread  access  to  effective,  credible  scientific 
information is vital to our mission. The American Heart Association and the Amer-
ican  Stroke  Association,  a  division  of  the  American  Heart  Association,  actively  par-
ticipate  in  efforts  to  improve  the  delivery  of  cardiovascular  health  care  by  promul-
gating scientifically-based standards and guidelines, sponsoring and overseeing clin-
ical  research,  publishing  peer-reviewed  journals,  and  researching  and  developing 
programs to assist providers and patients. 

Two  forms  of  cardiovascular  disease,  heart  disease  and  stroke,  are  the  first  and 
third  leading  causes  of  death  in  the  United  States.  Some  60  million  Americans— 
about  one  in  five—suffer  from  some  form  of  cardiovascular  disease,  ranging  from 
high blood pressure to myocardial infarction, angina pectoris, stroke, congenital vas-
cular defects and congestive heart failure. The estimated annual direct and indirect 
cost to the Nation of these diseases is approximately $400 billion. 

The use of health information technology presents a number of important opportu-
nities  to  improve  the  lives  of  Americans  by  enhancing  their  access  to  efficient  and 
appropriate health care services for the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of car-
diovascular diseases, including stroke. 
Health Information Technology Can Address Barriers to Care 

Although  the  United  States  health  care  system  is  among  the  best  in  the  world, 
a  number  of  researchers—including  those  at  the  Institutes  of  Medicine  (IOM)  and 
the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services’  Agency  for  Healthcare  Re-
search and Quality (AHRQ)—have documented serious shortcomings in our Nation’s 
health care system. 

Important concerns exist regarding the fragmented nature of our health care sys-
tem  and  the  resulting  barriers  to  effective  communication  among  the  various  pro-
viders  who  treat  each  patient.  For  a  multitude  of  reasons,  patients  often  do  not  re-
ceive  the  full  scope  and  level  of  recommended  care  that  is  well-described  in  the  ex-
isting  clinical  literature  and  the  national  treatment  guidelines  for  cardiovascular 
disease, stroke and other serious diseases. 

In  its  March  2005  report  to  Congress,  the  Medicare  Payment  Advisory  Commis-
sion  (MedPAC)  echoed  many  of  the  concerns  raised  by  IOM,  AHRQ,  and  others 
about  the  these  serious  shortcomings  in  our  health  care  system.  In  their  report, 
MedPAC highlighted the important role that health information technology systems 
can  play  in  improving  health  care.  Too  often,  the  strategies  and  services  that  we 
know  will  improve  patient  outcomes  (including  such  basic  interventions  as  treating 
high blood pressure to goal levels) are not being translated into the day-to-day lives 
of patients in the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Potential Solutions Through Health Information Technology 

120 

Wider use of health information technology systems is critical to the improvement 
and  success  of  our  Nation’s  health  care  system,  and  ultimately,  ensuring  improved 
health outcomes for Americans. Health information technology is already helping to 
improve  the  efficiency  of  the  health  care  system  and  to  ensure  that  providers  have 
comprehensive  and  up-to-date  clinical  records  to  facilitate  their  clinical  decision- 
making.  Health  information  technology  is  providing  powerful  tools  to  help  improve 
health  care  efficiencies  by  connecting  providers  and  facilitating  the  coordination  of 
care. 

Health  information  technology  also  has  the  potential  to  improve  patient  care  by 
incorporating  tools  that  support  and  assist  providers  in  making  clinical  decisions. 
Such clinical decision support tools integrate state-of-the-art clinical knowledge and 
practice guidelines with patient-specific clinical information. 

We applaud the Subcommittee’s interest in health information technology. To fur-
ther  innovation  and  significantly  improve  the  delivery  of  health  care,  we  urge  the 
Subcommittee to consider legislative proposals that facilitate the adoption of health 
information technology and that include provisions fostering the integration of clin-
ical decision support tools into this technology. 

Properly designed clinical decision support tools can provide many benefits to pro-
viders  and  their  patients.  Such  tools  can  provide  physicians  and  other  health  care 
professionals with the ability to review relevant patient data in ‘‘real time’’ with in-
tegrated  prompts  that  reflect  well-established  treatment  guidelines  for  patients. 
These  programs  do  not  dictate  physician  practice,  but  rather  assist  physicians  and 
other  providers  in  remembering  and  considering  the  clinical  options  that  are  most 
likely to be of proven benefit. In addition, such tools can provide a continuous qual-
ity improvement function, which can allow providers to compare their improvements 
in  achieving  performance  measures  over  time  and  to  compare  their  performance 
against  averages  for  providers  of  similar  size  and  resources.  Finally,  such  tools  can 
facilitate  communications  between  the  various  providers  who  care  for  each  patient. 
One  successful  example  of  a  clinical  decision  support  tool  is  Get  With  the  Guide-
lines,  a  program  developed  by  the  American  Heart  Association  and  in  use  by  over 
800 hospitals today. 1 

• Get  With  The  Guidelines  provides  integrated,  real-time  prompts  based  on  the 
American Heart Association’s scientific guidelines. These prompts remind physi-
cians  and  other  members  of  the  care  team,  in  real  time,  of  specific,  evidence- 
based treatment interventions to consider as they review each patient’s clinical 
information and develop a treatment plan prior to hospital discharge. 
• Get  With  The  Guidelines  also  supports  continuous  quality  improvement  activi-
ties  that  allow  providers  to  compare  current  treatment  data  against  both  their 
own past performance and aggregate benchmarks from other providers. 

As  demonstrated  in  the  clinical  literature,  the  combination  of  these  functions  re-

sults in significantly improved patient care and outcomes. 2 3 4 

The  United  States  has  reached  a  critical  point  in  the  formation  and  implementa-
tion  of  health  information  technology  initiatives.  We  commend  this  Subcommittee 
for  its  foresight  in  investigating  potential  initiatives  and  opportunities  to  foster 
health information technology development. 

At  this  critical  juncture,  we  urge  the  Subcommittee  and  Congress  to  ensure  that 
the momentum and innovation in the health information technology area continues 
to  accelerate,  resulting  in  widespread  use  of  health  information  technology.  None-
theless, it is imperative that the Congress find ways to minimize the burden of such 
systems  on  providers,  especially  small  providers  and  those  institutions  caring  for 
low-income patients. 

The  American  Heart  Association  has  enthusiastically  endorsed  the  Health  Infor-
mation  Technology  Act  of  2005,  S.  1227,  introduced  by  Senators  Snowe  and  Stabe-
now  and  the  Better  Healthcare  Through  Information  Technology  Act  of  2005,  S. 

1 Honore  T.  American  Heart  Association’s  hospital-based  quality  improvement  program  re-
ceives  award  from  Health  and  Human  Services  Secretary  Tommy  Thompson.  AHA  News.  2004 
(December 13, 2004). 

2 LaBresh KA, Ellrodt AG, Gliklich R, Liljestrand J, Peto R. Get With The Guidelines for car-
diovascular  secondary  prevention:  pilot  results.  Archives  Internal  Medicine.  2004;164:203–209. 
3 Berthiaume JT, Tyler PA, Ng-Osorio J, LaBresh KA. Aligning financial incentives with ‘‘Get 
With  The  Guidelines’’  to  improve  cardiovascular  care.  The  American  Journal  of  Managed  Care. 
2004;10:501–504. 

4 LaBresh KA, Gliklich R, Liljestrand J, Peto R, Ellrodt AG. Using ‘‘Get With The Guidelines’’ 
to improve cardiovascular secondary prevention. Joint Commission Journal on Quality and Safe-
ty. 2003;29:539–550. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

121 

1355, introduced by Senators Enzi and Kennedy. These bills include grant programs 
and  other  initiatives  that  would  promote  investment  in  health  information  tech-
nology  programs.  These  bills  also  include  provisions  that  would  foster  the  integra-
tion and use of meaningful clinical decision support tools within health information 
technology systems. 
Conclusion 

On behalf of the millions of American Heart Association professionals, volunteers 
and  donors,  I  sincerely  thank  the  Subcommittee  for  its  interest  in  health  informa-
tion  technology  systems.  The  innovative  use  of  health  information  technology  has 
the  ability  to  dramatically  improve  the  health  outcomes  of  Americans,  including 
those  with  heart  disease  and  stroke—the  number  one  and  number  three  causes  of 
death among Americans. 

As  Congress  considers  initiatives  to  develop  and  implement  innovative  health  in-
formation  technology,  we  urge  you  to  promote  systems  that  take  full  advantage  of 
the tools that health information technology can support, including clinical decision 
support tools. Integration of patient-specific clinical data with well-established treat-
ment  guidelines  and  ongoing  continuous  quality  improvement  functions  are  essen-
tial  to  ensuring  that  these  systems  reach  their  full  potential  in  providing  effective 
assistance to physicians and other providers. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE PHARMACEUTICAL CARE MANAGEMENT ASSOCIATION 

Introduction 

PCMA  is  the  national  association  representing  America’s  pharmaceutical  benefit 
managers  (PBMs).  PCMA  represents  both  independent,  stand-alone  PBMs  and 
health  plans’  PBM  subsidiaries.  Together,  PCMA  member  companies  administer 
prescription  drug  plans  that  provide  access  to  safe,  effective,  and  affordable  pre-
scription  drugs  for  more  than  200  million  Americans  in  private  and  public  health 
care programs. PCMA appreciates the opportunity to submit testimony. 

PCMA strongly supports the role health information technology can play in ensur-
ing  patient  safety,  reducing  costs  and  creating  a  more  efficient  health  care  system. 
As  leaders  in  developing  workable  information  technologies  for  pharmacy  benefits, 
PBMs have developed sophisticated systems for allowing real time fulfillment of pre-
scriptions  at  the  pharmacy  counter  and  drug  utilization  review  systems  that  notify 
pharmacists of potential drug to drug interactions based upon an individual’s medi-
cation  history.  PBMs  combine  these  technologies  in  ePrescribing  so  doctors  can  di-
rectly link to a pharmacy and purchaser without the need of a pen and pad. 
Value of ePrescribing 

In  the  2004  eHealth  initiative  report  titled  ‘‘Electronic  Prescribing:  Toward  Max-
imum  Value  and  Rapid  Adoption’’  it  is  stated  that  Americans  made  more  then  823 
million  visits  to  physicians’  offices  in  2000  and,  according  to  the  National  Associa-
tion of Chain Drug Stores (NACDS), four out of five patients who visit a doctor leave 
with  at  least  one  prescription.  More  than  3  billion  prescriptions  are  written,  and 
prescription  medications  are  used  by  65  percent  of  the  U.S.  public  in  a  given  year. 
The study goes on to state that 25 percent of patients who received at least one pre-
scription  reported  an  adverse  drug  event,  and  39  percent  of  these  events  were 
deemed either ameliorable or preventable. 

Electronic prescribing can help prevent medication errors because it instantly con-
nects  the  health  care  provider,  the  pharmacy,  and  the  payers.  Patient  medication 
history  and  insurance  information  can  be  available  for  the  physician  when  pre-
scribing  and,  at  the  pharmacy,  each  prescription  can  be  checked  electronically  for 
dosage,  interactions  with  other  medications,  and  therapeutic  duplication.  Patient 
safety  can  also  be  improved  through  avoiding  hard-to-read  physician  handwriting 
and by automating the process for determining drug interactions and allergies. 

Eprescribing  can  also  improve  efficiency  and  reduce  costs  by  providing  informa-
tion  about  the  formulary,  including  lower-cost  generics,  and  co-pay  information.  It 
can  help  ensure  that  patients  and  health  professionals  have  the  best  and  latest 
medical information at hand when they make important decisions about medicines, 
helping  patients  get  the  most  benefits  at  the  lowest  cost.  In  addition,  eprescribing 
shows  promise  in  creating  efficiencies  in  the  physician’s  office  and  the  pharmacy. 
This can be done by reducing the costs associated with patient eligibility checks and 
creating  timely  interfaces  with  formularie  s  to  make  sure  the  correct  drug  is  pre-
scribed the first time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

One Uniform Eprescribing Standard 

122 

PCMA  believes  that  creating  unified  eprescribing  standards  through  appropriate 
and  full  preemption  of  state  laws  is  a  critical  component  to  the  ultimate  success  of 
health IT initiatives, including eprescribing. State laws and regulations, if they deal 
with  eprescribing,  tend  to  make  the  eprescribing  process  less  efficient,  or  even  ille-
gal,  and  therefore  not  likely  to  be  utilized  by  payors,  physicians  and  pharmacists. 
[See  Attachment]  The  National  Association  of  Boards  of  Pharmacy  (NABP)  model 
act states that electronic prescriptions must be transmitted directly to the pharmacy 
‘‘with  no  intervening  person  or  third  party  having  access  to  the  prescription  drug 
order.’’ For those states that have adopted this language, this would mean that elec-
tronic  prescriptions  that  convey  any  formulary  information  or  comprehensive  medi-
cation history would not be allowed. 

With the increased attention on the value information technology (IT) can provide 
the  health  care  system,  policymakers  are  becoming  more  familiar  with  the  barriers 
that exist to broad health IT adoption. An often noted barrier to adoption is the pos-
sibility  of  numerous,  disjointed  standards  that  directly  impact  how  these  systems 
will work in the practice setting. 

In  fact,  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS)  press  release  in 
announcing  the  release  of  this  proposed  rule  stated,  ‘‘The  current  lack  of  common 
standards  is  a  barrier  to  the  use  of  health  information  technology,  including 
eprescribing.’’ 1 Also, HHS stated in its Goals for a Strategic Framework for Health 
IT  adoption  ‘‘the  government  has  made  a  commitment  to  using  common  standards 
and  architecture . . . The  result  will  be  a  more  cost-effective  and  efficient 
healthcare system.’’ 2 

The GAO has identified in its 2004 report, ‘‘HHS Efforts to Promote Health Infor-
mation Technology and Legal Barriers to Its Adoption,’’ specific barriers to adopting 
health  IT  include  financial,  technical,  and  cultural  aspects.  Technical  barriers,  in-
cluding  a  ‘‘lack  of  uniform  standards  for  data  submission  and  reporting’’  clearly 
show  that  a  uniform  standard  is  critical  for  the  Federal  Government  to  reduce  or 
eliminate as many barriers to adoption as possible. 
Medicare Part D Eprescribing 

The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) issued an NPRM to estab-
lish  foundation  standards  for  eprescribing  that  are  expected  to  go  into  effect  at  the 
start of the Part D program in 2006. 3 All health plans and drug plans must support 
eprescribing although providers are not required to use eprescribing. 

The  Medicare  established  eprescribing  standards  should  be  adopted  in  a  manner 
that  does  not  require  a  standard-by-standard  evaluation  to  determine  which  indi-
vidual  state  standard  may  or  may  not  be  preempted.  This  would  create  a  burden-
some  review  to  compare  the  Medicare  standards  to  that  of  each  relevant  state  law 
and  regulation  to  determine  where  Medicare  has  created  a  standard  and  where  it 
has not. 

We  believe  CMS  has  the  authority  necessary  to  govern  all  electronic  prescription 
of any drugs included in the Part D program, so as to ensure a single, national elec-
tronic  prescription  drug  program  that  would  be  adopted  and  used  consistently  by 
prescribers to the benefit of Medicare and the rest of the health care system. 

Examples  of  state  eprescribing  laws  or  regulations  that  are  burdensome  include: 
requiring  a  fax  or  hard  copy  to  follow  an  ePrescription,  prohibiting  specific  sched-
uled drugs, and prohibiting interstate transmission of prescriptions. 

With  a  large  focus  of  resources  and  time  needed  by  all  partners  in  the 
eprescribing  system  to  overcome  the  obvious  challenges  of  prescriber  start-up  costs 
and  broad  education  about  the  value  proposition  of  eprescribing,  it  is  critical  that 
the  standards  and  processes  that  make  the  technology  function  not  add  to  this  for-
midable challenge. 

In conclusion, we look forward to working with the Committee on a common goal 
of an interoperable health information technology system, particularly eprescribing, 
that can fully realize the benefits to patients and the health care system. 

1 ‘‘Eprescribing proposed rule,’’ Department of Health and Human Services—Press Release. 
2 ‘‘Goals  of  Strategic  Framework.’’  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  Office  of  the 

National Coordinator for Health Information Technology (ONCHIT). 

3 70 FR 6256–6274. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

123 

2003–2004 National Association of Boards of Pharmacy Survey of Pharmacy 

Law 

XXII. Electronic Transmission of Prescriptions: Computer-to-Computer 

Is Prescription 
Transmission 
from In-state 

Prescriber 
Computer to 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

Is Prescription 
Transmission 
from Out-of- 

State 

Prescriber 
Computer to 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

Is Prescription 

Transfer 
Between 
In-state 
Pharmacy 
Computers 
Allowed? 

Is Prescription 
Transfer from 
Out-of-state 
Pharmacy 
Computer to 

In-state 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

Does Board 
Recognize 
Electronic 

signatures for 
Non-controlled 

Substance 

Prescriptions? 

Yes I 
Not 

Not 

Yes W 
No 
Yes 
H 
Yes Y 
Yes 
Yes I 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
Yes N 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 

addressed 

addressed 

addressed 

addressed 

addressed 

addressed 

Yes I 
Not 

Not 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes I 
Yes D, S 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
No 
Not 

Yes W 
No 
Yes H 
H 
Yes Y 
Yes 
Yes I 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
Yes N 
Yes O 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes 
Not 

Yes 
Not 

Yes G 

Yes G 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes I, M 
Yes S 
Yes F 
No 
Yes 
Yes F 
Not 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes I, M 
Yes S 
Yes F 
No 
Yes 
Yes F 
Not 

No 
No 

Yes E 

No 
No 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
No 
Not 

Yes W 
Yes 
Yes S 
—— 

Yes W 
Yes F 
Yes M 
Yes 

Yes W 
Yes F 
Yes M 
Yes 
Yes B, F, M  Yes B, F, M  Yes L 
Yes 
Yes K 
Yes B 
Yes F 
Yes M 
Yes N 
No 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes 
Yes K 
Yes B 
Yes F 
Yes M 
Yes N 
No 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
No 
Yes J 
No 
Yes 
Yes 
Not 

addressed 
E 

addressed 
E 

addressed 
E 

addressed 
E 

addressed 
E 

State 

Alabama 
Alaska 

Arizona 

Yes 
Arkansas 
Yes 
California 
Yes I 
Colorado 
Yes D, S 
Connecticut 
Delaware 
Yes 
District of Columbia  No 
Florida 
Yes 
No 
Georgia 
Guam 
Not 

Hawaii 
Idaho 
Illinois 
Indiana 
Iowa 
Kansas 
Kentucky 
Louisiana 
Maine 
Maryland 
Massachusetts 
Michigan 
Minnesota 
Mississippi 

Missouri 
Montana 
Nebraska 
Nevada 
New Hampshire 
New Jersey 
New Mexico 
New York 
North Carolina 
North Dakota 
Ohio 
Oklahoma 

Oregon 

Pennsylvania 

Puerto Rico 

Rhode Island 

South Carolina 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes T 
Yes E 
No 
Yes Z 
Yes P 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes R 
Yes (Guide-

lines) 

Not 

Not 

addressed 
C 
Not 

addressed 

Not 

addressed 
Yes (Guide-

lines) 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes T 
Yes E 
No 
Yes Z 
Yes P 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes R 
Yes (Guide-

lines) 

Not 

Not 

addressed 
C 
Not 

addressed 

addressed 

Not 

No 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes F, O 
No 
Yes S, X 
Yes P 
Yes 
No 
Yes M 
Yes 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes F, O 
No 
Yes S, X 
Yes P 
Yes 
No 
Yes M 
Yes 

Yes M 

Yes M 

Yes 

Not 

addressed 

Not 

Yes F 

Not 

Yes F 

addressed 

addressed 

Yes Q 

No 

addressed 

Yes A 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
Yes E 
No 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes R 
Yes 

E 

E 

—— 

Not 

Yes 

addressed 

addressed 

addressed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

XXII. Electronic Transmission of Prescriptions: Computer-to-Computer—Continued 

124 

Is Prescription 
Transmission 
from In-state 

Prescriber 
Computer to 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

No 
Yes 
Yes I 
No 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes S, T 
Yes 
Yes 

State 

South Dakota 
Tennessee 
Texas 
Utah 

Vermont 
Virginia 
Washington 
West Virginia 
Wisconsin 
Wyoming 

LEGEND 

Is Prescription 
Transmission 
from Out-of- 

State 

Prescriber 
Computer to 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

Is Prescription 

Transfer 
Between 
In-state 
Pharmacy 
Computers 
Allowed? 

Is Prescription 
Transfer from 
Out-of-state 
Pharmacy 
Computer to 

In-state 
Pharmacy 
Computer 
Allowed? 

Does Board 
Recognize 
Electronic 

signatures for 
Non-controlled 

Substance 

Prescriptions? 

No 
Yes 
Yes U 
Not 

addressed 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
Yes S, T 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes F 
Yes 
Yes 
No 

Yes 
Yes V 
Yes N 
Yes S, T 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes F 
Yes 
Yes U 
No 

Yes 
Yes V 
Yes N 
Yes S, T 
Yes 
Yes 

Yes E, AA 
Yes 
No BB 
Not 

addressed 

Yes 
Yes 
Yes 
No 
Yes 
Yes 

A—Electronic prescriptions recognized. 
B—Regulations require pharmacist to perform certain functions. 
C—Regulations are currently being considered and/or drafted. 
D—Exclusive access or direct lines not allowed. 
E—No rules at this time. 
F—Only by pharmacies with a common electronic file. 
G—Must comply with Rule R423–408. 
H—Not prohibited. 
I—No Schedule II substances allowed. 
J—With proper security precautions. 
K—Must  fully  comply  with  201  KAR  2:165  and  21  CFR  1306.26,  and  must  be 
online, real-time transmission. 
L—Electronic  signature  defined  as  ‘‘Confidential  personalized  digital  key,  code, 
or  number  used  for  secure  electronic  data  transmissions,  which  identifies  and 
authenticates the signatory.’’ 
M—Must  satisfy  the  requirements  of  state  regulations  for  prescription 
transferral.  Stores  that  access  the  same  records  electronically  are  not  required 
to cancel the original prescription. 
N—Prescriptions  may  be  transmitted  intrastate  and  interstate  from  pharmacy 
to pharmacy. If controlled substances, DEA rules must be followed. 
O—For non-controlled drugs. 
P—With  assurances  for  confidentiality  of  the  electronic  message.  No  controlled 
substances. 
Q—The  transfer  of  prescription  information  for  the  purpose  of  dispensing  au-
thorized  refills  is  permissible  between  pharmacies  where  all  pharmacies  are 
under  common  ownership  and  access  prescription  information  through  a  com-
mon  computerized  data  system,  subject  to  subsection  (G)(1)(c),  (G)(2),  (G)(6), 
(G)(7), (G)(8), (G)(9), and (G)(10). 
R—Prescription  not  valid  unless  Board-approved  system  assures  that  only  au-
thorized prescribers have issued the electronically transmitted prescription. 
S—Electronic transmission of prescription requires same verification as any oral 
or telephone prescription. 
T—No  access  to  the  prescription  information  can  be  made  by  other  than  the 
practitioner and the pharmacy. 
U—For dangerous drugs only. 
V—Pharmacist  to  pharmacist  ‘‘real  time’’  communication  of  information  found 
on or with prescription hard copy. 
W—Under jurisdiction of Department of Health, Food and Drug Branch. 
X—Only during normal business hours. 
Y—Specific rules regarding electronic transmission computer to computer. 
Z—Must comply with 16.19.6.23 of Board regulations. 
AA—Allowed as long as pharmacist is satisfied with legitimacy of signature. 
BB—Prescriber signature not required. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

125 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE ADVANCED MEDICAL TECHNOLOGY ASSOCIATION 

(ADVAMED) 

AdvaMed and its member companies would like to thank the Committee for hold-
ing  this  important  hearing  on  health  information  technology  (HIT).  HIT  promises 
to  revolutionize  the  health  care  delivery  system  and  have  a  dramatic  effect  on  pa-
tient safety, quality of care, and efficiency. HIT products and applications are great-
ly  expanding  throughout  vital  sectors  of  the  American  health  care  delivery  system, 
including  clinical  operations,  decision  support,  devices,  equipment,  distribution,  ad-
ministrative tasks, and the interface with payers. As a result, HIT is helping to sig-
nificantly  reduce  medical  errors,  improve  the  quality  of  care,  speed  paperwork,  and 
reduce administrative costs. 

AdvaMed is the world’s largest medical technology association representing manu-
facturers  of  medical  devices,  diagnostic  products  and  medical  information  systems. 
AdvaMed’s  more  than  1,300  members  and  subsidiaries  manufacture  nearly  90  per-
cent  of  the  $75  billion  of  health  care  technology  purchased  annually  in  the  United 
States and more than 50 percent of the $175 billion purchased annually around the 
world.  Many  of  these  technologies—such  as  electronic  infusion  pumps  that  admin-
ister  intravenous  (IV)  drugs,  verify  correct  drugs,  and  check  dosages,  as  well  as  re-
mote physiological monitoring (RPM) technology—save lives and improve the quality 
of life for patients by preventing medication errors and managing disease. 
The Role of Technology 

Universally  interoperable  electronic  health  record  (EHR)  holds  great  promise  in 
reducing  health  care  costs  and  improving  the  quality  of  care  delivered  to  patients. 
The  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS)  cites  two  studies  that  esti-
mate  savings  from  implementing  EHRs  to  be  between  $78  and  $112  billion.  HIT, 
however,  is  expanding  far  beyond  the  EHR  to  include  devices  that  are  already  dra-
matically improving patient safety, quality of care and health care efficiencies. Com-
bined, the EHR and these other innovative technologies will ultimately play a major 
role in reducing overall health care costs. 

The  Advanced  Medical  Technology  Association,  AdvaMed,  represents  the 
innovators  of  these  smart  medical  technologies.  Examples  of  these  innovations, 
which include: 

Records 
• Application of computer-assisted physician order entry to increase patient safety 

and health system efficiency. 

• Personal digital assistants (PDAs), hand-held devices that allow doctors making 

rounds to immediately access each patient’s complete medical record. 

• Lab results that are stored and sent to physicians electronically, which stream-

lines and speeds up testing and retrieval. 

• Pharmacies  that  are  receiving  electronic  prescription  orders  from  physicians. 
Pharmacists are prevented from filling orders if critical patient data is missing, 
potential  adverse  drug  interactions  are  flagged,  and  medication  alerts  are 
issued for high-risk medications. The electronic record of all of this is available 
in real time by any authorized health care provider. 

Devices 
• Infusion  pumps  that  are  preventing  drug  overdoses  and  enabling  hospitals  to 

re-engineer their systems to avoid medical errors. 

• Image-guided  or  computer-assisted  surgery  (CAS),  which  allows  surgeons  to 
more precisely position their instruments and to document the procedure. Proce-
dures  are  shorter  and  less  invasive,  and  CAS  appears  to  be  improving  quality 
of care and reducing morbidity in some cases. 

• Devices  with  computerized  components  such  as  implantable  cardioverter- 
defibrillators  (ICDs),  which  allow  heart  patients  subject  to  life-threatening  car-
diac  arrhythmias  to  send  vital  data  to  their  physicians  via  a  secure  Internet 
connection. 

Off-Site Monitoring and Communication 
• Remote monitoring technologies that are eliminating trips to the doctor and en-
abling  improved  monitoring  of  patients  with  chronic  diseases  and  improved 
monitoring of intensive care unit (ICU) patients. 
• Telemedicine  to  improve  care,  for  instance,  of  both  rural,  less  accessible  popu-

lations and urban populations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

126 

• Picture  archiving  and  communication  (PAC)  systems,  which  store  and  permit 
the transmittal of radiological images such as X-rays when and where they are 
most needed. 

• Virtual patient visits via e-mail. 

Improving Patient Safety 

The Institute of Medicine estimates that 44,000 to 98,000 deaths each year result 
from  preventable  medical  errors  in  hospitals.  Each  year,  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
preventable adverse drug events also occur. Different studies find that there are er-
rors  in  24.9  percent  of  hospital  patient  records. 1 Other  estimates,  including  one 
from the Food and Drug Administration, indicate that as many as 372,000 prevent-
able  adverse  drug  events  occur  each  year. 2 These  errors  result  from  administering 
incorrect dosages, errors in filling prescriptions, and adverse drug interactions. 

Recent  studies  on  the  impact  of  medical  technology  in  reducing  medical  errors 
have targeted IV drug administration and computerized physician ordering systems. 
Technologies  that  support  IV  drug  administration  prevent  medication  errors  using 
automated  dosage  limits  and  alerting  systems.  Electronic  physician  ordering  sys-
tems  and  data  management  software  reduce  transcription  and  dosing  errors,  pro-
mote  process  standardization,  increase  access  to  patient-specific  medical  informa-
tion, and reduce laboratory turnaround time. 
Case Study: Computerized Physician Order Entry 

Late in 2003, the National Academies, the Nation’s advisers on science, engineer-
ing  and  medicine,  released  a  report  that  strongly  recommended  health  care  organi-
zations  adopt  information  technology  systems  capable  of  collecting  and  sharing 
health  information  about  patients  and  their  care.  For  some  organizations,  the  first 
step  may  involve  computerized  physician  order  entry  (CPOE),  which  links  the 
health care worker with the facility’s computer system to avert medical errors. 

CPOE can help physicians avoid errors because the doctor enters the prescription 
on the computer. For example, handwriting errors and missed decimal points should 
be a thing of the past. Also, a computerized system can automatically alert the prac-
titioner  to  past  drug  allergies,  potential  drug  interactions  with  medications  the  pa-
tient is already taking, and incorrect dosing. 

The  1999  Institute  of  Medicine  (IOM)  report,  To  Err  is  Human,  estimates  7,000 
deaths from medication errors alone each year. According to the Leapfrog Group for 
Patient  Safety,  more  than  a  million  serious  medication  errors  occur  each  year  in 
U.S. hospitals; Leapfrog estimates that computerizing prescriptions can reduce that 
number  by  88  percent.  Two  Journal  of  the  American  Medical  Association  studies 
concluded  that  about  half  of  serious  medication  errors  were  the  result  of  ordering 
errors. 3 4 These  included  inappropriate  medications  for  the  patient’s  condition,  an 
incorrect dosage considering the patient’s physiological state, such as renal problems 
or  age,  and  prescribing  medications  to  which  the  patient  was  known  to  be  allergic. 
Children’s  Hospital  of  Pittsburgh  (Children’s)  launched  Children’sNet  in  October 
2002.  Since  pediatric  hospitals  have  a  special  challenge  with  medication  errors  due 
to  their  patients’  weights,  POE  seemed  the  logical  first  step  toward  the  hospital’s 
goal of achieving a completely electronic patient record. 

Besides  reducing  weight-related  adverse  drug  events,  Children’s  hoped  CPOE 
would  help  in  other  areas.  Health  care  regulatory  bodies  often  require  compliance 
with  specific  standards  in  order  for  the  institution  to  reach  certain  benchmarks. 
Children’s was challenged to reach compliance with these goals: 

1. Verbal orders had to be co-signed by physicians within 24 hours. 
2. Respiratory therapists had to complete documentation in the patient’s record. 
3. Physicians had to order nutrition screens. 

Children’s  built  these  into  its  CPOE  so  the  system  would  prompt  physicians  or 
allied health professionals to address these concerns on the spot. Finally, physician 

1 Terri  Simmonds.  ‘‘Using  The  Trigger  Tool  to  Detect  Potential  Harm  in  Medication  Manage-
ment.’’  Infusion  Safety:  Addressing  Harm  with  High-Risk  Drug  Administration.  The  ALARIS 
Center for Medication Safety and Clinical Improvement. San Diego, California. 2004, pp 10. 

2 Steven  Tucker.  ‘‘Analysis  of  Impact  of  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration’s  Proposed  Bar 
Code  Label  Requirements  for  Human  Drug  Products  and  Blood.’’  Hospital  Pharmacy.  38  (11), 
Supplement 1, pp S11. 

3 Bates DW, Cullen DJ, Laird N et al. Incidence of adverse drug events and potential adverse 
drug events. Implications for prevention. ADE Prevention Study Group. JAMA 1995;274:29–34. 
4 Leape LL, Bates DW, Cullen DJ et al. Systems analysis of adverse drug events. ADE Preven-

tion Study Group. JAMA 1995;274:35–43. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

127 

surveys  at  Children’s  showed  that  the  doctors  were  not  happy  with  turn-around 
times for lab and diagnostic tests. 

The  CPOE  system  at  Children’s  consists  of  wireless  computers  on  mobile  carts 
that  can  travel  on  rounds  with  the  physician.  Doctors  can  show  lab  or  diagnostic 
test results to parents at the child’s bedside; a charting function easily enables doc-
tors  to  graph  progress.  Of  course,  the  calculator  tool  helps  obtain  a  clear  weight/ 
dosing picture, and its warning system provides an alert if a dose seems out of line, 
based on predetermined standards. 

In addition to the mobile computers, each floor also accommodates four wall com-
puters  and,  where  possible,  additional  desktop  computers.  These  provide  ample  op-
portunity for allied health professionals to complete their charts as well. As it com-
pleted its second year with CPOE: 

harmful medication errors by 75 percent. 

• Children’s  has  eradicated  handwriting  transcription  errors  completely  and  cut 
• By electronically requiring that a child’s weight be entered before a medication 
order  may  be  placed,  Children’s  virtually  eliminated  weight-related  adverse 
drug events. 
• Both  physician  sign-off  of  verbal  orders  within  24  hours  and  documentation  by 
respiratory therapists have reached the 97 percent level. Physicians are now or-
dering nutrition screens 90 percent of the time. 
• Physician satisfaction with response times for lab and diagnostic test results is 

much better. 

Improving  patient  safety  was  Children’s  primary  goal,  but  the  hospital  staff  soon 

learned that patients benefit in a variety of ways: 

tient care. 

• Clinicians  are  redirecting  time  previously  spent  on  administrative  tasks  to  pa-
• Clinicians  have  instantaneous  and  reliable  access  to  information  that  enables 
better  patient  care,  including  lab  tests,  imaging  results,  and  drug  information. 
By enhancing the ability to provide better care, Children’s has created a safer en-

vironment. 
Improving the Quality of Care 

The concept of pay-for-performance is a growing trend as a way to reward health 
care  providers  who  efficiently  deliver  quality  care  to  their  patients.  Three  types  of 
measures are under consideration: 

• Structural measures: Based on the infrastructure within which the provider op-
erates, such as whether or not he or she uses electronic prescription order entry. 
• Process  measures:  Based  on  adherence  to  accepted  clinical  guidelines  that  im-
prove  care  outcomes,  such  as  prescribing  beta  blockers  to  heart  attack  patients 
or successfully monitoring and controlling high blood pressure or glucose levels. 
• Outcome measures: Based on care outcomes that result in reduced morbidity or 
mortality. In myriad ways, health information technology both helps health care 
professionals deliver quality of care to their patients and provides an automatic 
way  to  measure  that  delivery  for  a  variety  of  assessment  purposes,  including 
pay-for-performance incentive remuneration. 

Today’s  medical  field  is  replete  with  illustrations  of  how  HIT  is  improving  the 
quality  of  care  for  American  patients.  Quality  of  care  enhancers  include  remote  pa-
tient monitoring, remote ICU oversight, cardiac and implantable device monitoring, 
mobile  telemetry  of  hard-to-diagnose  heart  arrhythmias,  expanding  telemedicine 
possibilities  and  decision  support  software  that  is  helping  physicians  provide  the 
right care. 
Case Study: Remote Patient Monitoring Increases Quality of Care 

Remote  patient  monitoring  (RPM)  uses  an  electronic  device  in  a  patient’s  home 
to  assist  with  disease  management.  The  device  collects  data  on  the  patient’s  condi-
tion  and  transmits  analysis  of  those  data  to  a  care  delivery  service  that  uses  those 
data to communicate with and monitor the patient. In addition, the devices can help 
providers  analyze  that  data  to  refine  and  improve  ongoing  monitoring  activities, 
make clinical diagnoses as necessary, and assess the need for treatment. 

With  its  ability  to  link  patients  to  their  doctors,  remote  patient  monitoring  also 
is  a  particularly  useful  and  increasingly  more  important  tool  in  providing  rural 
health  care.  Patients  typically  use  electronic  home  monitoring  devices  once  a  day 
to collect basic physiological data—such as weight, blood pressure, blood oxygen lev-
els, and heart rate—and to answer specific questions about their condition. The pa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

128 

tients’  information  is  transmitted  electronically  to  a  central  monitoring  station, 
where the data is analyzed by nurses and care managers. These care managers can 
track  early  warning  signs  and  symptoms  and  contact  patients,  providing  feedback, 
education, and medication changes long before the patients need to be hospitalized. 
Reducing Costs 

By reducing duplicative care, lowering health care administration costs and avoid-
ing care errors, health information technology could save approximately $140 billion 
per  year,  according  to  HHS.  That  is  close  to  10  percent  of  total  U.S.  health  care 
spending.  Studies  cited  by  HHS  in  its  2004  Health  IT  Strategic  Framework  Report 
suggest the use of EHRs can reduce laboratory and radiology test ordering by 9 per-
cent  to  14  percent,  lower  ancillary  test  charges  by  up  to  8  percent,  reduce  hospital 
admissions ($16,000 average cost) by 2 percent, and reduce excess medication usage 
by  11  percent.  Two  studies  have  estimated  that  ambulatory  EHRs  have  the  poten-
tial  to  save  all  payers  $78  billion  to  $112  billion  annually.  HHS  also  cites  evidence 
that  EHRs  have  the  potential  to  reduce  administrative  inefficiency  and  paperwork. 
Depending  on  the  HIT  technology  involved,  near-term  return  on  investment  will 
vary in both time frames and resulting financial margins. However, studies to date 
suggest that in the long-term, as HHS notes, the economic benefits of HIT could be 
large. 

For  example,  a  study  in  the  New  England  Journal  of  Medicine 5 concluded  that 
both costs ($26,325 vs. $35,283) and length of stay (10 days vs. 12.9 days) in an in-
tensive  care  unit  were  reduced  when  the  CPOE  system  included  suggested  advice 
regarding antibiotic ordering. 

Besides improving clinical outcomes, using remote Intensivists (intensive care spe-
cialists) to monitor patients electronically from a remote location as part of an ICU 
telemedicine  program  to  supplement  in-house  specialists  also  enhances  hospital  fi-
nancial  revenues,  according  to  a  2004  study  in  Critical  Care  Medicine.6 Although 
ICU  beds  account  for  only  10  percent  of  total  inpatient  beds,  the  cost  of  caring  for 
ICU  patients  can  exceed  30  percent  of  total  hospital  costs.  Due  to  this  high  cost  of 
ICU  care,  improved  clinical  outcomes  can  theoretically  offset  the  costs  of  superior 
care. 

In the study, lower variable costs per case and higher hospital revenues (from in-
creased  case  volumes)  generated  financial  benefits  in  excess  of  program  costs.  Cost 
savings  resulted  both  from  a  reduction  in  the  average  length  of  stay  in  the  ICUs 
(3.63  days  vs.  4.35  days)  and  from  a  decrease  in  daily  costs.  Both  before  and  after 
the  remote  telemedicine  program  was  instituted,  the  ICUs  had  high  occupancy 
rates. But, the authors concluded, greater patient turnover during the supplemental 
Intensivist program generated additional contribution margins to the hospital. 
Case Study: Digital Information System 

Picture  archiving  and  communication  systems  (PACS)  enable  hospitals,  imaging 
centers  and  multi-site  health  care  organizations  to  manage,  store  and  transmit  pa-
tient medical images such as digital X-ray, MRI and CR images. Access to these im-
ages is fast and easy. Combining this kind of technology with a digital patient infor-
mation system can pay significant financial dividends. Such a system shared by sev-
eral  Boston-area  hospitals  reported  saving  an  estimated  $1  million  annually  by,  in 
part,  reducing  the  time  spent  searching  for  files  and  the  time  spent  admitting  pa-
tients.  Projected  annual  income  revenues  from  better  patient  retention  as  a  result 
range between $3 million and $4 million.7 
Call to Action: Policies That Foster HIT Adoption 

To  assure  appropriate  access  to  life-saving  and  life-enhancing  medical  tech-
nologies for patients, AdvaMed believes that policies should continue to evolve with 
technology  and  transform  into  a  system  that  supports  technological  advancement. 
AdvaMed  supports  developing  incentives  that  will  overcome  the  barriers  to  imple-
mentation  and  foster  the  timely  adoption  of  these  health  information  technologies 
(HIT).  Providers,  payers,  and  HIT/medical  technology  manufacturers  will  all  have 
to address these barriers to enable interoperable, effective, and efficient use of these 
technologies  to  improve  the  quality  of  care,  patient  safety,  and  health  outcomes 
overall. 

5 Evans  RS,  Pestotnik  SL,  Classen  DC,  et  al.  A  computer-assisted  management  program  for 

antibiotics and other anti-infective agents. N Engl J Med. 1998;338:232–8. 

6 Breslow MJ, Rosenfeld BA, Doerfler M, Burke G et al. Effect of a multiple-site intensive care 
unit  telemedicine  program  on  clinical  and  economic  outcomes:  An  alternative  paradigm  for 
Intensivist staffing. Crit Care Med 2004;32:31–38. 

7 Networking  Health:  Prescriptions  for  the  Internet,  Institute  of  Medicine,  National  Academy 

of Sciences, p. 81, 2000. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

129 

In  order  for  the  dream  of  interoperable  health  information  technology  to  become 
a  reality—for  a  universally  accessible  electronic  health  record  to  become  as  ubiq-
uitous  and  as  commonplace  as  financial  ATM  cards  and  supermarket  ‘‘courtesy’’ 
cards—AdvaMed believes the following must occur: 

Regulatory  Reform:  Unless  an  exception  is  met,  provisions  of  the  Federal  health 
care  program  anti-kickback  statute  prohibit  the  offer  or  acceptance  of  anything  of 
value  in  return  for  patient  or  item/service  referrals.  Likewise,  unless  an  exception 
is  met,  the  physician  self-referral  law  (the  ‘‘Stark’’  law)  bars  hospitals  from  billing 
for  items  or  services  provided  by  physicians  who  have  financial  relationships  with 
the  hospital.  An  exception  to  Stark  has  been  promulgated  by  the  Centers  for  Medi-
care and Medicaid Services for community-wide health information systems. 

The  exception  is  not  well  defined  or  understood,  however,  and  a  much  broader, 
clearer exception is needed to cure the obstacles presented by the Stark law. A par-
allel  safe  harbor  to  the  Federal  health  care  program  and  anti-kickback  statute  is 
also  necessary.  These  barriers  to  the  dissemination  of  resources  (financial,  equip-
ment or otherwise), such as a hospital financially supporting its referring physicians 
in the acquisition and use of health information technology, must be removed. 

Without such reforms, these two laws represent huge obstacles that will have tre-
mendous chilling effects on any efforts, no matter how broad, well financed, or well 
intentioned, to champion the use of HIT. 

Standards:  The  FDA  is  currently  revising  its  software  regulation  policies. 
AdvaMed endorses the FDA’s current policy, under which it only regulates software 
if its output directly results in software-directed treatment or diagnosis of patients. 
We  also  believe  that  the  FDA’s  regulation  of  any  software  associated  with  medical 
devices  should  be  risk-based  and  only  at  the  minimum  level  necessary  to  protect 
public health. 

As for the electronic health record (EHR), it is not a medical device; it stores data 
for  retrieval  by  a  health  care  professional.  EHR  algorithms  do  not  make  diagnostic 
or  treatment  decisions.  Therefore,  FDA  regulation  is  not  appropriate  or  warranted 
under the FDA’s own standards. 

Financial  Incentives:  Many  providers  lack  the  financial  ability  or  consistency  of 
commitment required to make the up-front investment needed to install and operate 
an  advanced  health  information  technology  system.  Therefore,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  and  other  payers  should  provide  financial  incentives  sufficient  to  spur  wide-
spread,  rapid  adoption  of  health  information  technology  throughout  the  health  care 
system,  including  universal  adoption  of  electronic  health  records.  ‘‘Pay-for-perform-
ance’’ proposals should include incentives for adoption and use of health information 
technology. 

Direct Reimbursement: Reimbursement systems should reward new modes of pro-
viding services that result in quality improvement or cost reduction for patient care, 
e.g.,  remote  patient  monitoring,  computer-assisted  surgery,  imaging,  telemedicine, 
and virtual physician visits. 

Quality and Safety Studies: Finally, the eHealth system should be designed to as-
sure  that  data  from  the  electronic  medical  record  would  be  available,  with  appro-
priate  privacy  protections  under  HIPAA,  for  studies  to  improve  patient  safety  and 
quality of care. 
Conclusion 

Again, we thank the Committee for holding this hearing today and we appreciate 
the opportunity to submit testimony for the record. HIT holds great promise for im-
proving  patient  safety,  improving  the  quality  of  medical  care,  and  increasing  effi-
ciency. While EHR is one of the many medical devices that can attain this goal, HIT 
is  expanding  far  beyond  this  and  dramatically  improving  patient  safety,  quality  of 
care and health care efficiencies. 

Despite  the  existing  and  growing  body  of  evidence  that  HIT  will  improve  patient 
safety,  enhance  the  quality  of  care,  and  increase  efficiency  of  care  provided,  many 
barriers  to  adoption  remain.  Regulatory  barriers  like  the  Federal  health  care  pro-
gram anti-kickback statute and the ‘‘Stark’’ physician self-referral law remain an ob-
stacle  to  widespread  adoption  of  HIT.  When  clinical  and  interoperability  standards 
are  developed  by  Congress  and  the  private  sector,  it  is  paramount  to  ensure  that 
patients  have  access  to  new  and  innovative  technologies.  Financial  barriers  for 
health  care  providers  to  purchase  and  maintain  HIT  is  a  particular  problem,  espe-
cially for solo and small group practitioners. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:34 Apr 27, 2011 Jkt 065909 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\65909.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

